illegal: 1434
illegals: 566
alien: 92
wetback: 1
comments with slurs: 
An illegal immigrant killed my 24 year old brother about a mile from his home. My brother was test driving a motorcycle and the illegal immigrant pulled out in front of him(the man was driving unlicensed and illegally) then left my brother to die on the side of the road. So I support the wall 100%!!

An illegal immigrant killed my 24 year old brother about a mile from his home. My brother was test driving a motorcycle and the illegal immigrant pulled out in front of him(the man was driving unlicensed and illegally) then left my brother to die on the side of the road. So I support the wall 100%!!

"So sorry for your loss. These idiots who turn their heads and pretend not to hear or see what is going on because see they haven't had a loved one killed by an illegal are fooling themselves if they think they are going to remain safe if this situation isnt dealt with. I stand with our president

Carl Ostendarpnot asylum illegal immigrants lying to get asylum status deportation is the only solution

"If an emergency can be manufactured over border security when illegal border crossings are near a 20-year low… then it’s a snap to make the case for an emergency over gun deaths

I'm just wondering.....do people live under rocks? How do you not see the damage illegal immigrants do?

Would it only be illegal immigrants that would ransack his house? because no Americans would ever commit a crime 🙄 moron

Alberto Weisz you can’t take your door down but not because of illegal immigrants because of American citizens

Eva Graham How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

"My son was killed by an illegal Mexican immigrant who had already been deported once for DUI. He choose to drive drunk

Lynn Limauro Floyd How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Linda Durbin How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Timothy Kershner that doesn't mean every illegal is now ok. That is the 0000.1% of illegals.

Timothy Kershner good for him  the illegal that murdered my friends child got squat!! Build that wall

"Betsy Hammond We spend $150 billion per year on illegal immigrants welfare. Even if wall only stopped half of it

Dave Callender years ago when I was a child my parents picked up an illegal immigrant he asked if they would be so kind to give him a ride and they did he repaid them by molesting their daughter my sister in the back seat I don't know about you but I don't know any American who would repay kindness behind their backs doing this to their child.

Dave Callender maybe you should have died in that accident then you would have some ground to stand on for your argument like the other family's that have lost family to illegal alien's.  Think man they break the law when coming into our country and break the law after they are here. You go to their country's and break the law. See what happens to you.

Kyle Callender UNFORTUNATELY MEXICAN MEN 1 MAN COMES FOR ASYLUM GETS IT. HE BRINGS ALL ILLEGAL FAMILY ACROSS BORDER THEY GO GET FOOD STAMPS MEDICAID ETC.....THEY DONT BOTHER LEARNING ENGLISH BECAUSE PPL OF EL PASO CATER TO THEM BUT WE AMERICANS GET DISCRIMINATED FOR NOT KNOWING SPANISH.  I CANT GET A JOB IN ALOT OF PLACES BECAUSE IDK SPANISH THATS NOT RIGHT?????? IVE HEARD SOME PPL ARE WORKING IN MALLS THAT DONT KNO ENGLISH IVE NOT SEEN THIS BECAUSE IF/WHEN I DO IM RAISING HELL. PPL NEED TO QUIT CATERING TO THEM. IF THEY MOVE TO HOUSTON OR DALLS THEY LEARN ENGLISH BECAUSE THEY WONT CATER TO THEIR ASSES. THIS IS REALITY. PPL GET PD LESS IN EP BECUZ ILLEGALS HURT OUR ECONOMY.  THEY WORK UNDER TABLE N SEND $$$ TO MEXICO N DONT PAY TAXES. THEY ARE ALL ON STAMPS N MEDICAID N KEEP HAVING ANCHOR BABIES WE TAX PAYERS SUPPORT.   I UNDERSTAND WHAT U R SAYING ABOUT ASYLUM BUT THIS IS HOW ISIS HAS GOTTEN IN USA. YES LAWS NEED REVISED N CHANGED BUT WE AMERICANS NEED TO TAKE CARE OF OUR OWN 1ST. IF WE DONT WHO WILL??? PRESIDENT TRUMP KNOS THINGS WE DO NOT KNO. TRUST HIM??? LISTEN TO HIM???? HES CHANGING ALL PORTS OF ENTRY FROM MEXICO IN TO TX WITH HIGHER TECHNOLOGY ALREADY. WE NEED THE WALL BECUZ DRUGS N ILLEGAL PPL COMING IN WHERE THERE IS NOTHING.....IM JUST SAYING I MEAN NO DISRESPECT.  ILL AGREE TO DISAGREE IM NOT TRYNA ARGUE I STICK TO FACTS N TRUTH.......YOUR HEART IS N RIGHT SPOT BUT AMERICANS 1ST!!!

Kyle Callender UNFORTUNATELY MEXICAN MEN 1 MAN COMES FOR ASYLUM GETS IT. HE BRINGS ALL ILLEGAL FAMILY ACROSS BORDER THEY GO GET FOOD STAMPS MEDICAID ETC.....THEY DONT BOTHER LEARNING ENGLISH BECAUSE PPL OF EL PASO CATER TO THEM BUT WE AMERICANS GET DISCRIMINATED FOR NOT KNOWING SPANISH.  I CANT GET A JOB IN ALOT OF PLACES BECAUSE IDK SPANISH THATS NOT RIGHT?????? IVE HEARD SOME PPL ARE WORKING IN MALLS THAT DONT KNO ENGLISH IVE NOT SEEN THIS BECAUSE IF/WHEN I DO IM RAISING HELL. PPL NEED TO QUIT CATERING TO THEM. IF THEY MOVE TO HOUSTON OR DALLS THEY LEARN ENGLISH BECAUSE THEY WONT CATER TO THEIR ASSES. THIS IS REALITY. PPL GET PD LESS IN EP BECUZ ILLEGALS HURT OUR ECONOMY.  THEY WORK UNDER TABLE N SEND $$$ TO MEXICO N DONT PAY TAXES. THEY ARE ALL ON STAMPS N MEDICAID N KEEP HAVING ANCHOR BABIES WE TAX PAYERS SUPPORT.   I UNDERSTAND WHAT U R SAYING ABOUT ASYLUM BUT THIS IS HOW ISIS HAS GOTTEN IN USA. YES LAWS NEED REVISED N CHANGED BUT WE AMERICANS NEED TO TAKE CARE OF OUR OWN 1ST. IF WE DONT WHO WILL??? PRESIDENT TRUMP KNOS THINGS WE DO NOT KNO. TRUST HIM??? LISTEN TO HIM???? HES CHANGING ALL PORTS OF ENTRY FROM MEXICO IN TO TX WITH HIGHER TECHNOLOGY ALREADY. WE NEED THE WALL BECUZ DRUGS N ILLEGAL PPL COMING IN WHERE THERE IS NOTHING.....IM JUST SAYING I MEAN NO DISRESPECT.  ILL AGREE TO DISAGREE IM NOT TRYNA ARGUE I STICK TO FACTS N TRUTH.......YOUR HEART IS N RIGHT SPOT BUT AMERICANS 1ST!!!

Dave Callender How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Dave Callender Oh that’s real smart it’s not that accident don’t happen to everyone it’s that They had no business being here to cause the accident not having insurance because they are illegal you’re real smart

"Dave Callender When it becomes illegal to be named ""Ann"" fine but it isn't. However

"Edgar D. GutierrezTexas is the only state to track crime specifically among illegal immigrants let's use them as an example:  Between January 2011- January 2019 there have been 10 school shootings in the state of Texas. Of those 10 shootings 15 people have died and 28 have been injured.   Now let's look at crime amongst illegal immigrants in Texas. ""Between June 1

"Edgar D. GutierrezTexas is the only state to track crime specifically among illegal immigrants let's use them as an example:  Between January 2011- January 2019 there have been 10 school shootings in the state of Texas. Of those 10 shootings 15 people have died and 28 have been injured.   Now let's look at crime amongst illegal immigrants in Texas. ""Between June 1

The same thing happened to me from a man that was a US Citizen and serving in the military. The point is these things happen and the people doing so will be legal and illegal at a proportion relative to their portion of the population. Just as my situation does not mean that men in the military are bad your situation does not mean illegals are bad........only that the individuals that perpetrated this on us were bad.

Apple Rivera How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

"My cousin was hit by illegal

Joyce Ames He has a good point..Where are Trumps words for the 5 Americans gunned down yesterday...49 days in 2019 and 39 mass shootings!Not one of them done by an illegal..

Jim Butkowsky that’s just if if that illegal person had not been here her daughter would be alive. #buildthewall

But if that illegal immigrant wouldn't have been here...

Renieri Ortiz there is a huge difference between a legal immigrant and an illegal immigrant.

Renieri Ortiz immigrant does not mean illegal  !!!!

Renieri Ortiz illegal is the word you need to research. ILL LE GULL (that's the pronunciation). Let's stick to the topic.

Sofiane Hamouda I got stitches when an illegal immigrant attacked me.  I'd report.  They can come in the right way

"John N Karen Morris ""Hello Homeland Security. I'd like to report an illegal alien. She lives at 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue

"How do they know immagration has slowed down? Seems to me alot more has gotten away with entering illegally. Because I knew a girl who dated an illegal and he beat her ass in front of her kids

Drunk driving is already illegal. Police are given tools to stop it

Decline or not it's still a problem and it would help continue the decline allowing for focus to be driven elsewhere to further decline illegal immigration.

And it's not just illegal immigration that its being built for.

Daniel Alexander Allen are you mentally defective? We have sovereign countries for a reason. Illegal alien means you are not supposed to be here and don't just get to waltz your way in here.

"Illegal crossing on the southern border has been on the decline in the past 10 years

"James Anderson If you’re thinking that bump stocks and large magazines should not  be illegal

"Robert Dahlquist You did not read the article. Its about how just being an illegal immigrant caused someone to die. Alcohol is mentioned (unknown where it came from)

"Bill Reese unfortunate accidents happen all the time. This story is purely about blaming illegal immigrants. And I will still stand with that is petty. Might as well blame the place that made the beer

Kris Landers that’s just stupid a person that’s not supposed to be in this country it is called a illegal alien that person should not be here to be able to drink to kill a person seems to me you’re not very smart actually the store owners fault also if she did not have a legal ID the store owner should be prosecuted and lose their liquor license to and get a fine but come onHopefully you don’t have that many rocks rolling around in your head

"Kris Landers if a known serial killer was loose in your neighborhood would you lock your doors? An illegal immigrant is a KNOWN criminal

no what is petty it you not understanding that this child wass taken by someone who shouldn't have been here in the first place.  so don't say it is an illegal thing when that is who killed there child.  see if you can get the congress or senate to pass a stiff law for anyone drinking and driving it won't happen cause they are the ones who are doing it all the time and walk away.  don't blame this parent =

"Kris Landers so if the “illegal” was kept out because the “illegal” doesn’t belong here

"Kris Landers so if the “illegal” was kept out because the “illegal” doesn’t belong here

Joseph Roy ...Kris Landers missing the whole point. Plain and simple..this person should not be in this country. What part of illegal does she not understand? End of the day this young ladies life is gone as a result of an illegal immigrants action. Nothing petty about that.

Joseph Roy ...Kris Landers missing the whole point. Plain and simple..this person should not be in this country. What part of illegal does she not understand? End of the day this young ladies life is gone as a result of an illegal immigrants action. Nothing petty about that.

Dave Heffner it’s already illegal to cross the border

Devin Diamond I don’t believe being illegal was the reason they didn’t press charges

Samuel Tan Yuan Han Most illegal immigrants overstay their visas.. How’s a wall gonna address that issue?

It already is addressed as it is illegal to drink and drive.

Laws against drunk driving are already in place and are enforced.  Immigration laws have become relaxed and people try to protect those who come here illegally.  Big difference in how the 2 are addressed.  Did my friend deserve to die when he was walking down the sidewalk and was struck by a female illegal immigrant and thrown 50 feet through the air and spending the next 2 weeks in the hospital before he died. The driver was sober and had no insurance and because of her status as an illegal the state's DA decided not to press charges she lives a happy life in Rockford illinois while an American family weeps.  So how will you defend something like this.  Even more so when the person that killed my friend had no legal right to even be in the country that my friend fought and served for.

Laws against drunk driving are already in place and are enforced.  Immigration laws have become relaxed and people try to protect those who come here illegally.  Big difference in how the 2 are addressed.  Did my friend deserve to die when he was walking down the sidewalk and was struck by a female illegal immigrant and thrown 50 feet through the air and spending the next 2 weeks in the hospital before he died. The driver was sober and had no insurance and because of her status as an illegal the state's DA decided not to press charges she lives a happy life in Rockford illinois while an American family weeps.  So how will you defend something like this.  Even more so when the person that killed my friend had no legal right to even be in the country that my friend fought and served for.

That's because he wasn't a pregnant illegal alien. They can get free Medicaid along with their anchor babies!

Jeanie Railsback sorry about your husband but if he was an illegal he wouldn’t have to have insurance and his health care would be free in California!

The problem is when the immigrant doesn't face any charges because they are here illegally.   My uncle was killed in aurora colorado. He was hit by an illegal alien who was driving drunk without a license. The courts commuted his ENTIRE sentence so that he could be deported. So he is probably in mexico drinking beers with his friends while my aunt and cousins have no father or husband.

An illegal grown man punched my 3 yr old granddaughter in the face.  A different illegals 9 year old daughter sexually assaulted my same granddaughter when she was 5. So I am strongly supporting this wall!

But if that illegal immigrant wouldn't have been here...

An illegal alien driving a loaded simi ass-ended a line of cars stopped at a road repair who were waiting on the pilot car to get through. The older couple in the last car in line was smashed into a pickup. The pickup smashed into the back of a loaded cattle trailer and was deflected into the ditch. The older couples car was then smashed flat between the oncoming simi and the stopped simi and were killed instantly. The truck driver was an illegal and was burned in the crash. He was taken into custody and transported to OKC for treatment. There was never any news of what was done with him but I imagine he was released and hauled ass for Mexico leaving Americans with the medical bills and funeral expenses.

An illegal alien driving a loaded simi ass-ended a line of cars stopped at a road repair who were waiting on the pilot car to get through. The older couple in the last car in line was smashed into a pickup. The pickup smashed into the back of a loaded cattle trailer and was deflected into the ditch. The older couples car was then smashed flat between the oncoming simi and the stopped simi and were killed instantly. The truck driver was an illegal and was burned in the crash. He was taken into custody and transported to OKC for treatment. There was never any news of what was done with him but I imagine he was released and hauled ass for Mexico leaving Americans with the medical bills and funeral expenses.

"If illegal immigrants are so dangerous why does he employ them at all his Trump properties?! The man lies to your face (every single day) and you love him

Young woman from NY was just murdered by an 🚫 illegal her body put in a suitcase and dumped on the side of a road in Connecticut. BUILD THE WALL

Sorry for your loss.  There are many of us who stand behind Trump and the wall.  We must stop the illegal immigrant invasion.

CliffandKim Ferrell don’t you wonder how many of the trolls on this page are actually illegal themselves??

My mom was hit by an illegal immigrant and he tried to drive off. He pulled out in front of her and totaled her car. On another occasion my dad was hit by one going the wrong way and drunk on the highway. Totaled his car and hurt him pretty bad.

"Emily Neal I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

"There has been more than 1 illegal that is responsible for the death of innocent Americans.  And just yesterday there was a fentanyl bust that could be responsible for 4

Charlesetta Brown Illegal entry is criminal.They can go through legal channels!

You people need to believe the experts and not lying Trump.    A Border Wall isn't the answer. Most illegal immigrants overstayed their VISAS or entered through legal points of entry.

Charlesetta Brown please provide the name and address of your loved one for the next death cause by an illegal!!

Charlesetta Brown its waaaaay more than one plus them being here is a crime itself. Hence the name ILLEGAL

"Joseph Nowik which will be declared illegal and unconstitutional

Republicans are murdering exponentially more people by denying the affordable health care and drugs than people being killed by illegal aliens. I'm sure most killings by illegal aliens are domestic or murders of people they know. Illegals aren't running around shooting people for the hell of it. But stupid Trump followers believe what ever the orange toad tells them.

Republicans are murdering exponentially more people by denying the affordable health care and drugs than people being killed by illegal aliens. I'm sure most killings by illegal aliens are domestic or murders of people they know. Illegals aren't running around shooting people for the hell of it. But stupid Trump followers believe what ever the orange toad tells them.

Mike Charles I’m the only one posting facts and figures collected by research organizations.  Please feel free to post the information you guys have backing up your understanding of illegal immigration.  Also I’m not sure how this has anything to do with Republicans or Democrats. This is about what is the most effective tool to deal with illegal immigration and understand the actual statistics put forth by those who study illegal immigration.

Mike Charles I’m the only one posting facts and figures collected by research organizations.  Please feel free to post the information you guys have backing up your understanding of illegal immigration.  Also I’m not sure how this has anything to do with Republicans or Democrats. This is about what is the most effective tool to deal with illegal immigration and understand the actual statistics put forth by those who study illegal immigration.

Mike Charles I’m the only one posting facts and figures collected by research organizations.  Please feel free to post the information you guys have backing up your understanding of illegal immigration.  Also I’m not sure how this has anything to do with Republicans or Democrats. This is about what is the most effective tool to deal with illegal immigration and understand the actual statistics put forth by those who study illegal immigration.

You are disgusting because her life means nothing to you. She and all the others who will be killed by someone who has NO right to be here are the reason we need a wall!! You actually have a higher chance of being affected by an illegal as you are part of the Latino community.

Austin Baker he’s using the death to push for his border wall which he INCLUDES in the headline.   EXCEPT a wall will do nothing for illegal immigration. They overstay their visas or come in with forged documents. The ACTUAL drugs and crime come through vehicles through legal ports of entry.   He’s not asking you to pay for immigration suppression but an entire waste of money that’s more symbolic of America than it is an effective tools

"Angela K Christensen You can’t have national security without border security. It’s not only necessary for any meaningful immigration reform; border security plays a crucial role in both the interdiction of illegal drugs and in defending America against criminal threats. Weak borders allow criminal and smugglers

I guess it means nothing to you that when an illegal commits a murder in this country.......YES that is his focus and it should be.............

Scott Magers how have u been personally affectes by an illegal? just curious

"Angela K Christensen I cannot claim to have lost a loved one due to an illegal immigrant. However

The Mexican drug cartels have a lot of money and they know how to invest it to maximize their illegal profits. During the national discussion in this country about legalizing marijuana it was suspected that a large amount of cartel money went into swaying public opinion away from the legalization.  Is it possible that cartel money is now being used to change public opinion and the politicians opinions on the construction of the border wall between Mexico and the United States? I am just wondering now……

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"It isn't a damned competition you myopic virtue signaling troll! Illegal border jumpers are not supposed to be here

"Asha Artis not American but wouldn’t most of your illegal immigration problems stem from a broken security system? I’m guessing most of them don’t walk over the border but are not caught by the checks in place. Even if they walk over the border why aren’t they rounded up and sent back? Is it possible that there is corruption here

Asha Artis the innocent illegal I guess. Bet you would feel differently if this was your kid. Bet you would be calling for the end of illegal immigration also. https://fox17.com/news/local/undocumented-immigrant-snuck-into-lebanon-home-raped-6-year-old-girl

Asha Artis the innocent illegal I guess. Bet you would feel differently if this was your kid. Bet you would be calling for the end of illegal immigration also. https://fox17.com/news/local/undocumented-immigrant-snuck-into-lebanon-home-raped-6-year-old-girl

An illegal killed my dad years ago..

"whats that have to do with an illegal with no license or insurance...etc...if he weren't  here

"I know if my daughter was murdered by an illegal

Bill Rahbine and what if your daughter was ever to get murdered by a illegal that's in a cartel ? 🤣🤷🏻‍♀ 1 against .. what ? 50 thugs ? ... that wouldn't work out .

"An illegal immigrant hit my car broadside which put me in the hospital with 4 broken bones

Those who oppose a wall are obviously hoping to support illegal activities. Search your soul. The cost is a non-issue and pennies in the dollar compared to the outrageous waste of our government.

My husband and I were in a terrible reck in 2013.An illegal immigrant almost killed me and my husband. He was 17 didn’t have a license was driving someone else’s car. Was going 80 in a 30 miles zone. Before he hit us he passed a car with a family that had 3 little kids in the car. That could had very well killed them Thank god he didn’t and my husband had to be cut out of the car. He was drunk on top of that. Didn’t spend one night in jail. My husband was I c u for 14 days had too have emergency surgery on his neck and back. This is a man that has never had a broken bone in his body or stitches either. Until that night he still isn’t the same till this day. So yes I’m all for the wall 💯percent. We need a president like Trump he is the one that can get the job done.👍🏻👏👊🇺🇸

Was that an illegal immigrant that gunned down five coworkers and wounded five police the other day? The REAL emergency in the United States - gun violence.

"Nancy and Chuck could care less how many are killed as long as they can get the illegal votes and keep the power they wield over the people

"This isn’t about illegal immigration

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

Okay but anyone could've drank a few and got drunk. Illegal or citizen of the u.s

My friend was stabbed 40 times the illegal was just deported to Mexico.  That was his punishment.  And you wonder why I fight for the wall?

"the arrigance of the left in idealizing illegal immigrants as good citizens who just want to fit in and find a better life for their family. i should note

Joan Hamilton it doesn't matter why he was illegal.  The fact that he had no legal right to be here is enough!

"Gail Bailey Adams  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

Kimberly Mansfield  yep by crazy people that have mental health issues!! If their parents lost control what the hell can President Trump do? Most murders are from illegal guns the wall will cut down on that too! People with guns need to lock them up better! Not a lot can be done about crazy people!!

"Kimberly Mansfield compare those killed in mass shooting per year to the number killed by illegal aliens every year.     As for money to help people

"""An illegal immigrant killed someone I love! While 3 people in my community were killed by natural born citizens. But I only care about what directly affects me. So let's focus on the immigrant"".  Conservative logic behind the wall. 🤔"

"Jeff Sterup  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

Seeking asylum is not illegal.

😡she should not have died and wouldn’t have if that Illegal hadn’t of been in our Country.

Jo Sechi We must have a Wall  and we Must Stop illegal immigrants from killing    Us ..

"There are too many innocent people being murdered every day and if you look at it long and hard you can see that it all is happening because there is no border wall to keep illegal immigrants out.  Weather it is from their drugs laced with fentanyl or weapons they brought with them or illegal immigrants who think the laws do not exist or pertain to them.  Build the wall and make them come through legally and catch the drugs and weapons at the port of entry!  We can't take care of our own.  Why are we still taking care of them.  The money it takes to build the wall will be cheaper in the long run from the money we save from Narcon used to save drug attics

"There are too many innocent people being murdered every day and if you look at it long and hard you can see that it all is happening because there is no border wall to keep illegal immigrants out.  Weather it is from their drugs laced with fentanyl or weapons they brought with them or illegal immigrants who think the laws do not exist or pertain to them.  Build the wall and make them come through legally and catch the drugs and weapons at the port of entry!  We can't take care of our own.  Why are we still taking care of them.  The money it takes to build the wall will be cheaper in the long run from the money we save from Narcon used to save drug attics

An illegal  immigrant  almost killed my boyfriend and father in law. Hit them in the back  made them roll 4 times and he ran!! Still got away with it. He was drinking and driving...president Trump build the wall!!!

Kevin Peevey 😂 no... that won't stop natural US citizens from drinking and driving and causing fatal accidents... it's only a news story because he was an illegal immigrant... if it was a white guy it would have been a completely normal occurrence 😄

"Whittley Guidry Garcia  Because a lot of crime is caused by illegal criminals

My sincere sympathy goes to the father who lost his daughter by an illegal immigrant and to the angel mom’s and dads. Our congress men and women need to hear them instead of ignoring them.

People kill people every day. Illegal or not.

Illegal immigrants statistically commit far fewer crimes than Americans. We see through your bullshit scaremongering.

So sorry this got to stop!!!!!  Just one getting killed by illegal is to many ? I feel for you.... Trump 2020

"Well as I understand it the wall is primarily built to stem the rotating flow of 400.000 deportations and illegal entries every year. The berlin wall and the soviet/russian border towards finland required guardtowers

One of the easiest answers is to make sure only citizens can get any government benefits and no illegal will ever be a citizen.

Thank You Mr President for Wanting to Keep Us Safe I know the Democrats Dont care because They will lose Illegal Votes but I know You Care Thank You.

Lost my son in El Paso due to illegal running red light hitting him walking across the street on his'way home from work. It was hit and run til his' girlfriend turned him in

It’s incomprehensible that Americans are actually fighting against keeping illegals out. What part of illegal do they not understand?

Chet Bentley no I think it was an illegal .... 😭😭😭

God is why that illegal existed as he did. So it was god.

"I was working for an employer who had hired illegal immigrants and didn't notify the staff that had been working there. One of the younger a_ _ holes invited me out to his place for a beverage

"I was injured in a car accident caused by an illegal immigrant. 13 years later I still have mobility issues because of it. A couple months before

"An illegal immigrant committed a hit and run on my husband and I while we were riding our motorcycle.  We were left for dead in the middle of a road.  Yes

Just makes me so angry that our government turns a blind eye to american's and kisses the ass of illegal's just for there illegal vote. How can they even say this is a made up. I would never wish this on anybody but they just might have to walk in the shoe's of a family that lost a loved one when it could have been Prevented!.

Was that another illegal in Aurora Illinois?

So this situation is made better by allowing illegal dangerous criminals into our country???

My 4 grandparents came to America legally.  Why can’t they?  My son died from illegal drugs.  Where did the drugs come from?

Not true. 50 people dead so far this year from American citizens shooting each other up. We know what the real emergency is. Most violent crime is not perpetrated by illegal immigrants. Trump just loves to exploit these anecdotal stories when it does happen though.

"If they had barriers for 1900 plus miles of WIDE OPEN territory where illegal border jumpers can just walk in

I have a child. I would support anything that is going to make our society safe for us all. End illegal immigration and build walls. Support Angel moms. MAGA 2020.

"If all illegal immigrants will leave America tomorrow 

Jim Acosta has the gall to  imply/say that the border situation is not a national emergency...........in front of ANGEL MOMS.......this weasel and his fake news pals are colluding with illegal aliens to provide more votes(voter fraud with drivers liscenses that shouldn't be issued to illegals in the first place) for demorats.

Yes democrats killing babies and illegal killing young American

I’m with you brother I lost a daughter also not with an illegal but I know how you feel

Legend sayeth once the great wall is completed all innocent lives taken by illegal immigrants will be resurrected. -Abraham 36:24

"Brian Roy I personally am against abortion and think late term abortion should be illegal

An illegal president killed our country

Steve Ware what’s your point? Every country has bad citizens that do bad things. That’s why we have prisons. That doesn’t mean we want illegal people from other countries that also includes bad people.  We have enough of our own to take care of.

We are spending so much money on illegal immigrants that a wall may not be such a bad idea at first I was pretty much against it but all the drugs are killing g so many people not to mention these immigrants get everything for free using taxpayers dollars yes maybe the money should be spent to help drug addiction or homeless or vets maybe we should have stricter laws for immigrants coming into this country I don’t know if the wall will help but something has to give.  This country was built on immigrants only native Americans are Native American Indians but if u want to come to this country you should have to take the proper steps and come legally. My parents were legal immigrants and they never took any money from the government for help.  I’m hoping that Trump is right and wall will help I just pray for unity and peace in our country

"Haters wouldn’t be hating if there Son or daughter was killed by a illegal immigrant! Securing our borders is a priority! Walls

"Another point of 'illegal' immigration is the impact it has on our economy. I'm a construction general contractor

You didn’t say what illegal or where from

An illegal hit my son with  my Grandson in the car also.The illegal was drunk and did it on purpose to hurt his wife.My son is disabled for ever.YES ----WE NEED THE WALL.The illegal had no insurance or license..

An illegal hit my son with  my Grandson in the car also.The illegal was drunk and did it on purpose to hurt his wife.My son is disabled for ever.YES ----WE NEED THE WALL.The illegal had no insurance or license..

An illegal hit my son with  my Grandson in the car also.The illegal was drunk and did it on purpose to hurt his wife.My son is disabled for ever.YES ----WE NEED THE WALL.The illegal had no insurance or license..

So sorry for your loss it's not right that some one illegal can come into our country and take the lives of our own people!!  This is so wrong!!

According to Jim Acosta the person is “allegedly” an illegal immigrant.

Jason Erhardt a lot of those crimes against immigrants are done by illegal aliens.  Build the wall and enforce our laws

Seems like a lot of stories of illegals killing or other crimes against American citizens. Why don’t we have a “march” of all the victims and family of victims from illegal aliens. I bet it would be quite large.   That needs to be organized.

Another American killed my friend. Is her death any less important than an illegal killing another American?

"4000 Americans died last year at the hands of illegal aliens. That’s an average of 5 a week.  When is enough

"I illegal murder to many 

A border wall won't bring back the dead folks who have been killed by home grown American citizens or by illegal immigrants (who may have come in through an airport).  It is despicable to exploit peoples' personal tragedies for political reasons.

"A illegal shot my 17 year old niece in the face.  If you think it won't happen to you or one of your loved ones

But how did this illegal get in? From Mexico? From the airport? Oversea?

"I've never hired an illegal

Why wait til your loved one is on the list?  Stop illegal immigration

While living in Chandler AZ...I was viciously raped by an illegal immigrant @ knifepoint in my own house after he broke in.😢

How many deaths are attributed to illegal immigrants in the past calendar year? Now compare that to gun violence in this country by our OWN citizens? I’ll wait....

An illegal immigrant was drunk driving and killed NFL linebacker Edwin Jackson. News was mostly silent...

"If you would like to report illegal aliens

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"ABSOLUTELY!!! And brand every illegal half a dozen spots on their body

For those of us impacted by the actions of an illegal we understand the importance of the wall as well as other border security. For those who are against this I would say walk a mile in my shoes but I would never wish that horror onto anyone.

Does anyone not think that the Democrats are corrupt and making money from groups that profit from the illegal immigrants and drug smuggling coming across the border?

"Why do you believe that being killed by an illegal immigrant is somehow worse than being killed by citizen - which happens with far more frequency? In Texas

I propose building a wall in memory of those lost over the past 3 decades due to lack of and ineffective border security. Think of all those lost since 1990 due to terrorist attacks along with all of those killed by illegal criminal aliens. The wall could be similar to that of the Vietnam Veterans Wall and it could travel throughout all 50 states making people aware of the lives lost giving us the opportunity to pay homage to them. Thank you for all you do Mr. President. We are praying for you in all your decisions and endeavors.

Don’t forget the Sheriff that was killed in California by an illegal immigrant which the Governor completely ignores.

A wall will not stop illegal immigration ! If there’s a will there is a way! You think all illegals come from Mexico? You’re so misinformed !

DID THIS ILLEGAL COME THROUGH A PORT OR THROUGH  THE DESERT? I want to know.

Betsy Hammond:How much money do you think could be put towards these issues if not for the billions of dollars spent on illegal immigrants.

Yes people we have several problems in this country mass shootings drugs illegal aliens and so on so forth.  We now have a president who is picking a problem and doing something about it.  Then we can move on to the next thing.   It may not be the fix all but even if it only keeps out half the drugs and illegal's that's a huge victory. Build to wall.

Fact: Those in the Trump administration commit crimes at a higher rate than illegal immigrants.

He's so big on immigration reform yet he employs  so many illegal immigrants and married one then had her parents come over here think about

How did that illegal get here?

🇺🇸🇺🇸 Americans safety 1st! 🇺🇸🇺🇸  Condolences to this family and all the families that have lost a loved one due to heinous actions of illegal immigrants....🙏🏻

If the illegal was caught then kill the illegal.

If the illegal was caught then kill the illegal.

Just remember how el chapo manage to transport so many drugs around the world lol . He even built a tunnel . Won’t stop lol not every criminal is illegal 😂

"Oh I can yes. But if we're an illegal who starts his own business and hires other illegals.... Or if you are a home owner looking for cheap labor because your don't make the most money in the the world. Then you hire a guy of Mexican decent but he speaks good English. Only to find his ""work"" is shabby at best and that that man is not even legally here...."

An illegal killed my son.... build the wall!!!!!!

I bet if that was Pelosi standing there with a picture of her kid that was killed by an illegal I will bet my life the wall would be built

"I’m disabled because an illegal took a short cut across a California highway. Not even deported

Ain’t no damn illegal aliens gonna mess with my family or it will be the last thing they ever do. #DontMessWithMyFamily.

"My moms first husband was gunned down by a illegal machine gun

The news on the left will not report of this. They are full of hate for TRUMP and don't want our country to succeed they care about illegal aliens more than Americans. So sorry for your loss.GOD BLESS YOU !

whats that got to do with legal or illegal immigration?

So sorry for your loss.  Thank you for standing up for the victims of illegal aliens and the families of those victims.

Just came to read the illegal killed my family member comments.🖕🏼

Gregory Baxter More people die from illegal and prescription drugs and medical mistakes than guns in this country. You people really need to get off gun BS cause guess what Guns aren’t going any where. They are in our Constitution. Illegal immigration is NOT.

Gregory Baxter More people die from illegal and prescription drugs and medical mistakes than guns in this country. You people really need to get off gun BS cause guess what Guns aren’t going any where. They are in our Constitution. Illegal immigration is NOT.

"If there are no illegal crossings

4000+ Americans have been killed by illegal immigrants (that we know about)!

A dui. Common man that coulda been anyone. Don’t get all political and bigoted because an illegal drunk driver killed her. Jesus

"So many against the border wall until if affects them. Wake up before it affects you and your family. Illegal immigrants are all over the country

Those who kill on the previous massacres around the country are not illegal immigrants

So very sad. On a avg. 5 Americans are killed on a daily bases  in one way or another by a illegal. AND YET the Democrats still do not give a damn!

An illegal immigrant hit my mother in oncoming traffic on Cinco de mayo... Glad she is still here.no justice for his actions.

"I see illegal immigrants walking working traveling freely in USA

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"I have been rear ended by an illegal immigrant twice

"I'm disabled from a stroke from a head on collision with a drunk illegal

"An illegal immigrant killed my boyfriends sister while driving illegally and driving drunk... this is after he was deported 2 times

"“The president was right to declare our border crisis a national emergency. While the vast majority of illegal immigrants are not violent criminals

A human killed ur daughter it has absolutely nothing to do with wether he was illegal or not.

The left relates to a wall like a marriage therapist talks about a psychological defense mechanism a wall is an inanimate object design to protect life and property! What the heck is wrong with the left they do not know the difference between legal and illegal and now they're talking about a physical wall like an emotional problem God help us.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"By that logic we should ONLY let in violent criminal illegal border jumpers to balance out the scales of justice?! Wow

Look at the stats on how many Americans were killed by guns. It's far higher than illegal immigrants but you won't touch gun control because they fund your campaign. It's always about the money with you.

Illegal immigrants coming here to destroy Americans & turn this country into a 3rd world country with the help and support of UN American Democrats !!

You can not blame EVERY illegal immigrant for your loss...NO WALL

From one incident from one illegal immigrant...stop the rhetoric. How many mass murders have we had that Donald J. Trump has done nothing but send his thoughts and prayers.

An illegal immigrant knocked over a building and killed my brother.  Damn you Superman!!

The Murdering Illegal needs to lose his life.

"There is no difference between an illegal alien & a Democrat.  Their ""kill record"" is sickening!"

What about people who was saved by illegal immigrants. If you decided build the wall believing that you will be safe after this. You are wrong. Yes you have to do something with illegal immigrants but not with this way. Way with hating them. Sorry for my English. And I'm not illegal immigrant 😒

What about people who was saved by illegal immigrants. If you decided build the wall believing that you will be safe after this. You are wrong. Yes you have to do something with illegal immigrants but not with this way. Way with hating them. Sorry for my English. And I'm not illegal immigrant 😒

What about people who was saved by illegal immigrants. If you decided build the wall believing that you will be safe after this. You are wrong. Yes you have to do something with illegal immigrants but not with this way. Way with hating them. Sorry for my English. And I'm not illegal immigrant 😒

"an illegal immigrant killed my brother in law  back in 1968 in his back yard when he had a celebration party for his son's deployement to Vietnam    they hit him in the head with a lead pipe crushing his skul after they were told to leave

No.  Fear mongering is wrong. Smart border security like walls and fencing and technology.  The  majority of illegal immigration and drugs come through ports of entry..

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"Every sanctuary city should be held accountable for these crimes. If it comes to light that an illegal was released instead of reported

Tudy Anderson Latulip a wall will not stop the illegal handouts and instantly relocate that money to vets. A wall will take decades to build and vets should not have to wait.

Illegal immigration is at a 10 year low and there is no extra money going towards vets.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

Right cause illegal immigrants are the only ones who kill people drinking and driving.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"Many illegal immigrants are law abiding people who provide for their families.  Then

Not illegal immigrant. ILLEGAL ALIEN

Not illegal immigrant. ILLEGAL ALIEN

"Hailey King was my 18 year old cousin. She was left in the street to die by an illegal who hit her and her friend on a Scooter. He was doing over 70 MPH in a 35 zone. After he hit them from behind

An illegal killed my cousin husband .

"Did this illegal immigrant even cross the border by ground or did they over stay their Visa or arrive by air or boat? A wall can only possibly stop one way of arrival

BUILD THAT WALL MR. PRESIDENT AND WHEN YOU GET IT DONE YOU CAN THROW GRUESOME NEWSOME OVER ON THE OTHER SIDE OF IT AND LET HIM LIVE WITH HIS ILLEGAL FRIENDS AND BE THEIR GOVERNOR ON THE OTHER SIDE OF CALIFORNIA AND STAY OUT OF OUR STATE.

"An illegal alien (Honduran) kicked-in the door to my house and tried to murder my then-16 yr old son.  https://youtu.be/6h2qwAAge4c  A few years prior to that

....and a white person killed how many innocent people in Las Vegas...how many innocent kids got killed by a white kid while at school..how many innocent people got killed while watching a movie at a movie theater by a white person..how many people got killed while attending church services by a white person..just asking for an illegal immigrant who only comes to do a job a white person doesnt want to do..

NO ONE IS ILLEGAL ON STOLEN LAND! 👌👌

"Timothy McVeigh is not an illegal

Build the wall! The Democrats want open boarders and they obviously don’t care about the Americans getting killed by illegals. Wait until an illegal kills one of their loved ones then see how they feel!

"Sandra Nelson Ask the Chinese: Or the French. Trump wants to ignore the stats saying illegal immigration has been declining for two years

illegal is Illegal.

illegal is Illegal.

The chair for a high ranking democrat. They support illegal has great automotive citizens.

The wicked Democrats don't care about the victims of illegal immigration. They care about power.

"A bigger problem than illegal aliens in this country

Lisa P. Woodruff  Illegal aliens not immigrants

Illegal immigrants killed millions of Native Americans.

What about all the school shootings by Americans? Those just don’t matter? One problem by an illegal immigrant and that’s your excuse?? A lot of worse things happen and they’re not caused by the people you’re blaming. You’re doing more damage to the country. Money doesn’t make you any smarter..

You have forgotten about Las Vegas. It was not illegal. It was a white like you

"I can understand someone feeling this way if their child is killed by an illegal. I would feel the same way.   But let’s look at the numbers.   106

"When Democrats dismiss the fact that illegal immigrants are killing citizens 

Most of Orange County’s non illegal residents are for you president Trump. Newsom is NOT representing us! HELP

"It's not just about drugs and murders. It's about the fact people are coming in illegally. What is so hard to grasp about the word ""ILLEGAL?"""

"Prayers for everyone who have lost loved ones because of illegal aliens. This is absolutely insane. Thankfully

"An illegal killed my nephew

Aren't we all illegal immigrants?

Did Don the Con tell you that this illegal immigrant entered the country thru a legal checkpoint?

Cindy Sak Nowak so you believe that when the government has shootouts with people that refuse to give up their rights because the illegal firearms owners aren't going to obey the law then everything gets better. You are to damn dumb. You say Chicago laws aren't strict enough yet open carry cities are some of he safest in the country.

"If the illegal doesn’t get into this country

"However stats have proven over and over again that citizens commit way more crimes than illegals. I would think many of the illegals that do come here also get their guns here since it's so easy to do so. However I am against illegal immigration but the majority of our mass shootings are caused by white American citizens. President Obama deported more illegals than any other president. It's not the crisis that Trump's conning his base to believe. Stats show immigration from the southern border is the lowest in 50 years. Many of the suspected terrorist that have entered this country

^^^* 'We'; {average American citizen's}... need to bring light to EVERY occurrence of an; 'Illegal Alien' murdering a 'American Citizen'.  And then make sure that the entire World knows.  That 'IT' 'IS' the unequivocally /and/ specifically that 'FAULT' of; 'Nancy Pelosi' / 'Chuck Schumer' /and/ Anyone that did not vote to fund the 'Border Wall'!!!!!! 　 *Through Their neglect... have the Blood of innocent people on Their hands!!!!!!! :'(  *> When will They {Liberal's} be prosecuted for; 'Complicit Neglect in conjunction of a Homicide'!?!?!?! >:(

Illegal immigrants have been killing people in Wales for hundreds of years.

What a crock. Trump said himself he didn’t need to call a national emergency he just did it to attempt to sidestep congress.   Illegal immigrants are less likely to kill than native born Americans.  Drugs come in mainly through regular ports of entry. Illegal crossings are at an all time low. But hey who needs facts and rule of law when living in trumps Orwellian universe full of alternative facts.

What a crock. Trump said himself he didn’t need to call a national emergency he just did it to attempt to sidestep congress.   Illegal immigrants are less likely to kill than native born Americans.  Drugs come in mainly through regular ports of entry. Illegal crossings are at an all time low. But hey who needs facts and rule of law when living in trumps Orwellian universe full of alternative facts.

"Bill Hoeler  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

people in united kingdom just  giving up on British government to do their jobs they care more about   approval ratings and deporting illegal immigrant isn't on the list.

We are spending so much money on illegal immigrants that a wall may not be such a bad idea at first I was pretty much against it but all the drugs are killing g so many people not to mention these immigrants get everything for free using taxpayers dollars yes maybe the money should be spent to help drug addiction or homeless or vets maybe we should have stricter laws for immigrants coming into this country I don’t know if the wall will help but something has to give.  This country was built on immigrants only native Americans are Native American Indians but if u want to come to this country you should have to take the proper steps and come legally. My parents were legal immigrants and they never took any money from the government for help.  I’m hoping that Trump is right and wall will help I just pray for unity and peace in our country

"exactly and enough with this ""undocumented workers"" workers is hardly the word to describe them. ILLEGAL ALIENS is more appropriate and it was used without any problems for years."

"""Illegal Immigrant"" is just a nice way of saying criminal

Damn right ! The democrats are imbeciles ! They care more about an illegal than your daughter ! Truly Sad ! Trump 2020 !

"Laura Anglin Peterson  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

The MSM doesn't report the news any more but years ago the Mexican president released all his criminals from prisons so long as they left the country and went to America.  That explains illegal aliens of Mexico and crime.

I'm sorry for the loss of life due to illegal aliens but how many death from homegrown players deaths from no insurance or drugs to save them America is broke and istead of fixing it we are building a wall

David Proud It IS the point.  Gun Violence is a way BIGGER national emergency than illegal immigration...

How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Was this dude illegal or any of the mass shooters in the past 10 years for that matter? https://chicago.cbslocal.com/2019/02/15/5-dead-in-aurora-workplace-shooting/

And the American gunman with an illegal firearm that slipped through your gun checks kills many. Where’s the outrage!  Nowhere   We want a wall to keep you out of our country

If any sanctuary city lets someone go on bond and they are illegal and end up injuring someone or killing someone they should be held liable.

I agree that illegal immigration is a problem.  Not enough for the wall though.  The bigger threat is all of the homegrown terrorists.  Shouldn't we focus on them first?

Could it be one of the illegal immigrants working on Trump's properties???!!!... Bunch of fucking assholes#impeachthemotherfucker!#americasdumbestpresident!#fuckingmoron!

Illegal immigrants have been a problem for decades.  The National Parks Service and the Border Patrol have been focused on the issue for decades.  It's time to fix this long time problem.

"Austin Wheeler I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

"Illegal European immigrants killed almost all real Americans some hundred years ago. Do you all forget where you come from. That happen in a country where it is more important to learn how to shoot

"You're not gonna sell this illegal move with more of your baseless fear-mongering

The democrats and republicans voting against the wall should all be charged with murder for each person killed by an illegal.  They are responsible for the deaths.

"So this illegal immigrant was arrested in 2017? Wouldn’t it have been better to focus on locking him up instead of locking up the kids in camps? I’m just a simple mind but it seems obvious that this is who should be locked up and not the children. Anyway

So would it have been better if it was an American who killed her? I’m far more worried about a fellow American killing me than an illegal immigrant. Stop trying to highlight every murder by an illegal immigrant to push your agenda!

So would it have been better if it was an American who killed her? I’m far more worried about a fellow American killing me than an illegal immigrant. Stop trying to highlight every murder by an illegal immigrant to push your agenda!

Sad for the loss of your daughter are the loss of anyone’s child to illegal invaders. We are Americans. The president is executing his responsibilities to the constitutional the United States.

Where was the illegal murderer from?  What country?  You know we grow our own criminals in this country.  We’re any of the kids killed inn school shootings?  I believe all of the shooters were born and raised in the United States.

"Democrats want open unsecured borders.  They also want no voter ID.  Democrats also know 8 in 10 legal and illegal immigrants vote for Democrats.   Democrats realized this affect in California elections...and now control that state.  Democrats cannot be trusted

IF YOU KILLED AN ILLEGAL IMMIGRANT THE DEMS WOULD DEMONIZE U

"I am very sorry and I respect everyone who has been hurt by a illegal immigrant but the killing in SandyHook

Not everybody's going to jump on here and say their family member was killed by illegal just to get attention

Many more lives have been killed by American white males in mass shootings than by illegal immigrants. If you would have declared a national emergency on the gun violence we would stand with you because that is a true national emergency.

"No trump is wrong and he can not be trusted to tell the truth any longer. Thousands of Illegal immigrant's cross the boarder at our check points every week right now

If families or mothers are called angel families & angel mothers of those killed by illegal aliens. What are the parents/families/mothers of those killed by American citizens referred to as? If ICE & Border patrol would do their jobs & if American citizens would stop using drugs & if companies would stop hiring illegals (like Trump) we wouldn’t have a problem. Five year olds killed at Sandy Hook & Vegas concert massacre & Parkland. What are these families called? SOL???

Talk about cherry picking. This happened on the day of the declared “national emergency”. Shame that this has so become the norm huh? Guess you guys would be disgusted if an illegal did it? But of course you’re not because this is usually committed by..................🤷🏽‍♂️🤷🏽‍♂️🤷🏽‍♂️ https://abc7chicago.com/amp/aurora-shooting-victims-identified-in-shooting-at-henry-pratt-company;-gunman-also-dead/5141841/

What about the “illegal immigrant” that shot all those people yesterday and ... oh ... this is awkward.  Fun fact: you are far more likely to be murdered by a Trump supporter than by an undocumented immigrant.

"The democrats and whosoever wanna have humanity and pity for these illegal immigrants please post your Name

Statistics show that both legal & illegal immigrants commit less crimes than native born Americans.

In Germany dies people about illegal immigrants too.

"39 mass shootings this year (4 or more people shot) none by illegal immigrants

"Can I asked how they were an illegal resident?? Did they over stayed their vacation visa like majority of the illegal immigrants? Did they travel over by planes or cross over at the port of entry with a granted visa to only visit and return after their purpose? If so

"Can I asked how they were an illegal resident?? Did they over stayed their vacation visa like majority of the illegal immigrants? Did they travel over by planes or cross over at the port of entry with a granted visa to only visit and return after their purpose? If so

Terry G. Taylor if you are an American you will be chosen for the job after they have filled their illegal obligations.  They past really does repeat itself

I'm so sorry to all who have lost a family member because of an illegal!!  We need the WALL!!!

Piper Tunno the shooters are either dead or in prison.  We have criminal citizens who are punished. We don’t need to add illegal criminals from other countries to the ones we already have.

There is no such thing as an illegal immigrant!! They are either an immigrant  !!! Or illegal Allen!!!! An immigrant is someone that has papers work Visa or the American government is aware they are here.  An illegal is someone that jumped the border and is hiding breaking the law.

There is no such thing as an illegal immigrant!! They are either an immigrant  !!! Or illegal Allen!!!! An immigrant is someone that has papers work Visa or the American government is aware they are here.  An illegal is someone that jumped the border and is hiding breaking the law.

There is no such thing as an illegal immigrant!! They are either an immigrant  !!! Or illegal Allen!!!! An immigrant is someone that has papers work Visa or the American government is aware they are here.  An illegal is someone that jumped the border and is hiding breaking the law.

"THE TRUE COST: See the Tragic List of Americans Killed by Illegal Aliens at a New Online Memorial.  Liberal media

How about a news feed where anyone who lost a loved one or had any criminal activity against them by an illegal start posting ...   we need a long run of reports to convince the everyday Americans!

Illegal immigrants are not trying to cross the border.  Migrants are.

Proud of our president he has been the one in only president who has made us promise's and has being true us the people of the United State's he has fault hard to get his promise's done and work's so hard around twenty hour's a day and is not except no pay for his hard work and you show me another president that would do this he is a caring person and he Love's the people of American if he wasn't then he would not try to help us and this is for our protection and to keep all the people that don't care if we live or die and how may president who has took and raised so much money and help our Veterans that has been looked over for many of year's now and they was left with out a home to live in and not the right medical treatment and our men and women in uniforms were over looked also and would let the Illegal come in the United State's and have more then us the people of the United State's would ever be able to get and me live here they should not be able to come over here and get the best of living and get to live in our houses when we have so many homeless people who live here and get no help when they can walk right in or country and have first choice on any thing we got it is pass the time we put a stop to it our people that live here and belong's here should have the choice over the people that don't belong here and they pay them to come over and live here for free and take away from us the American we have more people live's here now then need's to be here.i am proud of our president and I stand up for him and we pray for him daily and we pray for protection of our president and Vice President and all the family's who work in the White House along our president .

Sorry to hear... if the wall is already built and we have illegal immigrants inside of the country that is not the biggest problem because it is easy to find here inside the country and easy to deport...

I got no wall around my home and we leave the key 🔑 in the door 🚪. We’ve never had a break-in and there are no guns - Amazingly in Ireland 🇮🇪 we have little or no guns and no one carries !  Other then with a few Gangs with illegal Guns - who normally only shoot one another - we don’t fear people - or people with GUNS - because there are very seldom seen in #Ireland - no need for WALLS either ????

However the crime rate is lower by illegal immigrants than by legal citizens.

"The biggest problem in America is NOT illegal immigrants

Any crime committed by an illegal immigrant is a crime that could have been avoided if our borders were secure and our immigration laws were enforced.

And who would be the first to blame President Trump if an illegal killed one of their family members because a homicidal immigrant walked across the border without detection because there is no deterent like the wall.  Hypocrisy in the highest form Demwits!!!!

ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS ARE IN 4 WINDS CASINO I SEE THEM WHEN I GO THERE NON USE THERE PLAYER'S CARD  INSERT INTO SLOTS ...

"All celebrities who live in “ walled mansions “ should tear them down and erupt a sign out front that says “ All immigrants ( illegal only ) are welcome to come in

Cathy Rohrer-Mackenrodt  first illegal aliens not immigrants and 2nd even though this sounds crazy it's not illegal to be illegal in our country. It has always been they can only be deported if they commit a felony.

Cathy Rohrer-Mackenrodt  first illegal aliens not immigrants and 2nd even though this sounds crazy it's not illegal to be illegal in our country. It has always been they can only be deported if they commit a felony.

Cathy Rohrer-Mackenrodt  first illegal aliens not immigrants and 2nd even though this sounds crazy it's not illegal to be illegal in our country. It has always been they can only be deported if they commit a felony.

Most of the illegal immigrants have overstayed their visa’s.   How about you start there Mr. President?

The Las Vegas mass killer was an illegal immigrant? The Sandy Hooks mass killer was an illegal immigrant? Crazy and mentally ill people are everywhere amongst us. And at the top of the US government but it doesn't justify the fake demand for that wall

The Las Vegas mass killer was an illegal immigrant? The Sandy Hooks mass killer was an illegal immigrant? Crazy and mentally ill people are everywhere amongst us. And at the top of the US government but it doesn't justify the fake demand for that wall

"Illegal immigrants drive in America without insurance and cause accidents

If there were only ONE person killed by an illegal  immigrant; the (complete) security wall should be built!

its irrelevant whether the murderer was an illegal immigrant or not..

Democrats support 2 things: Obama and illegal immigrants who kill Americans. It’s who they are.

"YOU KNOW WHAT PEOPLE.... THIS BS OF USING ILLEGAL HAS GOT TO STOP.....ILLEGAL IS RHETORIC THAT SEEMS OFFENSIVE TO OTHERS....!!  I'D RATHER WE SAY..UNWANTED

"Benji Smith illegal immigrants is illegal already

"Benji Smith illegal immigrants is illegal already

Illegal immigrant is a Russian that overstayed his visa

"Why do we assume that every illegal immigrant climbed over the wall. I saw their make shift boats washed ashore in Florida one year? Pretty sure they weren't American and are now walking the streets of Florida! As a matter of fact all the hired help at Mar A Lago are illegal! Oh

"Why do we assume that every illegal immigrant climbed over the wall. I saw their make shift boats washed ashore in Florida one year? Pretty sure they weren't American and are now walking the streets of Florida! As a matter of fact all the hired help at Mar A Lago are illegal! Oh

Alejandro Sanchez  are you a illegal ?

Illegal drugs killed my beautiful young grandson. One of 135 that day. Why would you resist a President that wants to spare us from all this? Pray it is never your child Liberal.

An illegal immigrant gave me a blow job once while on vacation in Mexico it was excellent!!!!!!!! She didn’t speak English and I didn’t speak Mexican but she was beautiful and understood American currency. Overall a excellent cleaning lady on my all inclusive vacation

"Kelly Anders hopefully you realize that not all illegal immigrants are brown.  Also

Patty Bertocchini La Puma that is one officer who would be alive if that illegal immigrant wasn't in this country to begin with

"Patty Bertocchini La Puma lying liar. You are 100% wrong. One officer was killed by an illegal immigrant. One. I’m not defending it

Patty Bertocchini La Puma you people just dont get it we dont want the illegal immigrants here period.  I dont care if they kill people or dont if they ride around on your democratic unicorns and spread love lol they dont belong here BUILD A GIANT WALL ha ha not sure why the Democrats are so against securing our boarders oh I know because then they'd have nobody to vote democratic ha ha not sure how you people are going to handle 6 more years of TRUMP

"What most of Trump’s supporters need to understand is that illegal immigrants commit less than 1% of violent crimes in this country. 4 studies have been written

An illegal immigrant killed my friends 16  year old daughter Madison Wells from New Jersey this summer. She was stabbed several times outside in front of her aunt's house she went into the house collapsed on the floor bleeding out her father walked in shortly after her called 911 and she passed away as they were Wheeling her through the emergency room doors

"An illegal immigrant killed one of my friends

"Michael Collins if a 1000 of those stories came out a week would u change your mind??  You dont hear them because they are not allowed to report it was an illegal responsible for traffic fatalities. Where I am we have had 3 cases this week

We also should not give any illegal immigrant any kind of benefits or welfare I think this would turn away a lot of them from coming into the United States.

I live in Florida.  We are FLOODED  with illegal immigrants..its so bad .I got hit from behind  in my car .never had an accident  or ticket I been driving  since I was 16 now I am in my fifties..a illegal immigrant hit me from behind try to take off I chase him.and call the cops he had no license  or insurance..I had to claim the accident  to mine insurance company. They fix my car 4 months later I get a letter I being drop..this was Progressive Insurance Company..I was put in a hat a bozo company I never heard of pick me up I was considered a high risk..all because of an illegal immigrant

I live in Florida.  We are FLOODED  with illegal immigrants..its so bad .I got hit from behind  in my car .never had an accident  or ticket I been driving  since I was 16 now I am in my fifties..a illegal immigrant hit me from behind try to take off I chase him.and call the cops he had no license  or insurance..I had to claim the accident  to mine insurance company. They fix my car 4 months later I get a letter I being drop..this was Progressive Insurance Company..I was put in a hat a bozo company I never heard of pick me up I was considered a high risk..all because of an illegal immigrant

I live in Florida.  We are FLOODED  with illegal immigrants..its so bad .I got hit from behind  in my car .never had an accident  or ticket I been driving  since I was 16 now I am in my fifties..a illegal immigrant hit me from behind try to take off I chase him.and call the cops he had no license  or insurance..I had to claim the accident  to mine insurance company. They fix my car 4 months later I get a letter I being drop..this was Progressive Insurance Company..I was put in a hat a bozo company I never heard of pick me up I was considered a high risk..all because of an illegal immigrant

"I can barely walk because I was tboned by a illegal alien

"My 18 year brother was killed by an illegal immigrant in 2005 who was high on drugs and drunk

I'm so sorry for your loss Mr Ferguson I cannot  imagine  losing my daughter. But  I Iost my cousin on September 11th at the world trade center by terrorists. It's just not Mexicans that are coming here illegally it's other illegals  aswell from other countries. We need the wall built it's a loophole for anyone that wants to come to our country we need all the Mexicans and illegal immigrants to go back to their own country and  if they want to come here they have to do it legally bottom line

How many illegal immigrants committed mass murder or even murder as compared to home grown American men?  Let’s start by throwing you out!

One of sister's best friends was killed by an illegal immigrant.  There were 3 illegals in the car.  The driver never even slowed down at the stop sign on a side highway and was speeding.  He hit her while she was driving the speed limit of 65.  She was life watched but didn't survive long.  The 3 men weren't even injured.  They had no insurance and actually tried to hire an attorney to sue the husband of the woman he killed.  They got out of jail somehow and fled back to Mexico.  I always wonder how long it took them to cross back into the states and how many other crimes they've committed since then.

"My father was also killed by an illegal immigrant on February 17

"For every single American an illegal kills

"We buried my dear friends daughter last year . Illegal and 3rd time drunk driving offender here in California . 3rd time it took Ashleigh’s young life . Thank you Mr President . Now we tax payers are paying for his housing 

"I can’t get over the fact because an illegal took your loved one makes your grief heavier then mine

"20% of illegal immigration comes in through Mexico

Who's going to build a wall to protect all these innocent kids who are being killed at schools or a wall to protect all the innocent people at there work place or a wall to protect all the innocent people who goes to the movies or nite clubs? Because it WASNT AN ILLEGAL IMMIGRANT who killed them!! IT WAS A LEGAL US AMERICAN who killed them innocent lives!!

"I have a friend whose grandson was just struck while riding his bike by an illegal driver who was drunk.  He survived

Yes everyone knows that..has nothing to do with disliking immigrants..it's the ILLEGAL one's..do the proper process and there is no issue at all

One death of any American by an illegal is 100% one too many. It should be ZERO! These Americans should be alive today. Once again Democrats have blood on their hands. If they aren’t murdering full term babies they are leaving us wide open for the taking! Build the Wall! Stop these Democrats and their Anti American Agenda!

This is tragic and I pray for the father & his family.  Spreading hate and fear that all illegal immigrants are dangerous is also disgusting though...

I knew somebody who was killed by an illegal immigrant too. The murderer was from Canada!!! We need a wall for our northern borders too! Keep Canadians out! Build that Wall build that Wall build that Wall!

The politicians in DC are insulated from this.  If Nancy Pelosi or Chuch Schumer child were killed by an illegal.  I wonder what they would think them?

Illegal drugs killed mine 👺🙈🙊🙉Fake media and uncaring Demolition Dems haters of Justice & citizens & security sanctuary for illegals and homeless & criminals 👹👺🤷‍♀️what can we do these fools are evil

Agree...build the damn wall.  One murder from an illegal is one too many.  🇺🇸

Why do Democrats idolize and protect illegal alien killers?

Every single one of you people are of illegal ancestry. None of you are legitimate.

Behind you 100 % illegal. immigrants need to come in the right way . Democrats need to wake up on this issue. And the drugs that are comming in.

The time has come to end illegal immigration

"You see it all most everyday were illegal kills 

"If everyone  wants  to  see  results  start flooding  the  democratic leadership in the Congress and Senate members with e-mails and  phone calls  pointing this out.  Next election  time  reminded  them of  their  complicity in the  deaths  at the hands of  illegal people at the  polls

If the illegal population voted Republican guess how fast an armed electric fence with a mine field would be built........

For every American killed by an illegal alien a Democrats family should pay the price. It's all about bringing it home to these untouchables and balance.

What if we make being an illegal immigrant a capital offence? You have 30 days to buy a ticket and go home.

"These killers ...They are not illegal immigrants

Keep the illegal immigrants out!!

"Disgusting how an illegal immigrant kills a human being and basically gets off scott free and  a friend of mine who was a homeless vet with mental issues and PTSD attempts to kill a guy in California

If we keep giving illegal folks welfare they will keep coming.  Take away the incentives to come the wrong way. Give incentives to those who do it right.

An illegal immigrant cut my lawn we dont need a wall

Charles Landry this is not proof of need for a wall. Illegal immigration happens primarily through Visa overstays and the other issues we have with border security are also largely through ports of entry. This is intended to bolster unthinking response by people who have poor critical thinking skills. It is transparent fear mongering.

An illegal immigrant killed my father in 1991.

"An illegal immigrant killed a friend of mine.  He was driving without a license and ran a stop sign.  My friend on his motorcycle hit the side of the van and was killed instantly.  He had no license

Great. Waste beelions on a wall that the illegal immigrant probably flew over.

And no one has killed an illegal immigrant in the US

Okay why don't you do the same post for white kids killing each other due to your stupid gun laws. Oh because the NRA paid you and you don't want to admit the real threat is guns in the US. Actually look at statistics of crime who commits the crimes sorry but it ain't immigrants or illegals because you don't understand the situations that people come from or why they are illegal. For them its sorry you can't enter this country because the USA decided to destroy your country causing all government bodies and data they held about you to  be destroyed as well a lot of the people that would provide the proper paper work are dead or have fled. So after you risk your life escaping a war torn hell none of you will understand or have any sympathy because we fear everything especially if its different . sorry conservatives but apparently you are more fearful than less conservative minds. Don't worry there's not a illegal hiding in ya cupboard Obama put there. Don't forget Jesus was a refugee

Okay why don't you do the same post for white kids killing each other due to your stupid gun laws. Oh because the NRA paid you and you don't want to admit the real threat is guns in the US. Actually look at statistics of crime who commits the crimes sorry but it ain't immigrants or illegals because you don't understand the situations that people come from or why they are illegal. For them its sorry you can't enter this country because the USA decided to destroy your country causing all government bodies and data they held about you to  be destroyed as well a lot of the people that would provide the proper paper work are dead or have fled. So after you risk your life escaping a war torn hell none of you will understand or have any sympathy because we fear everything especially if its different . sorry conservatives but apparently you are more fearful than less conservative minds. Don't worry there's not a illegal hiding in ya cupboard Obama put there. Don't forget Jesus was a refugee

Ok fucktard because ONLY illegal immigrants kill?!? What about all these Americans Killing Babies!!!

We have enough problems with our own criminals! We don't need illegal criminals to compound the problem

Should have never happened 😡 opposers can say what they want ...but the facts remain- if this illegal wasn’t here she would still be alive! How we spend billions on taxpayer funded abortions but can’t find 5 to build a wall infuriates me!

That’s a tragic case but if we want to stop illegal immigrantion wouldn’t it be smarter to have an effective solution utilizing surveillance (like drones with thermal imaging) instead of a wall that will take forever to build and which the experts say will not be effective?

Would LOVE to see the statistics of how many people died from mass shootings versus being murdered by illegal immigrants.

"An illegal  boy 

Illegal immigrants commit murder so do American citizens. #Donthecon

"I think illegal immigrants are the scourge of all our countries 

round up all the illegal Aliens and detain the ones who allowed them to enter and stay.

Build that wall! An illegal killed my 11 year old nephew also.

An illegal alien who had been deported 7 times killed my best friends ONLY child along with another young girl that night. He simply just snuck back in every time. Can’t help but wonder if it hadn’t been so easy to sneak back in if those poor girls would still be here.

I  was  ın  usa  2006  and  went  to  a  ba r and  speak  some  mexıcans  tehy  tols  me  california  belongs  to  mexıcan  not  Americaan  they  said  we  hate  Americaans  and  şn  war  tehy  killed  us  and  all  my  frinds  used  to  delıver  pızza  and  they  gor  rapped  buy  black  whıte  puoetırco  guys  mexicans and  whıte  americans  and  beated  so  bad  woke  up  8  day  later  some not all imigrants bad some ok but americans treaht immigrants bad if you illegal nad shoud know U.S. has air base allmost evwry country and you have no choıse to say no?.....????

I'm sure if a family member of theirs was raped or tortured or murdered they would be singing a different tune! They're only concern is for their own agenda! They do not care about the American people one iota! It sickens me that innocent lives are destroyed by the illegal actions of these illegal immigrants! I am so sorry to anyone who has been affected by this travesty of justice.

I'm sure if a family member of theirs was raped or tortured or murdered they would be singing a different tune! They're only concern is for their own agenda! They do not care about the American people one iota! It sickens me that innocent lives are destroyed by the illegal actions of these illegal immigrants! I am so sorry to anyone who has been affected by this travesty of justice.

YES BUILD THE WALL NO MORE ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS

Send all illegal aliens back and their anchor babies

An illegal imigrant killed a girl in my home town and forever changed the life of another!

"Why didn't Trump build a wall two years ago when he had a majority in Congress...Because it was not an emergency. Illegal border crossings and apprehensions have been declining for nearly two decades

But all who live in america are illegal immigrants except ppl who have indian roots 😉

Uh I'm sure 1000x more daughters are killed by legal citizens than are killed by illegal immigrants.

And another illegal killed a girl 27yrs of age

The illegal alien was drunk and driving a stolen truck running people off the road. My uncle was coming home from the grocery store. This should never of happened.

An illegal immigrant killed my Uncle. Had been deported twice.

NOT ALL ILLEGAL IMMIRGARNTS ARE THE SAME🤦‍♀️🤦‍♀️

An illegal alien bastard murdered my godson.  May all MS-13 animals rot in hell.  I stand with the President.  BUILD THE WALL...and crime will fall.

Are you fucking kidding me we give illegal immigrants 155million  a year in welfare.

Illegal immigrant saved the life of two police officers in Houston pulling them out of a burning squad car.

Liberals care more for illegal invaders and criminals than Americans.  Thank GOD for President Trump!  MAGA

"This is disgusting abuse of facts. Illegal immigrants have lower crime rates than Americans. To single out specific cases

"Here in Germany we have thousands illegal migrants... Its not nice

KEEP UP THE HARD WORK PROTECTING AMERICAN CITIZENS MR. PRESIDENT!!!  we the people who voted you in office WANT OUR BORDERS PROTECTED... OF COURSE THE LEFT WILL GO AGAINST ANYTHING YOU WORK HARD TO MAKE HAPPEN! #MAGA No family should lose a loved one bc an illegal alien killed their loved one!!!

Every death of an American by an illegal immigrant is on the hands of the Democrats.  The truly sad part is that they don't care.

Should of moved back to Europe. She woulda still been alive. Oh well another illegal European gone.

Illegal immigrant commit a crime: we need a wall kick all of them out White boys shooting up schools: He was a lonely boy he just needed a hug.😐😐😐

The vast majority of illegal immigrants that cross the southern border enter this country do so in cars through ports of entries how is the wall going to stop them?

Some of you are just missing the whole point of the fact illegal means illegal no matter if they are killers or sweet little old ladies...ILLEGAL means they are not supposed to be here without going through the immigration laws and procedures...smh

Some of you are just missing the whole point of the fact illegal means illegal no matter if they are killers or sweet little old ladies...ILLEGAL means they are not supposed to be here without going through the immigration laws and procedures...smh

"The Great Hoax of Open border (ILLEGAL) Immigration Policies will be exposed by history as one of the most evil and corrupt actions by our Capitalist Political Establishment. It benefits those with capital who want to employ cheap labor. Our middle-class and low income disproportionately suffer the ill effects and social burden of this sick self serving policy. That’s assuming all illegal immigrants we welcome here aren’t criminals but just good people appreciative of the opportunity to bare racial and economic discrimination for the many opportunities USA provides. Criminals

"The Great Hoax of Open border (ILLEGAL) Immigration Policies will be exposed by history as one of the most evil and corrupt actions by our Capitalist Political Establishment. It benefits those with capital who want to employ cheap labor. Our middle-class and low income disproportionately suffer the ill effects and social burden of this sick self serving policy. That’s assuming all illegal immigrants we welcome here aren’t criminals but just good people appreciative of the opportunity to bare racial and economic discrimination for the many opportunities USA provides. Criminals

And what about all the illegal immigrants working at your hotel's you're a moron. #donaldtrump

This illegal should be hung !

Okay you got one illegal immigrant against 20 homegrown American terrorists how is the wall going on protect you

"Build the wall and in same time sand all illegal immigrants back where they come from. You will see difference in over economy. Unemployment O

Create an executive order that all democrats have to tear down the walls around their homes and must accommodate illegal immigrants.

my heart go out to you but how did the Illegal immigrants get in the country I bet it was at the point of entrance

"Having illegal immigrants in our country has gone long enough. We’ve lost a lot of good Americans because these dirty/filthy illegal immigrants that wants to damned this great nation of freedom

"Having illegal immigrants in our country has gone long enough. We’ve lost a lot of good Americans because these dirty/filthy illegal immigrants that wants to damned this great nation of freedom

"An illegal from El Salvador murdered my cousin

We need the wall but we need to staff our wall with our military men and woman. If they attempt to cross our boarder we have every right to eliminate that illegal immigrant to extent of power we need to use up to and including death

"Dems seems to forget about all the people affected by illegal immigrants. From murders

So because most shooters are male and white - all white men on round the clock surveillance and barred from ownig weapons then? A white man strangled his whole family here in Colorado and there’s much more problem with American terrorists then illegal ones.

They are illegal aliens

An illegal alien killed my niece.

"They haven't only killed but raped pillaged and plundered their way across America. Sure there are some decent ones. But when a child of illegal parents tell me this is their country and it doesn't belong to me or any American my blood boils. That they have the right to be here. Its their country

2020 Trump & BEYOND. Enough with all the illegal invaders build the wall and send all them back......

Illegal aliens people they are not  immigrants.

"A illegal immigrant killed my friend georgia

"🐷""An illegal immigrant...""😂😂😂👉🐽"

An illegal immigrant killed my 24 year old brother about a mile from his home. My brother was test driving a motorcycle and the illegal immigrant pulled out in front of him(the man was driving unlicensed and illegally) then left my brother to die on the side of the road. So I support the wall 100%!!

An illegal immigrant killed my 24 year old brother about a mile from his home. My brother was test driving a motorcycle and the illegal immigrant pulled out in front of him(the man was driving unlicensed and illegally) then left my brother to die on the side of the road. So I support the wall 100%!!

"So sorry for your loss. These idiots who turn their heads and pretend not to hear or see what is going on because see they haven't had a loved one killed by an illegal are fooling themselves if they think they are going to remain safe if this situation isnt dealt with. I stand with our president

Carl Ostendarpnot asylum illegal immigrants lying to get asylum status deportation is the only solution

"If an emergency can be manufactured over border security when illegal border crossings are near a 20-year low… then it’s a snap to make the case for an emergency over gun deaths

I'm just wondering.....do people live under rocks? How do you not see the damage illegal immigrants do?

Would it only be illegal immigrants that would ransack his house? because no Americans would ever commit a crime 🙄 moron

Alberto Weisz you can’t take your door down but not because of illegal immigrants because of American citizens

Eva Graham How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

"My son was killed by an illegal Mexican immigrant who had already been deported once for DUI. He choose to drive drunk

Lynn Limauro Floyd How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Linda Durbin How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Timothy Kershner that doesn't mean every illegal is now ok. That is the 0000.1% of illegals.

Timothy Kershner good for him  the illegal that murdered my friends child got squat!! Build that wall

"Betsy Hammond We spend $150 billion per year on illegal immigrants welfare. Even if wall only stopped half of it

Dave Callender years ago when I was a child my parents picked up an illegal immigrant he asked if they would be so kind to give him a ride and they did he repaid them by molesting their daughter my sister in the back seat I don't know about you but I don't know any American who would repay kindness behind their backs doing this to their child.

Dave Callender maybe you should have died in that accident then you would have some ground to stand on for your argument like the other family's that have lost family to illegal alien's.  Think man they break the law when coming into our country and break the law after they are here. You go to their country's and break the law. See what happens to you.

Kyle Callender UNFORTUNATELY MEXICAN MEN 1 MAN COMES FOR ASYLUM GETS IT. HE BRINGS ALL ILLEGAL FAMILY ACROSS BORDER THEY GO GET FOOD STAMPS MEDICAID ETC.....THEY DONT BOTHER LEARNING ENGLISH BECAUSE PPL OF EL PASO CATER TO THEM BUT WE AMERICANS GET DISCRIMINATED FOR NOT KNOWING SPANISH.  I CANT GET A JOB IN ALOT OF PLACES BECAUSE IDK SPANISH THATS NOT RIGHT?????? IVE HEARD SOME PPL ARE WORKING IN MALLS THAT DONT KNO ENGLISH IVE NOT SEEN THIS BECAUSE IF/WHEN I DO IM RAISING HELL. PPL NEED TO QUIT CATERING TO THEM. IF THEY MOVE TO HOUSTON OR DALLS THEY LEARN ENGLISH BECAUSE THEY WONT CATER TO THEIR ASSES. THIS IS REALITY. PPL GET PD LESS IN EP BECUZ ILLEGALS HURT OUR ECONOMY.  THEY WORK UNDER TABLE N SEND $$$ TO MEXICO N DONT PAY TAXES. THEY ARE ALL ON STAMPS N MEDICAID N KEEP HAVING ANCHOR BABIES WE TAX PAYERS SUPPORT.   I UNDERSTAND WHAT U R SAYING ABOUT ASYLUM BUT THIS IS HOW ISIS HAS GOTTEN IN USA. YES LAWS NEED REVISED N CHANGED BUT WE AMERICANS NEED TO TAKE CARE OF OUR OWN 1ST. IF WE DONT WHO WILL??? PRESIDENT TRUMP KNOS THINGS WE DO NOT KNO. TRUST HIM??? LISTEN TO HIM???? HES CHANGING ALL PORTS OF ENTRY FROM MEXICO IN TO TX WITH HIGHER TECHNOLOGY ALREADY. WE NEED THE WALL BECUZ DRUGS N ILLEGAL PPL COMING IN WHERE THERE IS NOTHING.....IM JUST SAYING I MEAN NO DISRESPECT.  ILL AGREE TO DISAGREE IM NOT TRYNA ARGUE I STICK TO FACTS N TRUTH.......YOUR HEART IS N RIGHT SPOT BUT AMERICANS 1ST!!!

Kyle Callender UNFORTUNATELY MEXICAN MEN 1 MAN COMES FOR ASYLUM GETS IT. HE BRINGS ALL ILLEGAL FAMILY ACROSS BORDER THEY GO GET FOOD STAMPS MEDICAID ETC.....THEY DONT BOTHER LEARNING ENGLISH BECAUSE PPL OF EL PASO CATER TO THEM BUT WE AMERICANS GET DISCRIMINATED FOR NOT KNOWING SPANISH.  I CANT GET A JOB IN ALOT OF PLACES BECAUSE IDK SPANISH THATS NOT RIGHT?????? IVE HEARD SOME PPL ARE WORKING IN MALLS THAT DONT KNO ENGLISH IVE NOT SEEN THIS BECAUSE IF/WHEN I DO IM RAISING HELL. PPL NEED TO QUIT CATERING TO THEM. IF THEY MOVE TO HOUSTON OR DALLS THEY LEARN ENGLISH BECAUSE THEY WONT CATER TO THEIR ASSES. THIS IS REALITY. PPL GET PD LESS IN EP BECUZ ILLEGALS HURT OUR ECONOMY.  THEY WORK UNDER TABLE N SEND $$$ TO MEXICO N DONT PAY TAXES. THEY ARE ALL ON STAMPS N MEDICAID N KEEP HAVING ANCHOR BABIES WE TAX PAYERS SUPPORT.   I UNDERSTAND WHAT U R SAYING ABOUT ASYLUM BUT THIS IS HOW ISIS HAS GOTTEN IN USA. YES LAWS NEED REVISED N CHANGED BUT WE AMERICANS NEED TO TAKE CARE OF OUR OWN 1ST. IF WE DONT WHO WILL??? PRESIDENT TRUMP KNOS THINGS WE DO NOT KNO. TRUST HIM??? LISTEN TO HIM???? HES CHANGING ALL PORTS OF ENTRY FROM MEXICO IN TO TX WITH HIGHER TECHNOLOGY ALREADY. WE NEED THE WALL BECUZ DRUGS N ILLEGAL PPL COMING IN WHERE THERE IS NOTHING.....IM JUST SAYING I MEAN NO DISRESPECT.  ILL AGREE TO DISAGREE IM NOT TRYNA ARGUE I STICK TO FACTS N TRUTH.......YOUR HEART IS N RIGHT SPOT BUT AMERICANS 1ST!!!

Dave Callender How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Dave Callender Oh that’s real smart it’s not that accident don’t happen to everyone it’s that They had no business being here to cause the accident not having insurance because they are illegal you’re real smart

"Dave Callender When it becomes illegal to be named ""Ann"" fine but it isn't. However

"Edgar D. GutierrezTexas is the only state to track crime specifically among illegal immigrants let's use them as an example:  Between January 2011- January 2019 there have been 10 school shootings in the state of Texas. Of those 10 shootings 15 people have died and 28 have been injured.   Now let's look at crime amongst illegal immigrants in Texas. ""Between June 1

"Edgar D. GutierrezTexas is the only state to track crime specifically among illegal immigrants let's use them as an example:  Between January 2011- January 2019 there have been 10 school shootings in the state of Texas. Of those 10 shootings 15 people have died and 28 have been injured.   Now let's look at crime amongst illegal immigrants in Texas. ""Between June 1

The same thing happened to me from a man that was a US Citizen and serving in the military. The point is these things happen and the people doing so will be legal and illegal at a proportion relative to their portion of the population. Just as my situation does not mean that men in the military are bad your situation does not mean illegals are bad........only that the individuals that perpetrated this on us were bad.

Apple Rivera How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

"My cousin was hit by illegal

Joyce Ames He has a good point..Where are Trumps words for the 5 Americans gunned down yesterday...49 days in 2019 and 39 mass shootings!Not one of them done by an illegal..

Jim Butkowsky that’s just if if that illegal person had not been here her daughter would be alive. #buildthewall

But if that illegal immigrant wouldn't have been here...

Renieri Ortiz there is a huge difference between a legal immigrant and an illegal immigrant.

Renieri Ortiz immigrant does not mean illegal  !!!!

Renieri Ortiz illegal is the word you need to research. ILL LE GULL (that's the pronunciation). Let's stick to the topic.

Sofiane Hamouda I got stitches when an illegal immigrant attacked me.  I'd report.  They can come in the right way

"John N Karen Morris ""Hello Homeland Security. I'd like to report an illegal alien. She lives at 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue

"How do they know immagration has slowed down? Seems to me alot more has gotten away with entering illegally. Because I knew a girl who dated an illegal and he beat her ass in front of her kids

Drunk driving is already illegal. Police are given tools to stop it

Decline or not it's still a problem and it would help continue the decline allowing for focus to be driven elsewhere to further decline illegal immigration.

And it's not just illegal immigration that its being built for.

Daniel Alexander Allen are you mentally defective? We have sovereign countries for a reason. Illegal alien means you are not supposed to be here and don't just get to waltz your way in here.

"Illegal crossing on the southern border has been on the decline in the past 10 years

"James Anderson If you’re thinking that bump stocks and large magazines should not  be illegal

"Robert Dahlquist You did not read the article. Its about how just being an illegal immigrant caused someone to die. Alcohol is mentioned (unknown where it came from)

"Bill Reese unfortunate accidents happen all the time. This story is purely about blaming illegal immigrants. And I will still stand with that is petty. Might as well blame the place that made the beer

Kris Landers that’s just stupid a person that’s not supposed to be in this country it is called a illegal alien that person should not be here to be able to drink to kill a person seems to me you’re not very smart actually the store owners fault also if she did not have a legal ID the store owner should be prosecuted and lose their liquor license to and get a fine but come onHopefully you don’t have that many rocks rolling around in your head

"Kris Landers if a known serial killer was loose in your neighborhood would you lock your doors? An illegal immigrant is a KNOWN criminal

no what is petty it you not understanding that this child wass taken by someone who shouldn't have been here in the first place.  so don't say it is an illegal thing when that is who killed there child.  see if you can get the congress or senate to pass a stiff law for anyone drinking and driving it won't happen cause they are the ones who are doing it all the time and walk away.  don't blame this parent =

"Kris Landers so if the “illegal” was kept out because the “illegal” doesn’t belong here

"Kris Landers so if the “illegal” was kept out because the “illegal” doesn’t belong here

Joseph Roy ...Kris Landers missing the whole point. Plain and simple..this person should not be in this country. What part of illegal does she not understand? End of the day this young ladies life is gone as a result of an illegal immigrants action. Nothing petty about that.

Joseph Roy ...Kris Landers missing the whole point. Plain and simple..this person should not be in this country. What part of illegal does she not understand? End of the day this young ladies life is gone as a result of an illegal immigrants action. Nothing petty about that.

Dave Heffner it’s already illegal to cross the border

Devin Diamond I don’t believe being illegal was the reason they didn’t press charges

Samuel Tan Yuan Han Most illegal immigrants overstay their visas.. How’s a wall gonna address that issue?

It already is addressed as it is illegal to drink and drive.

Laws against drunk driving are already in place and are enforced.  Immigration laws have become relaxed and people try to protect those who come here illegally.  Big difference in how the 2 are addressed.  Did my friend deserve to die when he was walking down the sidewalk and was struck by a female illegal immigrant and thrown 50 feet through the air and spending the next 2 weeks in the hospital before he died. The driver was sober and had no insurance and because of her status as an illegal the state's DA decided not to press charges she lives a happy life in Rockford illinois while an American family weeps.  So how will you defend something like this.  Even more so when the person that killed my friend had no legal right to even be in the country that my friend fought and served for.

Laws against drunk driving are already in place and are enforced.  Immigration laws have become relaxed and people try to protect those who come here illegally.  Big difference in how the 2 are addressed.  Did my friend deserve to die when he was walking down the sidewalk and was struck by a female illegal immigrant and thrown 50 feet through the air and spending the next 2 weeks in the hospital before he died. The driver was sober and had no insurance and because of her status as an illegal the state's DA decided not to press charges she lives a happy life in Rockford illinois while an American family weeps.  So how will you defend something like this.  Even more so when the person that killed my friend had no legal right to even be in the country that my friend fought and served for.

That's because he wasn't a pregnant illegal alien. They can get free Medicaid along with their anchor babies!

Jeanie Railsback sorry about your husband but if he was an illegal he wouldn’t have to have insurance and his health care would be free in California!

The problem is when the immigrant doesn't face any charges because they are here illegally.   My uncle was killed in aurora colorado. He was hit by an illegal alien who was driving drunk without a license. The courts commuted his ENTIRE sentence so that he could be deported. So he is probably in mexico drinking beers with his friends while my aunt and cousins have no father or husband.

An illegal grown man punched my 3 yr old granddaughter in the face.  A different illegals 9 year old daughter sexually assaulted my same granddaughter when she was 5. So I am strongly supporting this wall!

But if that illegal immigrant wouldn't have been here...

An illegal alien driving a loaded simi ass-ended a line of cars stopped at a road repair who were waiting on the pilot car to get through. The older couple in the last car in line was smashed into a pickup. The pickup smashed into the back of a loaded cattle trailer and was deflected into the ditch. The older couples car was then smashed flat between the oncoming simi and the stopped simi and were killed instantly. The truck driver was an illegal and was burned in the crash. He was taken into custody and transported to OKC for treatment. There was never any news of what was done with him but I imagine he was released and hauled ass for Mexico leaving Americans with the medical bills and funeral expenses.

An illegal alien driving a loaded simi ass-ended a line of cars stopped at a road repair who were waiting on the pilot car to get through. The older couple in the last car in line was smashed into a pickup. The pickup smashed into the back of a loaded cattle trailer and was deflected into the ditch. The older couples car was then smashed flat between the oncoming simi and the stopped simi and were killed instantly. The truck driver was an illegal and was burned in the crash. He was taken into custody and transported to OKC for treatment. There was never any news of what was done with him but I imagine he was released and hauled ass for Mexico leaving Americans with the medical bills and funeral expenses.

"If illegal immigrants are so dangerous why does he employ them at all his Trump properties?! The man lies to your face (every single day) and you love him

Young woman from NY was just murdered by an 🚫 illegal her body put in a suitcase and dumped on the side of a road in Connecticut. BUILD THE WALL

Sorry for your loss.  There are many of us who stand behind Trump and the wall.  We must stop the illegal immigrant invasion.

CliffandKim Ferrell don’t you wonder how many of the trolls on this page are actually illegal themselves??

My mom was hit by an illegal immigrant and he tried to drive off. He pulled out in front of her and totaled her car. On another occasion my dad was hit by one going the wrong way and drunk on the highway. Totaled his car and hurt him pretty bad.

"Emily Neal I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

"There has been more than 1 illegal that is responsible for the death of innocent Americans.  And just yesterday there was a fentanyl bust that could be responsible for 4

Charlesetta Brown Illegal entry is criminal.They can go through legal channels!

You people need to believe the experts and not lying Trump.    A Border Wall isn't the answer. Most illegal immigrants overstayed their VISAS or entered through legal points of entry.

Charlesetta Brown please provide the name and address of your loved one for the next death cause by an illegal!!

Charlesetta Brown its waaaaay more than one plus them being here is a crime itself. Hence the name ILLEGAL

"Joseph Nowik which will be declared illegal and unconstitutional

Republicans are murdering exponentially more people by denying the affordable health care and drugs than people being killed by illegal aliens. I'm sure most killings by illegal aliens are domestic or murders of people they know. Illegals aren't running around shooting people for the hell of it. But stupid Trump followers believe what ever the orange toad tells them.

Republicans are murdering exponentially more people by denying the affordable health care and drugs than people being killed by illegal aliens. I'm sure most killings by illegal aliens are domestic or murders of people they know. Illegals aren't running around shooting people for the hell of it. But stupid Trump followers believe what ever the orange toad tells them.

Mike Charles I’m the only one posting facts and figures collected by research organizations.  Please feel free to post the information you guys have backing up your understanding of illegal immigration.  Also I’m not sure how this has anything to do with Republicans or Democrats. This is about what is the most effective tool to deal with illegal immigration and understand the actual statistics put forth by those who study illegal immigration.

Mike Charles I’m the only one posting facts and figures collected by research organizations.  Please feel free to post the information you guys have backing up your understanding of illegal immigration.  Also I’m not sure how this has anything to do with Republicans or Democrats. This is about what is the most effective tool to deal with illegal immigration and understand the actual statistics put forth by those who study illegal immigration.

Mike Charles I’m the only one posting facts and figures collected by research organizations.  Please feel free to post the information you guys have backing up your understanding of illegal immigration.  Also I’m not sure how this has anything to do with Republicans or Democrats. This is about what is the most effective tool to deal with illegal immigration and understand the actual statistics put forth by those who study illegal immigration.

You are disgusting because her life means nothing to you. She and all the others who will be killed by someone who has NO right to be here are the reason we need a wall!! You actually have a higher chance of being affected by an illegal as you are part of the Latino community.

Austin Baker he’s using the death to push for his border wall which he INCLUDES in the headline.   EXCEPT a wall will do nothing for illegal immigration. They overstay their visas or come in with forged documents. The ACTUAL drugs and crime come through vehicles through legal ports of entry.   He’s not asking you to pay for immigration suppression but an entire waste of money that’s more symbolic of America than it is an effective tools

"Angela K Christensen You can’t have national security without border security. It’s not only necessary for any meaningful immigration reform; border security plays a crucial role in both the interdiction of illegal drugs and in defending America against criminal threats. Weak borders allow criminal and smugglers

I guess it means nothing to you that when an illegal commits a murder in this country.......YES that is his focus and it should be.............

Scott Magers how have u been personally affectes by an illegal? just curious

"Angela K Christensen I cannot claim to have lost a loved one due to an illegal immigrant. However

The Mexican drug cartels have a lot of money and they know how to invest it to maximize their illegal profits. During the national discussion in this country about legalizing marijuana it was suspected that a large amount of cartel money went into swaying public opinion away from the legalization.  Is it possible that cartel money is now being used to change public opinion and the politicians opinions on the construction of the border wall between Mexico and the United States? I am just wondering now……

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"It isn't a damned competition you myopic virtue signaling troll! Illegal border jumpers are not supposed to be here

"Asha Artis not American but wouldn’t most of your illegal immigration problems stem from a broken security system? I’m guessing most of them don’t walk over the border but are not caught by the checks in place. Even if they walk over the border why aren’t they rounded up and sent back? Is it possible that there is corruption here

Asha Artis the innocent illegal I guess. Bet you would feel differently if this was your kid. Bet you would be calling for the end of illegal immigration also. https://fox17.com/news/local/undocumented-immigrant-snuck-into-lebanon-home-raped-6-year-old-girl

Asha Artis the innocent illegal I guess. Bet you would feel differently if this was your kid. Bet you would be calling for the end of illegal immigration also. https://fox17.com/news/local/undocumented-immigrant-snuck-into-lebanon-home-raped-6-year-old-girl

An illegal killed my dad years ago..

"whats that have to do with an illegal with no license or insurance...etc...if he weren't  here

"I know if my daughter was murdered by an illegal

Bill Rahbine and what if your daughter was ever to get murdered by a illegal that's in a cartel ? 🤣🤷🏻‍♀ 1 against .. what ? 50 thugs ? ... that wouldn't work out .

"An illegal immigrant hit my car broadside which put me in the hospital with 4 broken bones

Those who oppose a wall are obviously hoping to support illegal activities. Search your soul. The cost is a non-issue and pennies in the dollar compared to the outrageous waste of our government.

My husband and I were in a terrible reck in 2013.An illegal immigrant almost killed me and my husband. He was 17 didn’t have a license was driving someone else’s car. Was going 80 in a 30 miles zone. Before he hit us he passed a car with a family that had 3 little kids in the car. That could had very well killed them Thank god he didn’t and my husband had to be cut out of the car. He was drunk on top of that. Didn’t spend one night in jail. My husband was I c u for 14 days had too have emergency surgery on his neck and back. This is a man that has never had a broken bone in his body or stitches either. Until that night he still isn’t the same till this day. So yes I’m all for the wall 💯percent. We need a president like Trump he is the one that can get the job done.👍🏻👏👊🇺🇸

Was that an illegal immigrant that gunned down five coworkers and wounded five police the other day? The REAL emergency in the United States - gun violence.

"Nancy and Chuck could care less how many are killed as long as they can get the illegal votes and keep the power they wield over the people

"This isn’t about illegal immigration

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

Okay but anyone could've drank a few and got drunk. Illegal or citizen of the u.s

My friend was stabbed 40 times the illegal was just deported to Mexico.  That was his punishment.  And you wonder why I fight for the wall?

"the arrigance of the left in idealizing illegal immigrants as good citizens who just want to fit in and find a better life for their family. i should note

Joan Hamilton it doesn't matter why he was illegal.  The fact that he had no legal right to be here is enough!

"Gail Bailey Adams  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

Kimberly Mansfield  yep by crazy people that have mental health issues!! If their parents lost control what the hell can President Trump do? Most murders are from illegal guns the wall will cut down on that too! People with guns need to lock them up better! Not a lot can be done about crazy people!!

"Kimberly Mansfield compare those killed in mass shooting per year to the number killed by illegal aliens every year.     As for money to help people

"""An illegal immigrant killed someone I love! While 3 people in my community were killed by natural born citizens. But I only care about what directly affects me. So let's focus on the immigrant"".  Conservative logic behind the wall. 🤔"

"Jeff Sterup  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

Seeking asylum is not illegal.

😡she should not have died and wouldn’t have if that Illegal hadn’t of been in our Country.

Jo Sechi We must have a Wall  and we Must Stop illegal immigrants from killing    Us ..

"There are too many innocent people being murdered every day and if you look at it long and hard you can see that it all is happening because there is no border wall to keep illegal immigrants out.  Weather it is from their drugs laced with fentanyl or weapons they brought with them or illegal immigrants who think the laws do not exist or pertain to them.  Build the wall and make them come through legally and catch the drugs and weapons at the port of entry!  We can't take care of our own.  Why are we still taking care of them.  The money it takes to build the wall will be cheaper in the long run from the money we save from Narcon used to save drug attics

"There are too many innocent people being murdered every day and if you look at it long and hard you can see that it all is happening because there is no border wall to keep illegal immigrants out.  Weather it is from their drugs laced with fentanyl or weapons they brought with them or illegal immigrants who think the laws do not exist or pertain to them.  Build the wall and make them come through legally and catch the drugs and weapons at the port of entry!  We can't take care of our own.  Why are we still taking care of them.  The money it takes to build the wall will be cheaper in the long run from the money we save from Narcon used to save drug attics

An illegal  immigrant  almost killed my boyfriend and father in law. Hit them in the back  made them roll 4 times and he ran!! Still got away with it. He was drinking and driving...president Trump build the wall!!!

Kevin Peevey 😂 no... that won't stop natural US citizens from drinking and driving and causing fatal accidents... it's only a news story because he was an illegal immigrant... if it was a white guy it would have been a completely normal occurrence 😄

"Whittley Guidry Garcia  Because a lot of crime is caused by illegal criminals

My sincere sympathy goes to the father who lost his daughter by an illegal immigrant and to the angel mom’s and dads. Our congress men and women need to hear them instead of ignoring them.

People kill people every day. Illegal or not.

Illegal immigrants statistically commit far fewer crimes than Americans. We see through your bullshit scaremongering.

So sorry this got to stop!!!!!  Just one getting killed by illegal is to many ? I feel for you.... Trump 2020

"Well as I understand it the wall is primarily built to stem the rotating flow of 400.000 deportations and illegal entries every year. The berlin wall and the soviet/russian border towards finland required guardtowers

One of the easiest answers is to make sure only citizens can get any government benefits and no illegal will ever be a citizen.

Thank You Mr President for Wanting to Keep Us Safe I know the Democrats Dont care because They will lose Illegal Votes but I know You Care Thank You.

Lost my son in El Paso due to illegal running red light hitting him walking across the street on his'way home from work. It was hit and run til his' girlfriend turned him in

It’s incomprehensible that Americans are actually fighting against keeping illegals out. What part of illegal do they not understand?

Chet Bentley no I think it was an illegal .... 😭😭😭

God is why that illegal existed as he did. So it was god.

"I was working for an employer who had hired illegal immigrants and didn't notify the staff that had been working there. One of the younger a_ _ holes invited me out to his place for a beverage

"I was injured in a car accident caused by an illegal immigrant. 13 years later I still have mobility issues because of it. A couple months before

"An illegal immigrant committed a hit and run on my husband and I while we were riding our motorcycle.  We were left for dead in the middle of a road.  Yes

Just makes me so angry that our government turns a blind eye to american's and kisses the ass of illegal's just for there illegal vote. How can they even say this is a made up. I would never wish this on anybody but they just might have to walk in the shoe's of a family that lost a loved one when it could have been Prevented!.

Was that another illegal in Aurora Illinois?

So this situation is made better by allowing illegal dangerous criminals into our country???

My 4 grandparents came to America legally.  Why can’t they?  My son died from illegal drugs.  Where did the drugs come from?

Not true. 50 people dead so far this year from American citizens shooting each other up. We know what the real emergency is. Most violent crime is not perpetrated by illegal immigrants. Trump just loves to exploit these anecdotal stories when it does happen though.

"If they had barriers for 1900 plus miles of WIDE OPEN territory where illegal border jumpers can just walk in

I have a child. I would support anything that is going to make our society safe for us all. End illegal immigration and build walls. Support Angel moms. MAGA 2020.

"If all illegal immigrants will leave America tomorrow 

Jim Acosta has the gall to  imply/say that the border situation is not a national emergency...........in front of ANGEL MOMS.......this weasel and his fake news pals are colluding with illegal aliens to provide more votes(voter fraud with drivers liscenses that shouldn't be issued to illegals in the first place) for demorats.

Yes democrats killing babies and illegal killing young American

I’m with you brother I lost a daughter also not with an illegal but I know how you feel

Legend sayeth once the great wall is completed all innocent lives taken by illegal immigrants will be resurrected. -Abraham 36:24

"Brian Roy I personally am against abortion and think late term abortion should be illegal

An illegal president killed our country

Steve Ware what’s your point? Every country has bad citizens that do bad things. That’s why we have prisons. That doesn’t mean we want illegal people from other countries that also includes bad people.  We have enough of our own to take care of.

We are spending so much money on illegal immigrants that a wall may not be such a bad idea at first I was pretty much against it but all the drugs are killing g so many people not to mention these immigrants get everything for free using taxpayers dollars yes maybe the money should be spent to help drug addiction or homeless or vets maybe we should have stricter laws for immigrants coming into this country I don’t know if the wall will help but something has to give.  This country was built on immigrants only native Americans are Native American Indians but if u want to come to this country you should have to take the proper steps and come legally. My parents were legal immigrants and they never took any money from the government for help.  I’m hoping that Trump is right and wall will help I just pray for unity and peace in our country

"Haters wouldn’t be hating if there Son or daughter was killed by a illegal immigrant! Securing our borders is a priority! Walls

"Another point of 'illegal' immigration is the impact it has on our economy. I'm a construction general contractor

You didn’t say what illegal or where from

An illegal hit my son with  my Grandson in the car also.The illegal was drunk and did it on purpose to hurt his wife.My son is disabled for ever.YES ----WE NEED THE WALL.The illegal had no insurance or license..

An illegal hit my son with  my Grandson in the car also.The illegal was drunk and did it on purpose to hurt his wife.My son is disabled for ever.YES ----WE NEED THE WALL.The illegal had no insurance or license..

An illegal hit my son with  my Grandson in the car also.The illegal was drunk and did it on purpose to hurt his wife.My son is disabled for ever.YES ----WE NEED THE WALL.The illegal had no insurance or license..

So sorry for your loss it's not right that some one illegal can come into our country and take the lives of our own people!!  This is so wrong!!

According to Jim Acosta the person is “allegedly” an illegal immigrant.

Jason Erhardt a lot of those crimes against immigrants are done by illegal aliens.  Build the wall and enforce our laws

Seems like a lot of stories of illegals killing or other crimes against American citizens. Why don’t we have a “march” of all the victims and family of victims from illegal aliens. I bet it would be quite large.   That needs to be organized.

Another American killed my friend. Is her death any less important than an illegal killing another American?

"4000 Americans died last year at the hands of illegal aliens. That’s an average of 5 a week.  When is enough

"I illegal murder to many 

A border wall won't bring back the dead folks who have been killed by home grown American citizens or by illegal immigrants (who may have come in through an airport).  It is despicable to exploit peoples' personal tragedies for political reasons.

"A illegal shot my 17 year old niece in the face.  If you think it won't happen to you or one of your loved ones

But how did this illegal get in? From Mexico? From the airport? Oversea?

"I've never hired an illegal

Why wait til your loved one is on the list?  Stop illegal immigration

While living in Chandler AZ...I was viciously raped by an illegal immigrant @ knifepoint in my own house after he broke in.😢

How many deaths are attributed to illegal immigrants in the past calendar year? Now compare that to gun violence in this country by our OWN citizens? I’ll wait....

An illegal immigrant was drunk driving and killed NFL linebacker Edwin Jackson. News was mostly silent...

"If you would like to report illegal aliens

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"ABSOLUTELY!!! And brand every illegal half a dozen spots on their body

For those of us impacted by the actions of an illegal we understand the importance of the wall as well as other border security. For those who are against this I would say walk a mile in my shoes but I would never wish that horror onto anyone.

Does anyone not think that the Democrats are corrupt and making money from groups that profit from the illegal immigrants and drug smuggling coming across the border?

"Why do you believe that being killed by an illegal immigrant is somehow worse than being killed by citizen - which happens with far more frequency? In Texas

I propose building a wall in memory of those lost over the past 3 decades due to lack of and ineffective border security. Think of all those lost since 1990 due to terrorist attacks along with all of those killed by illegal criminal aliens. The wall could be similar to that of the Vietnam Veterans Wall and it could travel throughout all 50 states making people aware of the lives lost giving us the opportunity to pay homage to them. Thank you for all you do Mr. President. We are praying for you in all your decisions and endeavors.

Don’t forget the Sheriff that was killed in California by an illegal immigrant which the Governor completely ignores.

A wall will not stop illegal immigration ! If there’s a will there is a way! You think all illegals come from Mexico? You’re so misinformed !

DID THIS ILLEGAL COME THROUGH A PORT OR THROUGH  THE DESERT? I want to know.

Betsy Hammond:How much money do you think could be put towards these issues if not for the billions of dollars spent on illegal immigrants.

Yes people we have several problems in this country mass shootings drugs illegal aliens and so on so forth.  We now have a president who is picking a problem and doing something about it.  Then we can move on to the next thing.   It may not be the fix all but even if it only keeps out half the drugs and illegal's that's a huge victory. Build to wall.

Fact: Those in the Trump administration commit crimes at a higher rate than illegal immigrants.

He's so big on immigration reform yet he employs  so many illegal immigrants and married one then had her parents come over here think about

How did that illegal get here?

🇺🇸🇺🇸 Americans safety 1st! 🇺🇸🇺🇸  Condolences to this family and all the families that have lost a loved one due to heinous actions of illegal immigrants....🙏🏻

If the illegal was caught then kill the illegal.

If the illegal was caught then kill the illegal.

Just remember how el chapo manage to transport so many drugs around the world lol . He even built a tunnel . Won’t stop lol not every criminal is illegal 😂

"Oh I can yes. But if we're an illegal who starts his own business and hires other illegals.... Or if you are a home owner looking for cheap labor because your don't make the most money in the the world. Then you hire a guy of Mexican decent but he speaks good English. Only to find his ""work"" is shabby at best and that that man is not even legally here...."

An illegal killed my son.... build the wall!!!!!!

I bet if that was Pelosi standing there with a picture of her kid that was killed by an illegal I will bet my life the wall would be built

"I’m disabled because an illegal took a short cut across a California highway. Not even deported

Ain’t no damn illegal aliens gonna mess with my family or it will be the last thing they ever do. #DontMessWithMyFamily.

"My moms first husband was gunned down by a illegal machine gun

The news on the left will not report of this. They are full of hate for TRUMP and don't want our country to succeed they care about illegal aliens more than Americans. So sorry for your loss.GOD BLESS YOU !

whats that got to do with legal or illegal immigration?

So sorry for your loss.  Thank you for standing up for the victims of illegal aliens and the families of those victims.

Just came to read the illegal killed my family member comments.🖕🏼

Gregory Baxter More people die from illegal and prescription drugs and medical mistakes than guns in this country. You people really need to get off gun BS cause guess what Guns aren’t going any where. They are in our Constitution. Illegal immigration is NOT.

Gregory Baxter More people die from illegal and prescription drugs and medical mistakes than guns in this country. You people really need to get off gun BS cause guess what Guns aren’t going any where. They are in our Constitution. Illegal immigration is NOT.

"If there are no illegal crossings

4000+ Americans have been killed by illegal immigrants (that we know about)!

A dui. Common man that coulda been anyone. Don’t get all political and bigoted because an illegal drunk driver killed her. Jesus

"So many against the border wall until if affects them. Wake up before it affects you and your family. Illegal immigrants are all over the country

Those who kill on the previous massacres around the country are not illegal immigrants

So very sad. On a avg. 5 Americans are killed on a daily bases  in one way or another by a illegal. AND YET the Democrats still do not give a damn!

An illegal immigrant hit my mother in oncoming traffic on Cinco de mayo... Glad she is still here.no justice for his actions.

"I see illegal immigrants walking working traveling freely in USA

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"I have been rear ended by an illegal immigrant twice

"I'm disabled from a stroke from a head on collision with a drunk illegal

"An illegal immigrant killed my boyfriends sister while driving illegally and driving drunk... this is after he was deported 2 times

"“The president was right to declare our border crisis a national emergency. While the vast majority of illegal immigrants are not violent criminals

A human killed ur daughter it has absolutely nothing to do with wether he was illegal or not.

The left relates to a wall like a marriage therapist talks about a psychological defense mechanism a wall is an inanimate object design to protect life and property! What the heck is wrong with the left they do not know the difference between legal and illegal and now they're talking about a physical wall like an emotional problem God help us.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"By that logic we should ONLY let in violent criminal illegal border jumpers to balance out the scales of justice?! Wow

Look at the stats on how many Americans were killed by guns. It's far higher than illegal immigrants but you won't touch gun control because they fund your campaign. It's always about the money with you.

Illegal immigrants coming here to destroy Americans & turn this country into a 3rd world country with the help and support of UN American Democrats !!

You can not blame EVERY illegal immigrant for your loss...NO WALL

From one incident from one illegal immigrant...stop the rhetoric. How many mass murders have we had that Donald J. Trump has done nothing but send his thoughts and prayers.

An illegal immigrant knocked over a building and killed my brother.  Damn you Superman!!

The Murdering Illegal needs to lose his life.

"There is no difference between an illegal alien & a Democrat.  Their ""kill record"" is sickening!"

What about people who was saved by illegal immigrants. If you decided build the wall believing that you will be safe after this. You are wrong. Yes you have to do something with illegal immigrants but not with this way. Way with hating them. Sorry for my English. And I'm not illegal immigrant 😒

What about people who was saved by illegal immigrants. If you decided build the wall believing that you will be safe after this. You are wrong. Yes you have to do something with illegal immigrants but not with this way. Way with hating them. Sorry for my English. And I'm not illegal immigrant 😒

What about people who was saved by illegal immigrants. If you decided build the wall believing that you will be safe after this. You are wrong. Yes you have to do something with illegal immigrants but not with this way. Way with hating them. Sorry for my English. And I'm not illegal immigrant 😒

"an illegal immigrant killed my brother in law  back in 1968 in his back yard when he had a celebration party for his son's deployement to Vietnam    they hit him in the head with a lead pipe crushing his skul after they were told to leave

No.  Fear mongering is wrong. Smart border security like walls and fencing and technology.  The  majority of illegal immigration and drugs come through ports of entry..

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"Every sanctuary city should be held accountable for these crimes. If it comes to light that an illegal was released instead of reported

Tudy Anderson Latulip a wall will not stop the illegal handouts and instantly relocate that money to vets. A wall will take decades to build and vets should not have to wait.

Illegal immigration is at a 10 year low and there is no extra money going towards vets.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

Right cause illegal immigrants are the only ones who kill people drinking and driving.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"Many illegal immigrants are law abiding people who provide for their families.  Then

Not illegal immigrant. ILLEGAL ALIEN

Not illegal immigrant. ILLEGAL ALIEN

"Hailey King was my 18 year old cousin. She was left in the street to die by an illegal who hit her and her friend on a Scooter. He was doing over 70 MPH in a 35 zone. After he hit them from behind

An illegal killed my cousin husband .

"Did this illegal immigrant even cross the border by ground or did they over stay their Visa or arrive by air or boat? A wall can only possibly stop one way of arrival

BUILD THAT WALL MR. PRESIDENT AND WHEN YOU GET IT DONE YOU CAN THROW GRUESOME NEWSOME OVER ON THE OTHER SIDE OF IT AND LET HIM LIVE WITH HIS ILLEGAL FRIENDS AND BE THEIR GOVERNOR ON THE OTHER SIDE OF CALIFORNIA AND STAY OUT OF OUR STATE.

"An illegal alien (Honduran) kicked-in the door to my house and tried to murder my then-16 yr old son.  https://youtu.be/6h2qwAAge4c  A few years prior to that

....and a white person killed how many innocent people in Las Vegas...how many innocent kids got killed by a white kid while at school..how many innocent people got killed while watching a movie at a movie theater by a white person..how many people got killed while attending church services by a white person..just asking for an illegal immigrant who only comes to do a job a white person doesnt want to do..

NO ONE IS ILLEGAL ON STOLEN LAND! 👌👌

"Timothy McVeigh is not an illegal

Build the wall! The Democrats want open boarders and they obviously don’t care about the Americans getting killed by illegals. Wait until an illegal kills one of their loved ones then see how they feel!

"Sandra Nelson Ask the Chinese: Or the French. Trump wants to ignore the stats saying illegal immigration has been declining for two years

illegal is Illegal.

illegal is Illegal.

The chair for a high ranking democrat. They support illegal has great automotive citizens.

The wicked Democrats don't care about the victims of illegal immigration. They care about power.

"A bigger problem than illegal aliens in this country

Lisa P. Woodruff  Illegal aliens not immigrants

Illegal immigrants killed millions of Native Americans.

What about all the school shootings by Americans? Those just don’t matter? One problem by an illegal immigrant and that’s your excuse?? A lot of worse things happen and they’re not caused by the people you’re blaming. You’re doing more damage to the country. Money doesn’t make you any smarter..

You have forgotten about Las Vegas. It was not illegal. It was a white like you

"I can understand someone feeling this way if their child is killed by an illegal. I would feel the same way.   But let’s look at the numbers.   106

"When Democrats dismiss the fact that illegal immigrants are killing citizens 

Most of Orange County’s non illegal residents are for you president Trump. Newsom is NOT representing us! HELP

"It's not just about drugs and murders. It's about the fact people are coming in illegally. What is so hard to grasp about the word ""ILLEGAL?"""

"Prayers for everyone who have lost loved ones because of illegal aliens. This is absolutely insane. Thankfully

"An illegal killed my nephew

Aren't we all illegal immigrants?

Did Don the Con tell you that this illegal immigrant entered the country thru a legal checkpoint?

Cindy Sak Nowak so you believe that when the government has shootouts with people that refuse to give up their rights because the illegal firearms owners aren't going to obey the law then everything gets better. You are to damn dumb. You say Chicago laws aren't strict enough yet open carry cities are some of he safest in the country.

"If the illegal doesn’t get into this country

"However stats have proven over and over again that citizens commit way more crimes than illegals. I would think many of the illegals that do come here also get their guns here since it's so easy to do so. However I am against illegal immigration but the majority of our mass shootings are caused by white American citizens. President Obama deported more illegals than any other president. It's not the crisis that Trump's conning his base to believe. Stats show immigration from the southern border is the lowest in 50 years. Many of the suspected terrorist that have entered this country

^^^* 'We'; {average American citizen's}... need to bring light to EVERY occurrence of an; 'Illegal Alien' murdering a 'American Citizen'.  And then make sure that the entire World knows.  That 'IT' 'IS' the unequivocally /and/ specifically that 'FAULT' of; 'Nancy Pelosi' / 'Chuck Schumer' /and/ Anyone that did not vote to fund the 'Border Wall'!!!!!! 　 *Through Their neglect... have the Blood of innocent people on Their hands!!!!!!! :'(  *> When will They {Liberal's} be prosecuted for; 'Complicit Neglect in conjunction of a Homicide'!?!?!?! >:(

Illegal immigrants have been killing people in Wales for hundreds of years.

What a crock. Trump said himself he didn’t need to call a national emergency he just did it to attempt to sidestep congress.   Illegal immigrants are less likely to kill than native born Americans.  Drugs come in mainly through regular ports of entry. Illegal crossings are at an all time low. But hey who needs facts and rule of law when living in trumps Orwellian universe full of alternative facts.

What a crock. Trump said himself he didn’t need to call a national emergency he just did it to attempt to sidestep congress.   Illegal immigrants are less likely to kill than native born Americans.  Drugs come in mainly through regular ports of entry. Illegal crossings are at an all time low. But hey who needs facts and rule of law when living in trumps Orwellian universe full of alternative facts.

"Bill Hoeler  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

people in united kingdom just  giving up on British government to do their jobs they care more about   approval ratings and deporting illegal immigrant isn't on the list.

We are spending so much money on illegal immigrants that a wall may not be such a bad idea at first I was pretty much against it but all the drugs are killing g so many people not to mention these immigrants get everything for free using taxpayers dollars yes maybe the money should be spent to help drug addiction or homeless or vets maybe we should have stricter laws for immigrants coming into this country I don’t know if the wall will help but something has to give.  This country was built on immigrants only native Americans are Native American Indians but if u want to come to this country you should have to take the proper steps and come legally. My parents were legal immigrants and they never took any money from the government for help.  I’m hoping that Trump is right and wall will help I just pray for unity and peace in our country

"exactly and enough with this ""undocumented workers"" workers is hardly the word to describe them. ILLEGAL ALIENS is more appropriate and it was used without any problems for years."

"""Illegal Immigrant"" is just a nice way of saying criminal

Damn right ! The democrats are imbeciles ! They care more about an illegal than your daughter ! Truly Sad ! Trump 2020 !

"Laura Anglin Peterson  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

The MSM doesn't report the news any more but years ago the Mexican president released all his criminals from prisons so long as they left the country and went to America.  That explains illegal aliens of Mexico and crime.

I'm sorry for the loss of life due to illegal aliens but how many death from homegrown players deaths from no insurance or drugs to save them America is broke and istead of fixing it we are building a wall

David Proud It IS the point.  Gun Violence is a way BIGGER national emergency than illegal immigration...

How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Was this dude illegal or any of the mass shooters in the past 10 years for that matter? https://chicago.cbslocal.com/2019/02/15/5-dead-in-aurora-workplace-shooting/

And the American gunman with an illegal firearm that slipped through your gun checks kills many. Where’s the outrage!  Nowhere   We want a wall to keep you out of our country

If any sanctuary city lets someone go on bond and they are illegal and end up injuring someone or killing someone they should be held liable.

I agree that illegal immigration is a problem.  Not enough for the wall though.  The bigger threat is all of the homegrown terrorists.  Shouldn't we focus on them first?

Could it be one of the illegal immigrants working on Trump's properties???!!!... Bunch of fucking assholes#impeachthemotherfucker!#americasdumbestpresident!#fuckingmoron!

Illegal immigrants have been a problem for decades.  The National Parks Service and the Border Patrol have been focused on the issue for decades.  It's time to fix this long time problem.

"Austin Wheeler I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

"Illegal European immigrants killed almost all real Americans some hundred years ago. Do you all forget where you come from. That happen in a country where it is more important to learn how to shoot

"You're not gonna sell this illegal move with more of your baseless fear-mongering

The democrats and republicans voting against the wall should all be charged with murder for each person killed by an illegal.  They are responsible for the deaths.

"So this illegal immigrant was arrested in 2017? Wouldn’t it have been better to focus on locking him up instead of locking up the kids in camps? I’m just a simple mind but it seems obvious that this is who should be locked up and not the children. Anyway

So would it have been better if it was an American who killed her? I’m far more worried about a fellow American killing me than an illegal immigrant. Stop trying to highlight every murder by an illegal immigrant to push your agenda!

So would it have been better if it was an American who killed her? I’m far more worried about a fellow American killing me than an illegal immigrant. Stop trying to highlight every murder by an illegal immigrant to push your agenda!

Sad for the loss of your daughter are the loss of anyone’s child to illegal invaders. We are Americans. The president is executing his responsibilities to the constitutional the United States.

Where was the illegal murderer from?  What country?  You know we grow our own criminals in this country.  We’re any of the kids killed inn school shootings?  I believe all of the shooters were born and raised in the United States.

"Democrats want open unsecured borders.  They also want no voter ID.  Democrats also know 8 in 10 legal and illegal immigrants vote for Democrats.   Democrats realized this affect in California elections...and now control that state.  Democrats cannot be trusted

IF YOU KILLED AN ILLEGAL IMMIGRANT THE DEMS WOULD DEMONIZE U

"I am very sorry and I respect everyone who has been hurt by a illegal immigrant but the killing in SandyHook

Not everybody's going to jump on here and say their family member was killed by illegal just to get attention

Carl Ostendarpnot asylum illegal immigrants lying to get asylum status deportation is the only solution

"If an emergency can be manufactured over border security when illegal border crossings are near a 20-year low… then it’s a snap to make the case for an emergency over gun deaths

I'm just wondering.....do people live under rocks? How do you not see the damage illegal immigrants do?

An illegal grown man punched my 3 yr old granddaughter in the face.  A different illegals 9 year old daughter sexually assaulted my same granddaughter when she was 5. So I am strongly supporting this wall!

"An illegal immigrant hit my car broadside which put me in the hospital with 4 broken bones

My husband and I were in a terrible reck in 2013.An illegal immigrant almost killed me and my husband. He was 17 didn’t have a license was driving someone else’s car. Was going 80 in a 30 miles zone. Before he hit us he passed a car with a family that had 3 little kids in the car. That could had very well killed them Thank god he didn’t and my husband had to be cut out of the car. He was drunk on top of that. Didn’t spend one night in jail. My husband was I c u for 14 days had too have emergency surgery on his neck and back. This is a man that has never had a broken bone in his body or stitches either. Until that night he still isn’t the same till this day. So yes I’m all for the wall 💯percent. We need a president like Trump he is the one that can get the job done.👍🏻👏👊🇺🇸

"Nancy and Chuck could care less how many are killed as long as they can get the illegal votes and keep the power they wield over the people

"This isn’t about illegal immigration

Okay but anyone could've drank a few and got drunk. Illegal or citizen of the u.s

My friend was stabbed 40 times the illegal was just deported to Mexico.  That was his punishment.  And you wonder why I fight for the wall?

"the arrigance of the left in idealizing illegal immigrants as good citizens who just want to fit in and find a better life for their family. i should note

An illegal  immigrant  almost killed my boyfriend and father in law. Hit them in the back  made them roll 4 times and he ran!! Still got away with it. He was drinking and driving...president Trump build the wall!!!

My sincere sympathy goes to the father who lost his daughter by an illegal immigrant and to the angel mom’s and dads. Our congress men and women need to hear them instead of ignoring them.

People kill people every day. Illegal or not.

So sorry this got to stop!!!!!  Just one getting killed by illegal is to many ? I feel for you.... Trump 2020

One of the easiest answers is to make sure only citizens can get any government benefits and no illegal will ever be a citizen.

Thank You Mr President for Wanting to Keep Us Safe I know the Democrats Dont care because They will lose Illegal Votes but I know You Care Thank You.

Lost my son in El Paso due to illegal running red light hitting him walking across the street on his'way home from work. It was hit and run til his' girlfriend turned him in

It’s incomprehensible that Americans are actually fighting against keeping illegals out. What part of illegal do they not understand?

"An illegal immigrant committed a hit and run on my husband and I while we were riding our motorcycle.  We were left for dead in the middle of a road.  Yes

Just makes me so angry that our government turns a blind eye to american's and kisses the ass of illegal's just for there illegal vote. How can they even say this is a made up. I would never wish this on anybody but they just might have to walk in the shoe's of a family that lost a loved one when it could have been Prevented!.

Was that another illegal in Aurora Illinois?

My 4 grandparents came to America legally.  Why can’t they?  My son died from illegal drugs.  Where did the drugs come from?

I have a child. I would support anything that is going to make our society safe for us all. End illegal immigration and build walls. Support Angel moms. MAGA 2020.

"If all illegal immigrants will leave America tomorrow 

Jim Acosta has the gall to  imply/say that the border situation is not a national emergency...........in front of ANGEL MOMS.......this weasel and his fake news pals are colluding with illegal aliens to provide more votes(voter fraud with drivers liscenses that shouldn't be issued to illegals in the first place) for demorats.

Yes democrats killing babies and illegal killing young American

I’m with you brother I lost a daughter also not with an illegal but I know how you feel

We are spending so much money on illegal immigrants that a wall may not be such a bad idea at first I was pretty much against it but all the drugs are killing g so many people not to mention these immigrants get everything for free using taxpayers dollars yes maybe the money should be spent to help drug addiction or homeless or vets maybe we should have stricter laws for immigrants coming into this country I don’t know if the wall will help but something has to give.  This country was built on immigrants only native Americans are Native American Indians but if u want to come to this country you should have to take the proper steps and come legally. My parents were legal immigrants and they never took any money from the government for help.  I’m hoping that Trump is right and wall will help I just pray for unity and peace in our country

"Haters wouldn’t be hating if there Son or daughter was killed by a illegal immigrant! Securing our borders is a priority! Walls

"Another point of 'illegal' immigration is the impact it has on our economy. I'm a construction general contractor

You didn’t say what illegal or where from

An illegal hit my son with  my Grandson in the car also.The illegal was drunk and did it on purpose to hurt his wife.My son is disabled for ever.YES ----WE NEED THE WALL.The illegal had no insurance or license..

An illegal hit my son with  my Grandson in the car also.The illegal was drunk and did it on purpose to hurt his wife.My son is disabled for ever.YES ----WE NEED THE WALL.The illegal had no insurance or license..

An illegal hit my son with  my Grandson in the car also.The illegal was drunk and did it on purpose to hurt his wife.My son is disabled for ever.YES ----WE NEED THE WALL.The illegal had no insurance or license..

So sorry for your loss it's not right that some one illegal can come into our country and take the lives of our own people!!  This is so wrong!!

According to Jim Acosta the person is “allegedly” an illegal immigrant.

Seems like a lot of stories of illegals killing or other crimes against American citizens. Why don’t we have a “march” of all the victims and family of victims from illegal aliens. I bet it would be quite large.   That needs to be organized.

"4000 Americans died last year at the hands of illegal aliens. That’s an average of 5 a week.  When is enough

"I illegal murder to many 

A border wall won't bring back the dead folks who have been killed by home grown American citizens or by illegal immigrants (who may have come in through an airport).  It is despicable to exploit peoples' personal tragedies for political reasons.

"A illegal shot my 17 year old niece in the face.  If you think it won't happen to you or one of your loved ones

But how did this illegal get in? From Mexico? From the airport? Oversea?

"I've never hired an illegal

Why wait til your loved one is on the list?  Stop illegal immigration

While living in Chandler AZ...I was viciously raped by an illegal immigrant @ knifepoint in my own house after he broke in.😢

How many deaths are attributed to illegal immigrants in the past calendar year? Now compare that to gun violence in this country by our OWN citizens? I’ll wait....

An illegal immigrant was drunk driving and killed NFL linebacker Edwin Jackson. News was mostly silent...

"If you would like to report illegal aliens

"ABSOLUTELY!!! And brand every illegal half a dozen spots on their body

For those of us impacted by the actions of an illegal we understand the importance of the wall as well as other border security. For those who are against this I would say walk a mile in my shoes but I would never wish that horror onto anyone.

Does anyone not think that the Democrats are corrupt and making money from groups that profit from the illegal immigrants and drug smuggling coming across the border?

"Why do you believe that being killed by an illegal immigrant is somehow worse than being killed by citizen - which happens with far more frequency? In Texas

I propose building a wall in memory of those lost over the past 3 decades due to lack of and ineffective border security. Think of all those lost since 1990 due to terrorist attacks along with all of those killed by illegal criminal aliens. The wall could be similar to that of the Vietnam Veterans Wall and it could travel throughout all 50 states making people aware of the lives lost giving us the opportunity to pay homage to them. Thank you for all you do Mr. President. We are praying for you in all your decisions and endeavors.

Don’t forget the Sheriff that was killed in California by an illegal immigrant which the Governor completely ignores.

A wall will not stop illegal immigration ! If there’s a will there is a way! You think all illegals come from Mexico? You’re so misinformed !

DID THIS ILLEGAL COME THROUGH A PORT OR THROUGH  THE DESERT? I want to know.

Betsy Hammond:How much money do you think could be put towards these issues if not for the billions of dollars spent on illegal immigrants.

Yes people we have several problems in this country mass shootings drugs illegal aliens and so on so forth.  We now have a president who is picking a problem and doing something about it.  Then we can move on to the next thing.   It may not be the fix all but even if it only keeps out half the drugs and illegal's that's a huge victory. Build to wall.

Fact: Those in the Trump administration commit crimes at a higher rate than illegal immigrants.

He's so big on immigration reform yet he employs  so many illegal immigrants and married one then had her parents come over here think about

🇺🇸🇺🇸 Americans safety 1st! 🇺🇸🇺🇸  Condolences to this family and all the families that have lost a loved one due to heinous actions of illegal immigrants....🙏🏻

If the illegal was caught then kill the illegal.

If the illegal was caught then kill the illegal.

Just remember how el chapo manage to transport so many drugs around the world lol . He even built a tunnel . Won’t stop lol not every criminal is illegal 😂

An illegal killed my son.... build the wall!!!!!!

I bet if that was Pelosi standing there with a picture of her kid that was killed by an illegal I will bet my life the wall would be built

"I’m disabled because an illegal took a short cut across a California highway. Not even deported

Ain’t no damn illegal aliens gonna mess with my family or it will be the last thing they ever do. #DontMessWithMyFamily.

"My moms first husband was gunned down by a illegal machine gun

The news on the left will not report of this. They are full of hate for TRUMP and don't want our country to succeed they care about illegal aliens more than Americans. So sorry for your loss.GOD BLESS YOU !

whats that got to do with legal or illegal immigration?

So sorry for your loss.  Thank you for standing up for the victims of illegal aliens and the families of those victims.

Just came to read the illegal killed my family member comments.🖕🏼

"If there are no illegal crossings

4000+ Americans have been killed by illegal immigrants (that we know about)!

A dui. Common man that coulda been anyone. Don’t get all political and bigoted because an illegal drunk driver killed her. Jesus

"So many against the border wall until if affects them. Wake up before it affects you and your family. Illegal immigrants are all over the country

An illegal immigrant hit my mother in oncoming traffic on Cinco de mayo... Glad she is still here.no justice for his actions.

"I see illegal immigrants walking working traveling freely in USA

"I have been rear ended by an illegal immigrant twice

"I'm disabled from a stroke from a head on collision with a drunk illegal

"An illegal immigrant killed my boyfriends sister while driving illegally and driving drunk... this is after he was deported 2 times

"“The president was right to declare our border crisis a national emergency. While the vast majority of illegal immigrants are not violent criminals

The left relates to a wall like a marriage therapist talks about a psychological defense mechanism a wall is an inanimate object design to protect life and property! What the heck is wrong with the left they do not know the difference between legal and illegal and now they're talking about a physical wall like an emotional problem God help us.

Look at the stats on how many Americans were killed by guns. It's far higher than illegal immigrants but you won't touch gun control because they fund your campaign. It's always about the money with you.

Illegal immigrants coming here to destroy Americans & turn this country into a 3rd world country with the help and support of UN American Democrats !!

You can not blame EVERY illegal immigrant for your loss...NO WALL

From one incident from one illegal immigrant...stop the rhetoric. How many mass murders have we had that Donald J. Trump has done nothing but send his thoughts and prayers.

An illegal immigrant knocked over a building and killed my brother.  Damn you Superman!!

The Murdering Illegal needs to lose his life.

"There is no difference between an illegal alien & a Democrat.  Their ""kill record"" is sickening!"

What about people who was saved by illegal immigrants. If you decided build the wall believing that you will be safe after this. You are wrong. Yes you have to do something with illegal immigrants but not with this way. Way with hating them. Sorry for my English. And I'm not illegal immigrant 😒

What about people who was saved by illegal immigrants. If you decided build the wall believing that you will be safe after this. You are wrong. Yes you have to do something with illegal immigrants but not with this way. Way with hating them. Sorry for my English. And I'm not illegal immigrant 😒

What about people who was saved by illegal immigrants. If you decided build the wall believing that you will be safe after this. You are wrong. Yes you have to do something with illegal immigrants but not with this way. Way with hating them. Sorry for my English. And I'm not illegal immigrant 😒

"an illegal immigrant killed my brother in law  back in 1968 in his back yard when he had a celebration party for his son's deployement to Vietnam    they hit him in the head with a lead pipe crushing his skul after they were told to leave

No.  Fear mongering is wrong. Smart border security like walls and fencing and technology.  The  majority of illegal immigration and drugs come through ports of entry..

"Every sanctuary city should be held accountable for these crimes. If it comes to light that an illegal was released instead of reported

Right cause illegal immigrants are the only ones who kill people drinking and driving.

"Many illegal immigrants are law abiding people who provide for their families.  Then

Not illegal immigrant. ILLEGAL ALIEN

Not illegal immigrant. ILLEGAL ALIEN

"Hailey King was my 18 year old cousin. She was left in the street to die by an illegal who hit her and her friend on a Scooter. He was doing over 70 MPH in a 35 zone. After he hit them from behind

BUILD THAT WALL MR. PRESIDENT AND WHEN YOU GET IT DONE YOU CAN THROW GRUESOME NEWSOME OVER ON THE OTHER SIDE OF IT AND LET HIM LIVE WITH HIS ILLEGAL FRIENDS AND BE THEIR GOVERNOR ON THE OTHER SIDE OF CALIFORNIA AND STAY OUT OF OUR STATE.

"An illegal alien (Honduran) kicked-in the door to my house and tried to murder my then-16 yr old son.  https://youtu.be/6h2qwAAge4c  A few years prior to that

An illegal immigrant killed my 24 year old brother about a mile from his home. My brother was test driving a motorcycle and the illegal immigrant pulled out in front of him(the man was driving unlicensed and illegally) then left my brother to die on the side of the road. So I support the wall 100%!!

An illegal immigrant killed my 24 year old brother about a mile from his home. My brother was test driving a motorcycle and the illegal immigrant pulled out in front of him(the man was driving unlicensed and illegally) then left my brother to die on the side of the road. So I support the wall 100%!!

"So sorry for your loss. These idiots who turn their heads and pretend not to hear or see what is going on because see they haven't had a loved one killed by an illegal are fooling themselves if they think they are going to remain safe if this situation isnt dealt with. I stand with our president

Carl Ostendarpnot asylum illegal immigrants lying to get asylum status deportation is the only solution

"If an emergency can be manufactured over border security when illegal border crossings are near a 20-year low… then it’s a snap to make the case for an emergency over gun deaths

I'm just wondering.....do people live under rocks? How do you not see the damage illegal immigrants do?

Eva Graham How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Would it only be illegal immigrants that would ransack his house? because no Americans would ever commit a crime 🙄 moron

Alberto Weisz you can’t take your door down but not because of illegal immigrants because of American citizens

"My son was killed by an illegal Mexican immigrant who had already been deported once for DUI. He choose to drive drunk

Lynn Limauro Floyd How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Linda Durbin How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Timothy Kershner that doesn't mean every illegal is now ok. That is the 0000.1% of illegals.

Timothy Kershner good for him  the illegal that murdered my friends child got squat!! Build that wall

"Betsy Hammond We spend $150 billion per year on illegal immigrants welfare. Even if wall only stopped half of it

Dave Callender years ago when I was a child my parents picked up an illegal immigrant he asked if they would be so kind to give him a ride and they did he repaid them by molesting their daughter my sister in the back seat I don't know about you but I don't know any American who would repay kindness behind their backs doing this to their child.

Dave Callender maybe you should have died in that accident then you would have some ground to stand on for your argument like the other family's that have lost family to illegal alien's.  Think man they break the law when coming into our country and break the law after they are here. You go to their country's and break the law. See what happens to you.

Kyle Callender UNFORTUNATELY MEXICAN MEN 1 MAN COMES FOR ASYLUM GETS IT. HE BRINGS ALL ILLEGAL FAMILY ACROSS BORDER THEY GO GET FOOD STAMPS MEDICAID ETC.....THEY DONT BOTHER LEARNING ENGLISH BECAUSE PPL OF EL PASO CATER TO THEM BUT WE AMERICANS GET DISCRIMINATED FOR NOT KNOWING SPANISH.  I CANT GET A JOB IN ALOT OF PLACES BECAUSE IDK SPANISH THATS NOT RIGHT?????? IVE HEARD SOME PPL ARE WORKING IN MALLS THAT DONT KNO ENGLISH IVE NOT SEEN THIS BECAUSE IF/WHEN I DO IM RAISING HELL. PPL NEED TO QUIT CATERING TO THEM. IF THEY MOVE TO HOUSTON OR DALLS THEY LEARN ENGLISH BECAUSE THEY WONT CATER TO THEIR ASSES. THIS IS REALITY. PPL GET PD LESS IN EP BECUZ ILLEGALS HURT OUR ECONOMY.  THEY WORK UNDER TABLE N SEND $$$ TO MEXICO N DONT PAY TAXES. THEY ARE ALL ON STAMPS N MEDICAID N KEEP HAVING ANCHOR BABIES WE TAX PAYERS SUPPORT.   I UNDERSTAND WHAT U R SAYING ABOUT ASYLUM BUT THIS IS HOW ISIS HAS GOTTEN IN USA. YES LAWS NEED REVISED N CHANGED BUT WE AMERICANS NEED TO TAKE CARE OF OUR OWN 1ST. IF WE DONT WHO WILL??? PRESIDENT TRUMP KNOS THINGS WE DO NOT KNO. TRUST HIM??? LISTEN TO HIM???? HES CHANGING ALL PORTS OF ENTRY FROM MEXICO IN TO TX WITH HIGHER TECHNOLOGY ALREADY. WE NEED THE WALL BECUZ DRUGS N ILLEGAL PPL COMING IN WHERE THERE IS NOTHING.....IM JUST SAYING I MEAN NO DISRESPECT.  ILL AGREE TO DISAGREE IM NOT TRYNA ARGUE I STICK TO FACTS N TRUTH.......YOUR HEART IS N RIGHT SPOT BUT AMERICANS 1ST!!!

Kyle Callender UNFORTUNATELY MEXICAN MEN 1 MAN COMES FOR ASYLUM GETS IT. HE BRINGS ALL ILLEGAL FAMILY ACROSS BORDER THEY GO GET FOOD STAMPS MEDICAID ETC.....THEY DONT BOTHER LEARNING ENGLISH BECAUSE PPL OF EL PASO CATER TO THEM BUT WE AMERICANS GET DISCRIMINATED FOR NOT KNOWING SPANISH.  I CANT GET A JOB IN ALOT OF PLACES BECAUSE IDK SPANISH THATS NOT RIGHT?????? IVE HEARD SOME PPL ARE WORKING IN MALLS THAT DONT KNO ENGLISH IVE NOT SEEN THIS BECAUSE IF/WHEN I DO IM RAISING HELL. PPL NEED TO QUIT CATERING TO THEM. IF THEY MOVE TO HOUSTON OR DALLS THEY LEARN ENGLISH BECAUSE THEY WONT CATER TO THEIR ASSES. THIS IS REALITY. PPL GET PD LESS IN EP BECUZ ILLEGALS HURT OUR ECONOMY.  THEY WORK UNDER TABLE N SEND $$$ TO MEXICO N DONT PAY TAXES. THEY ARE ALL ON STAMPS N MEDICAID N KEEP HAVING ANCHOR BABIES WE TAX PAYERS SUPPORT.   I UNDERSTAND WHAT U R SAYING ABOUT ASYLUM BUT THIS IS HOW ISIS HAS GOTTEN IN USA. YES LAWS NEED REVISED N CHANGED BUT WE AMERICANS NEED TO TAKE CARE OF OUR OWN 1ST. IF WE DONT WHO WILL??? PRESIDENT TRUMP KNOS THINGS WE DO NOT KNO. TRUST HIM??? LISTEN TO HIM???? HES CHANGING ALL PORTS OF ENTRY FROM MEXICO IN TO TX WITH HIGHER TECHNOLOGY ALREADY. WE NEED THE WALL BECUZ DRUGS N ILLEGAL PPL COMING IN WHERE THERE IS NOTHING.....IM JUST SAYING I MEAN NO DISRESPECT.  ILL AGREE TO DISAGREE IM NOT TRYNA ARGUE I STICK TO FACTS N TRUTH.......YOUR HEART IS N RIGHT SPOT BUT AMERICANS 1ST!!!

Dave Callender How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Dave Callender Oh that’s real smart it’s not that accident don’t happen to everyone it’s that They had no business being here to cause the accident not having insurance because they are illegal you’re real smart

"Dave Callender When it becomes illegal to be named ""Ann"" fine but it isn't. However

"Edgar D. GutierrezTexas is the only state to track crime specifically among illegal immigrants let's use them as an example:  Between January 2011- January 2019 there have been 10 school shootings in the state of Texas. Of those 10 shootings 15 people have died and 28 have been injured.   Now let's look at crime amongst illegal immigrants in Texas. ""Between June 1

"Edgar D. GutierrezTexas is the only state to track crime specifically among illegal immigrants let's use them as an example:  Between January 2011- January 2019 there have been 10 school shootings in the state of Texas. Of those 10 shootings 15 people have died and 28 have been injured.   Now let's look at crime amongst illegal immigrants in Texas. ""Between June 1

The same thing happened to me from a man that was a US Citizen and serving in the military. The point is these things happen and the people doing so will be legal and illegal at a proportion relative to their portion of the population. Just as my situation does not mean that men in the military are bad your situation does not mean illegals are bad........only that the individuals that perpetrated this on us were bad.

Apple Rivera How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin WHAT PART OF ILLEGAL MAKES YOU THINK LAW ABIDING  THE DIFFERENCE IS THAT THE GUY IN THE MILITARY WAS PUNISHED AND YOU COULD GET SOME COMPENSATION FOR YOUR LOSS  BUT YOU ARE TOO BLIND TO SEE THAT  ILLEGAL MEANS ILLEGAL ILLEGAL MEANS AGAINST THE LAW   ONLY LIBERALS THINK ILLEGAL MEANS OBEYING THE LAW

"My cousin was hit by illegal

Joyce Ames He has a good point..Where are Trumps words for the 5 Americans gunned down yesterday...49 days in 2019 and 39 mass shootings!Not one of them done by an illegal..

Jim Butkowsky that’s just if if that illegal person had not been here her daughter would be alive. #buildthewall

But if that illegal immigrant wouldn't have been here...

Renieri Ortiz there is a huge difference between a legal immigrant and an illegal immigrant.

Renieri Ortiz immigrant does not mean illegal  !!!!

Renieri Ortiz illegal is the word you need to research. ILL LE GULL (that's the pronunciation). Let's stick to the topic.

Sofiane Hamouda I got stitches when an illegal immigrant attacked me.  I'd report.  They can come in the right way

"John N Karen Morris ""Hello Homeland Security. I'd like to report an illegal alien. She lives at 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue

"How do they know immagration has slowed down? Seems to me alot more has gotten away with entering illegally. Because I knew a girl who dated an illegal and he beat her ass in front of her kids

Drunk driving is already illegal. Police are given tools to stop it

Decline or not it's still a problem and it would help continue the decline allowing for focus to be driven elsewhere to further decline illegal immigration.

And it's not just illegal immigration that its being built for.

Daniel Alexander Allen are you mentally defective? We have sovereign countries for a reason. Illegal alien means you are not supposed to be here and don't just get to waltz your way in here.

"Illegal crossing on the southern border has been on the decline in the past 10 years

"Robert Dahlquist You did not read the article. Its about how just being an illegal immigrant caused someone to die. Alcohol is mentioned (unknown where it came from)

"Bill Reese unfortunate accidents happen all the time. This story is purely about blaming illegal immigrants. And I will still stand with that is petty. Might as well blame the place that made the beer

Kris Landers that’s just stupid a person that’s not supposed to be in this country it is called a illegal alien that person should not be here to be able to drink to kill a person seems to me you’re not very smart actually the store owners fault also if she did not have a legal ID the store owner should be prosecuted and lose their liquor license to and get a fine but come onHopefully you don’t have that many rocks rolling around in your head

"Kris Landers if a known serial killer was loose in your neighborhood would you lock your doors? An illegal immigrant is a KNOWN criminal

no what is petty it you not understanding that this child wass taken by someone who shouldn't have been here in the first place.  so don't say it is an illegal thing when that is who killed there child.  see if you can get the congress or senate to pass a stiff law for anyone drinking and driving it won't happen cause they are the ones who are doing it all the time and walk away.  don't blame this parent =

"Kris Landers so if the “illegal” was kept out because the “illegal” doesn’t belong here

"Kris Landers so if the “illegal” was kept out because the “illegal” doesn’t belong here

Joseph Roy ...Kris Landers missing the whole point. Plain and simple..this person should not be in this country. What part of illegal does she not understand? End of the day this young ladies life is gone as a result of an illegal immigrants action. Nothing petty about that.

Joseph Roy ...Kris Landers missing the whole point. Plain and simple..this person should not be in this country. What part of illegal does she not understand? End of the day this young ladies life is gone as a result of an illegal immigrants action. Nothing petty about that.

Dave Heffner it’s already illegal to cross the border

Devin Diamond I don’t believe being illegal was the reason they didn’t press charges

Samuel Tan Yuan Han Most illegal immigrants overstay their visas.. How’s a wall gonna address that issue?

It already is addressed as it is illegal to drink and drive.

Laws against drunk driving are already in place and are enforced.  Immigration laws have become relaxed and people try to protect those who come here illegally.  Big difference in how the 2 are addressed.  Did my friend deserve to die when he was walking down the sidewalk and was struck by a female illegal immigrant and thrown 50 feet through the air and spending the next 2 weeks in the hospital before he died. The driver was sober and had no insurance and because of her status as an illegal the state's DA decided not to press charges she lives a happy life in Rockford illinois while an American family weeps.  So how will you defend something like this.  Even more so when the person that killed my friend had no legal right to even be in the country that my friend fought and served for.

Laws against drunk driving are already in place and are enforced.  Immigration laws have become relaxed and people try to protect those who come here illegally.  Big difference in how the 2 are addressed.  Did my friend deserve to die when he was walking down the sidewalk and was struck by a female illegal immigrant and thrown 50 feet through the air and spending the next 2 weeks in the hospital before he died. The driver was sober and had no insurance and because of her status as an illegal the state's DA decided not to press charges she lives a happy life in Rockford illinois while an American family weeps.  So how will you defend something like this.  Even more so when the person that killed my friend had no legal right to even be in the country that my friend fought and served for.

"James Anderson If you’re thinking that bump stocks and large magazines should not  be illegal

That's because he wasn't a pregnant illegal alien. They can get free Medicaid along with their anchor babies!

Jeanie Railsback sorry about your husband but if he was an illegal he wouldn’t have to have insurance and his health care would be free in California!

The problem is when the immigrant doesn't face any charges because they are here illegally.   My uncle was killed in aurora colorado. He was hit by an illegal alien who was driving drunk without a license. The courts commuted his ENTIRE sentence so that he could be deported. So he is probably in mexico drinking beers with his friends while my aunt and cousins have no father or husband.

An illegal grown man punched my 3 yr old granddaughter in the face.  A different illegals 9 year old daughter sexually assaulted my same granddaughter when she was 5. So I am strongly supporting this wall!

But if that illegal immigrant wouldn't have been here...

An illegal alien driving a loaded simi ass-ended a line of cars stopped at a road repair who were waiting on the pilot car to get through. The older couple in the last car in line was smashed into a pickup. The pickup smashed into the back of a loaded cattle trailer and was deflected into the ditch. The older couples car was then smashed flat between the oncoming simi and the stopped simi and were killed instantly. The truck driver was an illegal and was burned in the crash. He was taken into custody and transported to OKC for treatment. There was never any news of what was done with him but I imagine he was released and hauled ass for Mexico leaving Americans with the medical bills and funeral expenses.

An illegal alien driving a loaded simi ass-ended a line of cars stopped at a road repair who were waiting on the pilot car to get through. The older couple in the last car in line was smashed into a pickup. The pickup smashed into the back of a loaded cattle trailer and was deflected into the ditch. The older couples car was then smashed flat between the oncoming simi and the stopped simi and were killed instantly. The truck driver was an illegal and was burned in the crash. He was taken into custody and transported to OKC for treatment. There was never any news of what was done with him but I imagine he was released and hauled ass for Mexico leaving Americans with the medical bills and funeral expenses.

"If illegal immigrants are so dangerous why does he employ them at all his Trump properties?! The man lies to your face (every single day) and you love him

Young woman from NY was just murdered by an 🚫 illegal her body put in a suitcase and dumped on the side of a road in Connecticut. BUILD THE WALL

Sorry for your loss.  There are many of us who stand behind Trump and the wall.  We must stop the illegal immigrant invasion.

CliffandKim Ferrell don’t you wonder how many of the trolls on this page are actually illegal themselves??

My mom was hit by an illegal immigrant and he tried to drive off. He pulled out in front of her and totaled her car. On another occasion my dad was hit by one going the wrong way and drunk on the highway. Totaled his car and hurt him pretty bad.

"Emily Neal I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

"There has been more than 1 illegal that is responsible for the death of innocent Americans.  And just yesterday there was a fentanyl bust that could be responsible for 4

Charlesetta Brown Illegal entry is criminal.They can go through legal channels!

You people need to believe the experts and not lying Trump.    A Border Wall isn't the answer. Most illegal immigrants overstayed their VISAS or entered through legal points of entry.

Charlesetta Brown please provide the name and address of your loved one for the next death cause by an illegal!!

Charlesetta Brown its waaaaay more than one plus them being here is a crime itself. Hence the name ILLEGAL

"Joseph Nowik which will be declared illegal and unconstitutional

Republicans are murdering exponentially more people by denying the affordable health care and drugs than people being killed by illegal aliens. I'm sure most killings by illegal aliens are domestic or murders of people they know. Illegals aren't running around shooting people for the hell of it. But stupid Trump followers believe what ever the orange toad tells them.

Republicans are murdering exponentially more people by denying the affordable health care and drugs than people being killed by illegal aliens. I'm sure most killings by illegal aliens are domestic or murders of people they know. Illegals aren't running around shooting people for the hell of it. But stupid Trump followers believe what ever the orange toad tells them.

Mike Charles I’m the only one posting facts and figures collected by research organizations.  Please feel free to post the information you guys have backing up your understanding of illegal immigration.  Also I’m not sure how this has anything to do with Republicans or Democrats. This is about what is the most effective tool to deal with illegal immigration and understand the actual statistics put forth by those who study illegal immigration.

Mike Charles I’m the only one posting facts and figures collected by research organizations.  Please feel free to post the information you guys have backing up your understanding of illegal immigration.  Also I’m not sure how this has anything to do with Republicans or Democrats. This is about what is the most effective tool to deal with illegal immigration and understand the actual statistics put forth by those who study illegal immigration.

Mike Charles I’m the only one posting facts and figures collected by research organizations.  Please feel free to post the information you guys have backing up your understanding of illegal immigration.  Also I’m not sure how this has anything to do with Republicans or Democrats. This is about what is the most effective tool to deal with illegal immigration and understand the actual statistics put forth by those who study illegal immigration.

You are disgusting because her life means nothing to you. She and all the others who will be killed by someone who has NO right to be here are the reason we need a wall!! You actually have a higher chance of being affected by an illegal as you are part of the Latino community.

Austin Baker he’s using the death to push for his border wall which he INCLUDES in the headline.   EXCEPT a wall will do nothing for illegal immigration. They overstay their visas or come in with forged documents. The ACTUAL drugs and crime come through vehicles through legal ports of entry.   He’s not asking you to pay for immigration suppression but an entire waste of money that’s more symbolic of America than it is an effective tools

"Angela K Christensen You can’t have national security without border security. It’s not only necessary for any meaningful immigration reform; border security plays a crucial role in both the interdiction of illegal drugs and in defending America against criminal threats. Weak borders allow criminal and smugglers

I guess it means nothing to you that when an illegal commits a murder in this country.......YES that is his focus and it should be.............

Scott Magers how have u been personally affectes by an illegal? just curious

"Angela K Christensen I cannot claim to have lost a loved one due to an illegal immigrant. However

The Mexican drug cartels have a lot of money and they know how to invest it to maximize their illegal profits. During the national discussion in this country about legalizing marijuana it was suspected that a large amount of cartel money went into swaying public opinion away from the legalization.  Is it possible that cartel money is now being used to change public opinion and the politicians opinions on the construction of the border wall between Mexico and the United States? I am just wondering now……

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"It isn't a damned competition you myopic virtue signaling troll! Illegal border jumpers are not supposed to be here

"Asha Artis not American but wouldn’t most of your illegal immigration problems stem from a broken security system? I’m guessing most of them don’t walk over the border but are not caught by the checks in place. Even if they walk over the border why aren’t they rounded up and sent back? Is it possible that there is corruption here

Asha Artis the innocent illegal I guess. Bet you would feel differently if this was your kid. Bet you would be calling for the end of illegal immigration also. https://fox17.com/news/local/undocumented-immigrant-snuck-into-lebanon-home-raped-6-year-old-girl

Asha Artis the innocent illegal I guess. Bet you would feel differently if this was your kid. Bet you would be calling for the end of illegal immigration also. https://fox17.com/news/local/undocumented-immigrant-snuck-into-lebanon-home-raped-6-year-old-girl

An illegal killed my dad years ago..

"whats that have to do with an illegal with no license or insurance...etc...if he weren't  here

"I know if my daughter was murdered by an illegal

Bill Rahbine and what if your daughter was ever to get murdered by a illegal that's in a cartel ? 🤣🤷🏻‍♀ 1 against .. what ? 50 thugs ? ... that wouldn't work out .

"An illegal immigrant hit my car broadside which put me in the hospital with 4 broken bones

Those who oppose a wall are obviously hoping to support illegal activities. Search your soul. The cost is a non-issue and pennies in the dollar compared to the outrageous waste of our government.

My husband and I were in a terrible reck in 2013.An illegal immigrant almost killed me and my husband. He was 17 didn’t have a license was driving someone else’s car. Was going 80 in a 30 miles zone. Before he hit us he passed a car with a family that had 3 little kids in the car. That could had very well killed them Thank god he didn’t and my husband had to be cut out of the car. He was drunk on top of that. Didn’t spend one night in jail. My husband was I c u for 14 days had too have emergency surgery on his neck and back. This is a man that has never had a broken bone in his body or stitches either. Until that night he still isn’t the same till this day. So yes I’m all for the wall 💯percent. We need a president like Trump he is the one that can get the job done.👍🏻👏👊🇺🇸

Was that an illegal immigrant that gunned down five coworkers and wounded five police the other day? The REAL emergency in the United States - gun violence.

"Nancy and Chuck could care less how many are killed as long as they can get the illegal votes and keep the power they wield over the people

"This isn’t about illegal immigration

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

Okay but anyone could've drank a few and got drunk. Illegal or citizen of the u.s

My friend was stabbed 40 times the illegal was just deported to Mexico.  That was his punishment.  And you wonder why I fight for the wall?

"the arrigance of the left in idealizing illegal immigrants as good citizens who just want to fit in and find a better life for their family. i should note

Joan Hamilton it doesn't matter why he was illegal.  The fact that he had no legal right to be here is enough!

"Gail Bailey Adams  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

Kimberly Mansfield  yep by crazy people that have mental health issues!! If their parents lost control what the hell can President Trump do? Most murders are from illegal guns the wall will cut down on that too! People with guns need to lock them up better! Not a lot can be done about crazy people!!

"Kimberly Mansfield compare those killed in mass shooting per year to the number killed by illegal aliens every year.     As for money to help people

"""An illegal immigrant killed someone I love! While 3 people in my community were killed by natural born citizens. But I only care about what directly affects me. So let's focus on the immigrant"".  Conservative logic behind the wall. 🤔"

"Jeff Sterup  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

Seeking asylum is not illegal.

😡she should not have died and wouldn’t have if that Illegal hadn’t of been in our Country.

Jo Sechi We must have a Wall  and we Must Stop illegal immigrants from killing    Us ..

"There are too many innocent people being murdered every day and if you look at it long and hard you can see that it all is happening because there is no border wall to keep illegal immigrants out.  Weather it is from their drugs laced with fentanyl or weapons they brought with them or illegal immigrants who think the laws do not exist or pertain to them.  Build the wall and make them come through legally and catch the drugs and weapons at the port of entry!  We can't take care of our own.  Why are we still taking care of them.  The money it takes to build the wall will be cheaper in the long run from the money we save from Narcon used to save drug attics

"There are too many innocent people being murdered every day and if you look at it long and hard you can see that it all is happening because there is no border wall to keep illegal immigrants out.  Weather it is from their drugs laced with fentanyl or weapons they brought with them or illegal immigrants who think the laws do not exist or pertain to them.  Build the wall and make them come through legally and catch the drugs and weapons at the port of entry!  We can't take care of our own.  Why are we still taking care of them.  The money it takes to build the wall will be cheaper in the long run from the money we save from Narcon used to save drug attics

An illegal  immigrant  almost killed my boyfriend and father in law. Hit them in the back  made them roll 4 times and he ran!! Still got away with it. He was drinking and driving...president Trump build the wall!!!

Kevin Peevey 😂 no... that won't stop natural US citizens from drinking and driving and causing fatal accidents... it's only a news story because he was an illegal immigrant... if it was a white guy it would have been a completely normal occurrence 😄

"Whittley Guidry Garcia  Because a lot of crime is caused by illegal criminals

My sincere sympathy goes to the father who lost his daughter by an illegal immigrant and to the angel mom’s and dads. Our congress men and women need to hear them instead of ignoring them.

People kill people every day. Illegal or not.

Illegal immigrants statistically commit far fewer crimes than Americans. We see through your bullshit scaremongering.

So sorry this got to stop!!!!!  Just one getting killed by illegal is to many ? I feel for you.... Trump 2020

"Well as I understand it the wall is primarily built to stem the rotating flow of 400.000 deportations and illegal entries every year. The berlin wall and the soviet/russian border towards finland required guardtowers

One of the easiest answers is to make sure only citizens can get any government benefits and no illegal will ever be a citizen.

Thank You Mr President for Wanting to Keep Us Safe I know the Democrats Dont care because They will lose Illegal Votes but I know You Care Thank You.

Lost my son in El Paso due to illegal running red light hitting him walking across the street on his'way home from work. It was hit and run til his' girlfriend turned him in

It’s incomprehensible that Americans are actually fighting against keeping illegals out. What part of illegal do they not understand?

Chet Bentley no I think it was an illegal .... 😭😭😭

God is why that illegal existed as he did. So it was god.

"I was working for an employer who had hired illegal immigrants and didn't notify the staff that had been working there. One of the younger a_ _ holes invited me out to his place for a beverage

"I was injured in a car accident caused by an illegal immigrant. 13 years later I still have mobility issues because of it. A couple months before

"An illegal immigrant committed a hit and run on my husband and I while we were riding our motorcycle.  We were left for dead in the middle of a road.  Yes

Just makes me so angry that our government turns a blind eye to american's and kisses the ass of illegal's just for there illegal vote. How can they even say this is a made up. I would never wish this on anybody but they just might have to walk in the shoe's of a family that lost a loved one when it could have been Prevented!.

Was that another illegal in Aurora Illinois?

So this situation is made better by allowing illegal dangerous criminals into our country???

My 4 grandparents came to America legally.  Why can’t they?  My son died from illegal drugs.  Where did the drugs come from?

Not true. 50 people dead so far this year from American citizens shooting each other up. We know what the real emergency is. Most violent crime is not perpetrated by illegal immigrants. Trump just loves to exploit these anecdotal stories when it does happen though.

"If they had barriers for 1900 plus miles of WIDE OPEN territory where illegal border jumpers can just walk in

I have a child. I would support anything that is going to make our society safe for us all. End illegal immigration and build walls. Support Angel moms. MAGA 2020.

"If all illegal immigrants will leave America tomorrow 

Jim Acosta has the gall to  imply/say that the border situation is not a national emergency...........in front of ANGEL MOMS.......this weasel and his fake news pals are colluding with illegal aliens to provide more votes(voter fraud with drivers liscenses that shouldn't be issued to illegals in the first place) for demorats.

Yes democrats killing babies and illegal killing young American

I’m with you brother I lost a daughter also not with an illegal but I know how you feel

Legend sayeth once the great wall is completed all innocent lives taken by illegal immigrants will be resurrected. -Abraham 36:24

"Brian Roy I personally am against abortion and think late term abortion should be illegal

An illegal president killed our country

Steve Ware what’s your point? Every country has bad citizens that do bad things. That’s why we have prisons. That doesn’t mean we want illegal people from other countries that also includes bad people.  We have enough of our own to take care of.

We are spending so much money on illegal immigrants that a wall may not be such a bad idea at first I was pretty much against it but all the drugs are killing g so many people not to mention these immigrants get everything for free using taxpayers dollars yes maybe the money should be spent to help drug addiction or homeless or vets maybe we should have stricter laws for immigrants coming into this country I don’t know if the wall will help but something has to give.  This country was built on immigrants only native Americans are Native American Indians but if u want to come to this country you should have to take the proper steps and come legally. My parents were legal immigrants and they never took any money from the government for help.  I’m hoping that Trump is right and wall will help I just pray for unity and peace in our country

"Haters wouldn’t be hating if there Son or daughter was killed by a illegal immigrant! Securing our borders is a priority! Walls

"Another point of 'illegal' immigration is the impact it has on our economy. I'm a construction general contractor

You didn’t say what illegal or where from

An illegal hit my son with  my Grandson in the car also.The illegal was drunk and did it on purpose to hurt his wife.My son is disabled for ever.YES ----WE NEED THE WALL.The illegal had no insurance or license..

An illegal hit my son with  my Grandson in the car also.The illegal was drunk and did it on purpose to hurt his wife.My son is disabled for ever.YES ----WE NEED THE WALL.The illegal had no insurance or license..

An illegal hit my son with  my Grandson in the car also.The illegal was drunk and did it on purpose to hurt his wife.My son is disabled for ever.YES ----WE NEED THE WALL.The illegal had no insurance or license..

So sorry for your loss it's not right that some one illegal can come into our country and take the lives of our own people!!  This is so wrong!!

According to Jim Acosta the person is “allegedly” an illegal immigrant.

Jason Erhardt a lot of those crimes against immigrants are done by illegal aliens.  Build the wall and enforce our laws

Seems like a lot of stories of illegals killing or other crimes against American citizens. Why don’t we have a “march” of all the victims and family of victims from illegal aliens. I bet it would be quite large.   That needs to be organized.

Another American killed my friend. Is her death any less important than an illegal killing another American?

"4000 Americans died last year at the hands of illegal aliens. That’s an average of 5 a week.  When is enough

"I illegal murder to many 

A border wall won't bring back the dead folks who have been killed by home grown American citizens or by illegal immigrants (who may have come in through an airport).  It is despicable to exploit peoples' personal tragedies for political reasons.

"A illegal shot my 17 year old niece in the face.  If you think it won't happen to you or one of your loved ones

But how did this illegal get in? From Mexico? From the airport? Oversea?

"I've never hired an illegal

Why wait til your loved one is on the list?  Stop illegal immigration

While living in Chandler AZ...I was viciously raped by an illegal immigrant @ knifepoint in my own house after he broke in.😢

How many deaths are attributed to illegal immigrants in the past calendar year? Now compare that to gun violence in this country by our OWN citizens? I’ll wait....

An illegal immigrant was drunk driving and killed NFL linebacker Edwin Jackson. News was mostly silent...

"If you would like to report illegal aliens

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"ABSOLUTELY!!! And brand every illegal half a dozen spots on their body

For those of us impacted by the actions of an illegal we understand the importance of the wall as well as other border security. For those who are against this I would say walk a mile in my shoes but I would never wish that horror onto anyone.

Does anyone not think that the Democrats are corrupt and making money from groups that profit from the illegal immigrants and drug smuggling coming across the border?

"Why do you believe that being killed by an illegal immigrant is somehow worse than being killed by citizen - which happens with far more frequency? In Texas

I propose building a wall in memory of those lost over the past 3 decades due to lack of and ineffective border security. Think of all those lost since 1990 due to terrorist attacks along with all of those killed by illegal criminal aliens. The wall could be similar to that of the Vietnam Veterans Wall and it could travel throughout all 50 states making people aware of the lives lost giving us the opportunity to pay homage to them. Thank you for all you do Mr. President. We are praying for you in all your decisions and endeavors.

Don’t forget the Sheriff that was killed in California by an illegal immigrant which the Governor completely ignores.

A wall will not stop illegal immigration ! If there’s a will there is a way! You think all illegals come from Mexico? You’re so misinformed !

DID THIS ILLEGAL COME THROUGH A PORT OR THROUGH  THE DESERT? I want to know.

Betsy Hammond:How much money do you think could be put towards these issues if not for the billions of dollars spent on illegal immigrants.

Yes people we have several problems in this country mass shootings drugs illegal aliens and so on so forth.  We now have a president who is picking a problem and doing something about it.  Then we can move on to the next thing.   It may not be the fix all but even if it only keeps out half the drugs and illegal's that's a huge victory. Build to wall.

Fact: Those in the Trump administration commit crimes at a higher rate than illegal immigrants.

He's so big on immigration reform yet he employs  so many illegal immigrants and married one then had her parents come over here think about

How did that illegal get here?

🇺🇸🇺🇸 Americans safety 1st! 🇺🇸🇺🇸  Condolences to this family and all the families that have lost a loved one due to heinous actions of illegal immigrants....🙏🏻

If the illegal was caught then kill the illegal.

If the illegal was caught then kill the illegal.

Just remember how el chapo manage to transport so many drugs around the world lol . He even built a tunnel . Won’t stop lol not every criminal is illegal 😂

"Oh I can yes. But if we're an illegal who starts his own business and hires other illegals.... Or if you are a home owner looking for cheap labor because your don't make the most money in the the world. Then you hire a guy of Mexican decent but he speaks good English. Only to find his ""work"" is shabby at best and that that man is not even legally here...."

An illegal killed my son.... build the wall!!!!!!

I bet if that was Pelosi standing there with a picture of her kid that was killed by an illegal I will bet my life the wall would be built

"I’m disabled because an illegal took a short cut across a California highway. Not even deported

Ain’t no damn illegal aliens gonna mess with my family or it will be the last thing they ever do. #DontMessWithMyFamily.

"My moms first husband was gunned down by a illegal machine gun

The news on the left will not report of this. They are full of hate for TRUMP and don't want our country to succeed they care about illegal aliens more than Americans. So sorry for your loss.GOD BLESS YOU !

whats that got to do with legal or illegal immigration?

So sorry for your loss.  Thank you for standing up for the victims of illegal aliens and the families of those victims.

Just came to read the illegal killed my family member comments.🖕🏼

Gregory Baxter More people die from illegal and prescription drugs and medical mistakes than guns in this country. You people really need to get off gun BS cause guess what Guns aren’t going any where. They are in our Constitution. Illegal immigration is NOT.

Gregory Baxter More people die from illegal and prescription drugs and medical mistakes than guns in this country. You people really need to get off gun BS cause guess what Guns aren’t going any where. They are in our Constitution. Illegal immigration is NOT.

"If there are no illegal crossings

4000+ Americans have been killed by illegal immigrants (that we know about)!

A dui. Common man that coulda been anyone. Don’t get all political and bigoted because an illegal drunk driver killed her. Jesus

"So many against the border wall until if affects them. Wake up before it affects you and your family. Illegal immigrants are all over the country

An illegal immigrant hit my mother in oncoming traffic on Cinco de mayo... Glad she is still here.no justice for his actions.

Those who kill on the previous massacres around the country are not illegal immigrants

So very sad. On a avg. 5 Americans are killed on a daily bases  in one way or another by a illegal. AND YET the Democrats still do not give a damn!

"I see illegal immigrants walking working traveling freely in USA

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"I have been rear ended by an illegal immigrant twice

"I'm disabled from a stroke from a head on collision with a drunk illegal

"An illegal immigrant killed my boyfriends sister while driving illegally and driving drunk... this is after he was deported 2 times

"“The president was right to declare our border crisis a national emergency. While the vast majority of illegal immigrants are not violent criminals

A human killed ur daughter it has absolutely nothing to do with wether he was illegal or not.

The left relates to a wall like a marriage therapist talks about a psychological defense mechanism a wall is an inanimate object design to protect life and property! What the heck is wrong with the left they do not know the difference between legal and illegal and now they're talking about a physical wall like an emotional problem God help us.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"By that logic we should ONLY let in violent criminal illegal border jumpers to balance out the scales of justice?! Wow

Look at the stats on how many Americans were killed by guns. It's far higher than illegal immigrants but you won't touch gun control because they fund your campaign. It's always about the money with you.

Illegal immigrants coming here to destroy Americans & turn this country into a 3rd world country with the help and support of UN American Democrats !!

You can not blame EVERY illegal immigrant for your loss...NO WALL

From one incident from one illegal immigrant...stop the rhetoric. How many mass murders have we had that Donald J. Trump has done nothing but send his thoughts and prayers.

An illegal immigrant knocked over a building and killed my brother.  Damn you Superman!!

The Murdering Illegal needs to lose his life.

"There is no difference between an illegal alien & a Democrat.  Their ""kill record"" is sickening!"

What about people who was saved by illegal immigrants. If you decided build the wall believing that you will be safe after this. You are wrong. Yes you have to do something with illegal immigrants but not with this way. Way with hating them. Sorry for my English. And I'm not illegal immigrant 😒

What about people who was saved by illegal immigrants. If you decided build the wall believing that you will be safe after this. You are wrong. Yes you have to do something with illegal immigrants but not with this way. Way with hating them. Sorry for my English. And I'm not illegal immigrant 😒

What about people who was saved by illegal immigrants. If you decided build the wall believing that you will be safe after this. You are wrong. Yes you have to do something with illegal immigrants but not with this way. Way with hating them. Sorry for my English. And I'm not illegal immigrant 😒

"an illegal immigrant killed my brother in law  back in 1968 in his back yard when he had a celebration party for his son's deployement to Vietnam    they hit him in the head with a lead pipe crushing his skul after they were told to leave

No.  Fear mongering is wrong. Smart border security like walls and fencing and technology.  The  majority of illegal immigration and drugs come through ports of entry..

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"Every sanctuary city should be held accountable for these crimes. If it comes to light that an illegal was released instead of reported

Tudy Anderson Latulip a wall will not stop the illegal handouts and instantly relocate that money to vets. A wall will take decades to build and vets should not have to wait.

Illegal immigration is at a 10 year low and there is no extra money going towards vets.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

Right cause illegal immigrants are the only ones who kill people drinking and driving.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"Many illegal immigrants are law abiding people who provide for their families.  Then

Not illegal immigrant. ILLEGAL ALIEN

Not illegal immigrant. ILLEGAL ALIEN

"Hailey King was my 18 year old cousin. She was left in the street to die by an illegal who hit her and her friend on a Scooter. He was doing over 70 MPH in a 35 zone. After he hit them from behind

An illegal killed my cousin husband .

"Did this illegal immigrant even cross the border by ground or did they over stay their Visa or arrive by air or boat? A wall can only possibly stop one way of arrival

BUILD THAT WALL MR. PRESIDENT AND WHEN YOU GET IT DONE YOU CAN THROW GRUESOME NEWSOME OVER ON THE OTHER SIDE OF IT AND LET HIM LIVE WITH HIS ILLEGAL FRIENDS AND BE THEIR GOVERNOR ON THE OTHER SIDE OF CALIFORNIA AND STAY OUT OF OUR STATE.

"An illegal alien (Honduran) kicked-in the door to my house and tried to murder my then-16 yr old son.  https://youtu.be/6h2qwAAge4c  A few years prior to that

....and a white person killed how many innocent people in Las Vegas...how many innocent kids got killed by a white kid while at school..how many innocent people got killed while watching a movie at a movie theater by a white person..how many people got killed while attending church services by a white person..just asking for an illegal immigrant who only comes to do a job a white person doesnt want to do..

NO ONE IS ILLEGAL ON STOLEN LAND! 👌👌

"Sandra Nelson Ask the Chinese: Or the French. Trump wants to ignore the stats saying illegal immigration has been declining for two years

"Timothy McVeigh is not an illegal

Build the wall! The Democrats want open boarders and they obviously don’t care about the Americans getting killed by illegals. Wait until an illegal kills one of their loved ones then see how they feel!

illegal is Illegal.

illegal is Illegal.

The chair for a high ranking democrat. They support illegal has great automotive citizens.

The wicked Democrats don't care about the victims of illegal immigration. They care about power.

"A bigger problem than illegal aliens in this country

Lisa P. Woodruff  Illegal aliens not immigrants

Illegal immigrants killed millions of Native Americans.

What about all the school shootings by Americans? Those just don’t matter? One problem by an illegal immigrant and that’s your excuse?? A lot of worse things happen and they’re not caused by the people you’re blaming. You’re doing more damage to the country. Money doesn’t make you any smarter..

You have forgotten about Las Vegas. It was not illegal. It was a white like you

"I can understand someone feeling this way if their child is killed by an illegal. I would feel the same way.   But let’s look at the numbers.   106

"When Democrats dismiss the fact that illegal immigrants are killing citizens 

"It's not just about drugs and murders. It's about the fact people are coming in illegally. What is so hard to grasp about the word ""ILLEGAL?"""

Most of Orange County’s non illegal residents are for you president Trump. Newsom is NOT representing us! HELP

"Prayers for everyone who have lost loved ones because of illegal aliens. This is absolutely insane. Thankfully

"An illegal killed my nephew

Aren't we all illegal immigrants?

Did Don the Con tell you that this illegal immigrant entered the country thru a legal checkpoint?

Cindy Sak Nowak so you believe that when the government has shootouts with people that refuse to give up their rights because the illegal firearms owners aren't going to obey the law then everything gets better. You are to damn dumb. You say Chicago laws aren't strict enough yet open carry cities are some of he safest in the country.

"If the illegal doesn’t get into this country

"However stats have proven over and over again that citizens commit way more crimes than illegals. I would think many of the illegals that do come here also get their guns here since it's so easy to do so. However I am against illegal immigration but the majority of our mass shootings are caused by white American citizens. President Obama deported more illegals than any other president. It's not the crisis that Trump's conning his base to believe. Stats show immigration from the southern border is the lowest in 50 years. Many of the suspected terrorist that have entered this country

Illegal immigrants have been killing people in Wales for hundreds of years.

^^^* 'We'; {average American citizen's}... need to bring light to EVERY occurrence of an; 'Illegal Alien' murdering a 'American Citizen'.  And then make sure that the entire World knows.  That 'IT' 'IS' the unequivocally /and/ specifically that 'FAULT' of; 'Nancy Pelosi' / 'Chuck Schumer' /and/ Anyone that did not vote to fund the 'Border Wall'!!!!!! 　 *Through Their neglect... have the Blood of innocent people on Their hands!!!!!!! :'(  *> When will They {Liberal's} be prosecuted for; 'Complicit Neglect in conjunction of a Homicide'!?!?!?! >:(

What a crock. Trump said himself he didn’t need to call a national emergency he just did it to attempt to sidestep congress.   Illegal immigrants are less likely to kill than native born Americans.  Drugs come in mainly through regular ports of entry. Illegal crossings are at an all time low. But hey who needs facts and rule of law when living in trumps Orwellian universe full of alternative facts.

What a crock. Trump said himself he didn’t need to call a national emergency he just did it to attempt to sidestep congress.   Illegal immigrants are less likely to kill than native born Americans.  Drugs come in mainly through regular ports of entry. Illegal crossings are at an all time low. But hey who needs facts and rule of law when living in trumps Orwellian universe full of alternative facts.

"Bill Hoeler  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

people in united kingdom just  giving up on British government to do their jobs they care more about   approval ratings and deporting illegal immigrant isn't on the list.

We are spending so much money on illegal immigrants that a wall may not be such a bad idea at first I was pretty much against it but all the drugs are killing g so many people not to mention these immigrants get everything for free using taxpayers dollars yes maybe the money should be spent to help drug addiction or homeless or vets maybe we should have stricter laws for immigrants coming into this country I don’t know if the wall will help but something has to give.  This country was built on immigrants only native Americans are Native American Indians but if u want to come to this country you should have to take the proper steps and come legally. My parents were legal immigrants and they never took any money from the government for help.  I’m hoping that Trump is right and wall will help I just pray for unity and peace in our country

"exactly and enough with this ""undocumented workers"" workers is hardly the word to describe them. ILLEGAL ALIENS is more appropriate and it was used without any problems for years."

"""Illegal Immigrant"" is just a nice way of saying criminal

Damn right ! The democrats are imbeciles ! They care more about an illegal than your daughter ! Truly Sad ! Trump 2020 !

"Laura Anglin Peterson  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

The MSM doesn't report the news any more but years ago the Mexican president released all his criminals from prisons so long as they left the country and went to America.  That explains illegal aliens of Mexico and crime.

I'm sorry for the loss of life due to illegal aliens but how many death from homegrown players deaths from no insurance or drugs to save them America is broke and istead of fixing it we are building a wall

David Proud It IS the point.  Gun Violence is a way BIGGER national emergency than illegal immigration...

How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years?

Was this dude illegal or any of the mass shooters in the past 10 years for that matter? https://chicago.cbslocal.com/2019/02/15/5-dead-in-aurora-workplace-shooting/

And the American gunman with an illegal firearm that slipped through your gun checks kills many. Where’s the outrage!  Nowhere   We want a wall to keep you out of our country

If any sanctuary city lets someone go on bond and they are illegal and end up injuring someone or killing someone they should be held liable.

I agree that illegal immigration is a problem.  Not enough for the wall though.  The bigger threat is all of the homegrown terrorists.  Shouldn't we focus on them first?

Could it be one of the illegal immigrants working on Trump's properties???!!!... Bunch of fucking assholes#impeachthemotherfucker!#americasdumbestpresident!#fuckingmoron!

Illegal immigrants have been a problem for decades.  The National Parks Service and the Border Patrol have been focused on the issue for decades.  It's time to fix this long time problem.

"Austin Wheeler I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat

"Illegal European immigrants killed almost all real Americans some hundred years ago. Do you all forget where you come from. That happen in a country where it is more important to learn how to shoot

"You're not gonna sell this illegal move with more of your baseless fear-mongering

The democrats and republicans voting against the wall should all be charged with murder for each person killed by an illegal.  They are responsible for the deaths.

"So this illegal immigrant was arrested in 2017? Wouldn’t it have been better to focus on locking him up instead of locking up the kids in camps? I’m just a simple mind but it seems obvious that this is who should be locked up and not the children. Anyway

So would it have been better if it was an American who killed her? I’m far more worried about a fellow American killing me than an illegal immigrant. Stop trying to highlight every murder by an illegal immigrant to push your agenda!

So would it have been better if it was an American who killed her? I’m far more worried about a fellow American killing me than an illegal immigrant. Stop trying to highlight every murder by an illegal immigrant to push your agenda!

Sad for the loss of your daughter are the loss of anyone’s child to illegal invaders. We are Americans. The president is executing his responsibilities to the constitutional the United States.

Where was the illegal murderer from?  What country?  You know we grow our own criminals in this country.  We’re any of the kids killed inn school shootings?  I believe all of the shooters were born and raised in the United States.

An illegal immigrant is someone who failed to give government $1000 for paper to get his/her Visa. The wall is just to secure payment is all. The illegal that killed this person bought gun from a legal American citizen what gives.

An illegal immigrant is someone who failed to give government $1000 for paper to get his/her Visa. The wall is just to secure payment is all. The illegal that killed this person bought gun from a legal American citizen what gives.

"Democrats want open unsecured borders.  They also want no voter ID.  Democrats also know 8 in 10 legal and illegal immigrants vote for Democrats.   Democrats realized this affect in California elections...and now control that state.  Democrats cannot be trusted

IF YOU KILLED AN ILLEGAL IMMIGRANT THE DEMS WOULD DEMONIZE U

"I am very sorry and I respect everyone who has been hurt by a illegal immigrant but the killing in SandyHook

Not everybody's going to jump on here and say their family member was killed by illegal just to get attention

Many more lives have been killed by American white males in mass shootings than by illegal immigrants. If you would have declared a national emergency on the gun violence we would stand with you because that is a true national emergency.

"No trump is wrong and he can not be trusted to tell the truth any longer. Thousands of Illegal immigrant's cross the boarder at our check points every week right now

If families or mothers are called angel families & angel mothers of those killed by illegal aliens. What are the parents/families/mothers of those killed by American citizens referred to as? If ICE & Border patrol would do their jobs & if American citizens would stop using drugs & if companies would stop hiring illegals (like Trump) we wouldn’t have a problem. Five year olds killed at Sandy Hook & Vegas concert massacre & Parkland. What are these families called? SOL???

Talk about cherry picking. This happened on the day of the declared “national emergency”. Shame that this has so become the norm huh? Guess you guys would be disgusted if an illegal did it? But of course you’re not because this is usually committed by..................🤷🏽‍♂️🤷🏽‍♂️🤷🏽‍♂️ https://abc7chicago.com/amp/aurora-shooting-victims-identified-in-shooting-at-henry-pratt-company;-gunman-also-dead/5141841/

What about the “illegal immigrant” that shot all those people yesterday and ... oh ... this is awkward.  Fun fact: you are far more likely to be murdered by a Trump supporter than by an undocumented immigrant.

"The democrats and whosoever wanna have humanity and pity for these illegal immigrants please post your Name

Statistics show that both legal & illegal immigrants commit less crimes than native born Americans.

In Germany dies people about illegal immigrants too.

"39 mass shootings this year (4 or more people shot) none by illegal immigrants

"Can I asked how they were an illegal resident?? Did they over stayed their vacation visa like majority of the illegal immigrants? Did they travel over by planes or cross over at the port of entry with a granted visa to only visit and return after their purpose? If so

"Can I asked how they were an illegal resident?? Did they over stayed their vacation visa like majority of the illegal immigrants? Did they travel over by planes or cross over at the port of entry with a granted visa to only visit and return after their purpose? If so

I'm so sorry to all who have lost a family member because of an illegal!!  We need the WALL!!!

Terry G. Taylor if you are an American you will be chosen for the job after they have filled their illegal obligations.  They past really does repeat itself

Piper Tunno the shooters are either dead or in prison.  We have criminal citizens who are punished. We don’t need to add illegal criminals from other countries to the ones we already have.

There is no such thing as an illegal immigrant!! They are either an immigrant  !!! Or illegal Allen!!!! An immigrant is someone that has papers work Visa or the American government is aware they are here.  An illegal is someone that jumped the border and is hiding breaking the law.

There is no such thing as an illegal immigrant!! They are either an immigrant  !!! Or illegal Allen!!!! An immigrant is someone that has papers work Visa or the American government is aware they are here.  An illegal is someone that jumped the border and is hiding breaking the law.

There is no such thing as an illegal immigrant!! They are either an immigrant  !!! Or illegal Allen!!!! An immigrant is someone that has papers work Visa or the American government is aware they are here.  An illegal is someone that jumped the border and is hiding breaking the law.

"THE TRUE COST: See the Tragic List of Americans Killed by Illegal Aliens at a New Online Memorial.  Liberal media

How about a news feed where anyone who lost a loved one or had any criminal activity against them by an illegal start posting ...   we need a long run of reports to convince the everyday Americans!

Illegal immigrants are not trying to cross the border.  Migrants are.

Proud of our president he has been the one in only president who has made us promise's and has being true us the people of the United State's he has fault hard to get his promise's done and work's so hard around twenty hour's a day and is not except no pay for his hard work and you show me another president that would do this he is a caring person and he Love's the people of American if he wasn't then he would not try to help us and this is for our protection and to keep all the people that don't care if we live or die and how may president who has took and raised so much money and help our Veterans that has been looked over for many of year's now and they was left with out a home to live in and not the right medical treatment and our men and women in uniforms were over looked also and would let the Illegal come in the United State's and have more then us the people of the United State's would ever be able to get and me live here they should not be able to come over here and get the best of living and get to live in our houses when we have so many homeless people who live here and get no help when they can walk right in or country and have first choice on any thing we got it is pass the time we put a stop to it our people that live here and belong's here should have the choice over the people that don't belong here and they pay them to come over and live here for free and take away from us the American we have more people live's here now then need's to be here.i am proud of our president and I stand up for him and we pray for him daily and we pray for protection of our president and Vice President and all the family's who work in the White House along our president .

Sorry to hear... if the wall is already built and we have illegal immigrants inside of the country that is not the biggest problem because it is easy to find here inside the country and easy to deport...

I got no wall around my home and we leave the key 🔑 in the door 🚪. We’ve never had a break-in and there are no guns - Amazingly in Ireland 🇮🇪 we have little or no guns and no one carries !  Other then with a few Gangs with illegal Guns - who normally only shoot one another - we don’t fear people - or people with GUNS - because there are very seldom seen in #Ireland - no need for WALLS either ????

However the crime rate is lower by illegal immigrants than by legal citizens.

"The biggest problem in America is NOT illegal immigrants

And who would be the first to blame President Trump if an illegal killed one of their family members because a homicidal immigrant walked across the border without detection because there is no deterent like the wall.  Hypocrisy in the highest form Demwits!!!!

Any crime committed by an illegal immigrant is a crime that could have been avoided if our borders were secure and our immigration laws were enforced.

ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS ARE IN 4 WINDS CASINO I SEE THEM WHEN I GO THERE NON USE THERE PLAYER'S CARD  INSERT INTO SLOTS ...

"All celebrities who live in “ walled mansions “ should tear them down and erupt a sign out front that says “ All immigrants ( illegal only ) are welcome to come in

Cathy Rohrer-Mackenrodt  first illegal aliens not immigrants and 2nd even though this sounds crazy it's not illegal to be illegal in our country. It has always been they can only be deported if they commit a felony.

Cathy Rohrer-Mackenrodt  first illegal aliens not immigrants and 2nd even though this sounds crazy it's not illegal to be illegal in our country. It has always been they can only be deported if they commit a felony.

Cathy Rohrer-Mackenrodt  first illegal aliens not immigrants and 2nd even though this sounds crazy it's not illegal to be illegal in our country. It has always been they can only be deported if they commit a felony.

Most of the illegal immigrants have overstayed their visa’s.   How about you start there Mr. President?

"Illegal immigrants drive in America without insurance and cause accidents

If there were only ONE person killed by an illegal  immigrant; the (complete) security wall should be built!

The Las Vegas mass killer was an illegal immigrant? The Sandy Hooks mass killer was an illegal immigrant? Crazy and mentally ill people are everywhere amongst us. And at the top of the US government but it doesn't justify the fake demand for that wall

The Las Vegas mass killer was an illegal immigrant? The Sandy Hooks mass killer was an illegal immigrant? Crazy and mentally ill people are everywhere amongst us. And at the top of the US government but it doesn't justify the fake demand for that wall

its irrelevant whether the murderer was an illegal immigrant or not..

Democrats support 2 things: Obama and illegal immigrants who kill Americans. It’s who they are.

"YOU KNOW WHAT PEOPLE.... THIS BS OF USING ILLEGAL HAS GOT TO STOP.....ILLEGAL IS RHETORIC THAT SEEMS OFFENSIVE TO OTHERS....!!  I'D RATHER WE SAY..UNWANTED

"Benji Smith illegal immigrants is illegal already

"Benji Smith illegal immigrants is illegal already

Illegal immigrant is a Russian that overstayed his visa

"Why do we assume that every illegal immigrant climbed over the wall. I saw their make shift boats washed ashore in Florida one year? Pretty sure they weren't American and are now walking the streets of Florida! As a matter of fact all the hired help at Mar A Lago are illegal! Oh

"Why do we assume that every illegal immigrant climbed over the wall. I saw their make shift boats washed ashore in Florida one year? Pretty sure they weren't American and are now walking the streets of Florida! As a matter of fact all the hired help at Mar A Lago are illegal! Oh

Alejandro Sanchez  are you a illegal ?

Illegal drugs killed my beautiful young grandson. One of 135 that day. Why would you resist a President that wants to spare us from all this? Pray it is never your child Liberal.

An illegal immigrant gave me a blow job once while on vacation in Mexico it was excellent!!!!!!!! She didn’t speak English and I didn’t speak Mexican but she was beautiful and understood American currency. Overall a excellent cleaning lady on my all inclusive vacation

"Kelly Anders hopefully you realize that not all illegal immigrants are brown.  Also

Patty Bertocchini La Puma that is one officer who would be alive if that illegal immigrant wasn't in this country to begin with

"Patty Bertocchini La Puma lying liar. You are 100% wrong. One officer was killed by an illegal immigrant. One. I’m not defending it

Patty Bertocchini La Puma you people just dont get it we dont want the illegal immigrants here period.  I dont care if they kill people or dont if they ride around on your democratic unicorns and spread love lol they dont belong here BUILD A GIANT WALL ha ha not sure why the Democrats are so against securing our boarders oh I know because then they'd have nobody to vote democratic ha ha not sure how you people are going to handle 6 more years of TRUMP

"What most of Trump’s supporters need to understand is that illegal immigrants commit less than 1% of violent crimes in this country. 4 studies have been written

An illegal immigrant killed my friends 16  year old daughter Madison Wells from New Jersey this summer. She was stabbed several times outside in front of her aunt's house she went into the house collapsed on the floor bleeding out her father walked in shortly after her called 911 and she passed away as they were Wheeling her through the emergency room doors

"An illegal immigrant killed one of my friends

"Michael Collins if a 1000 of those stories came out a week would u change your mind??  You dont hear them because they are not allowed to report it was an illegal responsible for traffic fatalities. Where I am we have had 3 cases this week

We also should not give any illegal immigrant any kind of benefits or welfare I think this would turn away a lot of them from coming into the United States.

I live in Florida.  We are FLOODED  with illegal immigrants..its so bad .I got hit from behind  in my car .never had an accident  or ticket I been driving  since I was 16 now I am in my fifties..a illegal immigrant hit me from behind try to take off I chase him.and call the cops he had no license  or insurance..I had to claim the accident  to mine insurance company. They fix my car 4 months later I get a letter I being drop..this was Progressive Insurance Company..I was put in a hat a bozo company I never heard of pick me up I was considered a high risk..all because of an illegal immigrant

I live in Florida.  We are FLOODED  with illegal immigrants..its so bad .I got hit from behind  in my car .never had an accident  or ticket I been driving  since I was 16 now I am in my fifties..a illegal immigrant hit me from behind try to take off I chase him.and call the cops he had no license  or insurance..I had to claim the accident  to mine insurance company. They fix my car 4 months later I get a letter I being drop..this was Progressive Insurance Company..I was put in a hat a bozo company I never heard of pick me up I was considered a high risk..all because of an illegal immigrant

I live in Florida.  We are FLOODED  with illegal immigrants..its so bad .I got hit from behind  in my car .never had an accident  or ticket I been driving  since I was 16 now I am in my fifties..a illegal immigrant hit me from behind try to take off I chase him.and call the cops he had no license  or insurance..I had to claim the accident  to mine insurance company. They fix my car 4 months later I get a letter I being drop..this was Progressive Insurance Company..I was put in a hat a bozo company I never heard of pick me up I was considered a high risk..all because of an illegal immigrant

"My 18 year brother was killed by an illegal immigrant in 2005 who was high on drugs and drunk

"I can barely walk because I was tboned by a illegal alien

I'm so sorry for your loss Mr Ferguson I cannot  imagine  losing my daughter. But  I Iost my cousin on September 11th at the world trade center by terrorists. It's just not Mexicans that are coming here illegally it's other illegals  aswell from other countries. We need the wall built it's a loophole for anyone that wants to come to our country we need all the Mexicans and illegal immigrants to go back to their own country and  if they want to come here they have to do it legally bottom line

How many illegal immigrants committed mass murder or even murder as compared to home grown American men?  Let’s start by throwing you out!

One of sister's best friends was killed by an illegal immigrant.  There were 3 illegals in the car.  The driver never even slowed down at the stop sign on a side highway and was speeding.  He hit her while she was driving the speed limit of 65.  She was life watched but didn't survive long.  The 3 men weren't even injured.  They had no insurance and actually tried to hire an attorney to sue the husband of the woman he killed.  They got out of jail somehow and fled back to Mexico.  I always wonder how long it took them to cross back into the states and how many other crimes they've committed since then.

"My father was also killed by an illegal immigrant on February 17

"I can’t get over the fact because an illegal took your loved one makes your grief heavier then mine

"For every single American an illegal kills

"We buried my dear friends daughter last year . Illegal and 3rd time drunk driving offender here in California . 3rd time it took Ashleigh’s young life . Thank you Mr President . Now we tax payers are paying for his housing 

"20% of illegal immigration comes in through Mexico

Who's going to build a wall to protect all these innocent kids who are being killed at schools or a wall to protect all the innocent people at there work place or a wall to protect all the innocent people who goes to the movies or nite clubs? Because it WASNT AN ILLEGAL IMMIGRANT who killed them!! IT WAS A LEGAL US AMERICAN who killed them innocent lives!!

"I have a friend whose grandson was just struck while riding his bike by an illegal driver who was drunk.  He survived

One death of any American by an illegal is 100% one too many. It should be ZERO! These Americans should be alive today. Once again Democrats have blood on their hands. If they aren’t murdering full term babies they are leaving us wide open for the taking! Build the Wall! Stop these Democrats and their Anti American Agenda!

Yes everyone knows that..has nothing to do with disliking immigrants..it's the ILLEGAL one's..do the proper process and there is no issue at all

This is tragic and I pray for the father & his family.  Spreading hate and fear that all illegal immigrants are dangerous is also disgusting though...

I knew somebody who was killed by an illegal immigrant too. The murderer was from Canada!!! We need a wall for our northern borders too! Keep Canadians out! Build that Wall build that Wall build that Wall!

The politicians in DC are insulated from this.  If Nancy Pelosi or Chuch Schumer child were killed by an illegal.  I wonder what they would think them?

Illegal drugs killed mine 👺🙈🙊🙉Fake media and uncaring Demolition Dems haters of Justice & citizens & security sanctuary for illegals and homeless & criminals 👹👺🤷‍♀️what can we do these fools are evil

Agree...build the damn wall.  One murder from an illegal is one too many.  🇺🇸

Why do Democrats idolize and protect illegal alien killers?

Every single one of you people are of illegal ancestry. None of you are legitimate.

Behind you 100 % illegal. immigrants need to come in the right way . Democrats need to wake up on this issue. And the drugs that are comming in.

The time has come to end illegal immigration

"You see it all most everyday were illegal kills 

"If everyone  wants  to  see  results  start flooding  the  democratic leadership in the Congress and Senate members with e-mails and  phone calls  pointing this out.  Next election  time  reminded  them of  their  complicity in the  deaths  at the hands of  illegal people at the  polls

If the illegal population voted Republican guess how fast an armed electric fence with a mine field would be built........

For every American killed by an illegal alien a Democrats family should pay the price. It's all about bringing it home to these untouchables and balance.

What if we make being an illegal immigrant a capital offence? You have 30 days to buy a ticket and go home.

"These killers ...They are not illegal immigrants

Keep the illegal immigrants out!!

"Disgusting how an illegal immigrant kills a human being and basically gets off scott free and  a friend of mine who was a homeless vet with mental issues and PTSD attempts to kill a guy in California

If we keep giving illegal folks welfare they will keep coming.  Take away the incentives to come the wrong way. Give incentives to those who do it right.

An illegal immigrant cut my lawn we dont need a wall

Charles Landry this is not proof of need for a wall. Illegal immigration happens primarily through Visa overstays and the other issues we have with border security are also largely through ports of entry. This is intended to bolster unthinking response by people who have poor critical thinking skills. It is transparent fear mongering.

An illegal immigrant killed my father in 1991.

"An illegal immigrant killed a friend of mine.  He was driving without a license and ran a stop sign.  My friend on his motorcycle hit the side of the van and was killed instantly.  He had no license

Great. Waste beelions on a wall that the illegal immigrant probably flew over.

And no one has killed an illegal immigrant in the US

Okay why don't you do the same post for white kids killing each other due to your stupid gun laws. Oh because the NRA paid you and you don't want to admit the real threat is guns in the US. Actually look at statistics of crime who commits the crimes sorry but it ain't immigrants or illegals because you don't understand the situations that people come from or why they are illegal. For them its sorry you can't enter this country because the USA decided to destroy your country causing all government bodies and data they held about you to  be destroyed as well a lot of the people that would provide the proper paper work are dead or have fled. So after you risk your life escaping a war torn hell none of you will understand or have any sympathy because we fear everything especially if its different . sorry conservatives but apparently you are more fearful than less conservative minds. Don't worry there's not a illegal hiding in ya cupboard Obama put there. Don't forget Jesus was a refugee

Okay why don't you do the same post for white kids killing each other due to your stupid gun laws. Oh because the NRA paid you and you don't want to admit the real threat is guns in the US. Actually look at statistics of crime who commits the crimes sorry but it ain't immigrants or illegals because you don't understand the situations that people come from or why they are illegal. For them its sorry you can't enter this country because the USA decided to destroy your country causing all government bodies and data they held about you to  be destroyed as well a lot of the people that would provide the proper paper work are dead or have fled. So after you risk your life escaping a war torn hell none of you will understand or have any sympathy because we fear everything especially if its different . sorry conservatives but apparently you are more fearful than less conservative minds. Don't worry there's not a illegal hiding in ya cupboard Obama put there. Don't forget Jesus was a refugee

Ok fucktard because ONLY illegal immigrants kill?!? What about all these Americans Killing Babies!!!

We have enough problems with our own criminals! We don't need illegal criminals to compound the problem

Should have never happened 😡 opposers can say what they want ...but the facts remain- if this illegal wasn’t here she would still be alive! How we spend billions on taxpayer funded abortions but can’t find 5 to build a wall infuriates me!

That’s a tragic case but if we want to stop illegal immigrantion wouldn’t it be smarter to have an effective solution utilizing surveillance (like drones with thermal imaging) instead of a wall that will take forever to build and which the experts say will not be effective?

Would LOVE to see the statistics of how many people died from mass shootings versus being murdered by illegal immigrants.

"An illegal  boy 

Illegal immigrants commit murder so do American citizens. #Donthecon

"I think illegal immigrants are the scourge of all our countries 

round up all the illegal Aliens and detain the ones who allowed them to enter and stay.

Build that wall! An illegal killed my 11 year old nephew also.

An illegal alien who had been deported 7 times killed my best friends ONLY child along with another young girl that night. He simply just snuck back in every time. Can’t help but wonder if it hadn’t been so easy to sneak back in if those poor girls would still be here.

I  was  ın  usa  2006  and  went  to  a  ba r and  speak  some  mexıcans  tehy  tols  me  california  belongs  to  mexıcan  not  Americaan  they  said  we  hate  Americaans  and  şn  war  tehy  killed  us  and  all  my  frinds  used  to  delıver  pızza  and  they  gor  rapped  buy  black  whıte  puoetırco  guys  mexicans and  whıte  americans  and  beated  so  bad  woke  up  8  day  later  some not all imigrants bad some ok but americans treaht immigrants bad if you illegal nad shoud know U.S. has air base allmost evwry country and you have no choıse to say no?.....????

I'm sure if a family member of theirs was raped or tortured or murdered they would be singing a different tune! They're only concern is for their own agenda! They do not care about the American people one iota! It sickens me that innocent lives are destroyed by the illegal actions of these illegal immigrants! I am so sorry to anyone who has been affected by this travesty of justice.

I'm sure if a family member of theirs was raped or tortured or murdered they would be singing a different tune! They're only concern is for their own agenda! They do not care about the American people one iota! It sickens me that innocent lives are destroyed by the illegal actions of these illegal immigrants! I am so sorry to anyone who has been affected by this travesty of justice.

YES BUILD THE WALL NO MORE ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS

Send all illegal aliens back and their anchor babies

An illegal imigrant killed a girl in my home town and forever changed the life of another!

"Why didn't Trump build a wall two years ago when he had a majority in Congress...Because it was not an emergency. Illegal border crossings and apprehensions have been declining for nearly two decades

But all who live in america are illegal immigrants except ppl who have indian roots 😉

Uh I'm sure 1000x more daughters are killed by legal citizens than are killed by illegal immigrants.

And another illegal killed a girl 27yrs of age

The illegal alien was drunk and driving a stolen truck running people off the road. My uncle was coming home from the grocery store. This should never of happened.

An illegal immigrant killed my Uncle. Had been deported twice.

NOT ALL ILLEGAL IMMIRGARNTS ARE THE SAME🤦‍♀️🤦‍♀️

An illegal alien bastard murdered my godson.  May all MS-13 animals rot in hell.  I stand with the President.  BUILD THE WALL...and crime will fall.

Are you fucking kidding me we give illegal immigrants 155million  a year in welfare.

Illegal immigrant saved the life of two police officers in Houston pulling them out of a burning squad car.

Liberals care more for illegal invaders and criminals than Americans.  Thank GOD for President Trump!  MAGA

"This is disgusting abuse of facts. Illegal immigrants have lower crime rates than Americans. To single out specific cases

KEEP UP THE HARD WORK PROTECTING AMERICAN CITIZENS MR. PRESIDENT!!!  we the people who voted you in office WANT OUR BORDERS PROTECTED... OF COURSE THE LEFT WILL GO AGAINST ANYTHING YOU WORK HARD TO MAKE HAPPEN! #MAGA No family should lose a loved one bc an illegal alien killed their loved one!!!

"Here in Germany we have thousands illegal migrants... Its not nice

Every death of an American by an illegal immigrant is on the hands of the Democrats.  The truly sad part is that they don't care.

Should of moved back to Europe. She woulda still been alive. Oh well another illegal European gone.

Illegal immigrant commit a crime: we need a wall kick all of them out White boys shooting up schools: He was a lonely boy he just needed a hug.😐😐😐

The vast majority of illegal immigrants that cross the southern border enter this country do so in cars through ports of entries how is the wall going to stop them?

Some of you are just missing the whole point of the fact illegal means illegal no matter if they are killers or sweet little old ladies...ILLEGAL means they are not supposed to be here without going through the immigration laws and procedures...smh

Some of you are just missing the whole point of the fact illegal means illegal no matter if they are killers or sweet little old ladies...ILLEGAL means they are not supposed to be here without going through the immigration laws and procedures...smh

"The Great Hoax of Open border (ILLEGAL) Immigration Policies will be exposed by history as one of the most evil and corrupt actions by our Capitalist Political Establishment. It benefits those with capital who want to employ cheap labor. Our middle-class and low income disproportionately suffer the ill effects and social burden of this sick self serving policy. That’s assuming all illegal immigrants we welcome here aren’t criminals but just good people appreciative of the opportunity to bare racial and economic discrimination for the many opportunities USA provides. Criminals

"The Great Hoax of Open border (ILLEGAL) Immigration Policies will be exposed by history as one of the most evil and corrupt actions by our Capitalist Political Establishment. It benefits those with capital who want to employ cheap labor. Our middle-class and low income disproportionately suffer the ill effects and social burden of this sick self serving policy. That’s assuming all illegal immigrants we welcome here aren’t criminals but just good people appreciative of the opportunity to bare racial and economic discrimination for the many opportunities USA provides. Criminals

And what about all the illegal immigrants working at your hotel's you're a moron. #donaldtrump

This illegal should be hung !

Okay you got one illegal immigrant against 20 homegrown American terrorists how is the wall going on protect you

"Build the wall and in same time sand all illegal immigrants back where they come from. You will see difference in over economy. Unemployment O

Create an executive order that all democrats have to tear down the walls around their homes and must accommodate illegal immigrants.

my heart go out to you but how did the Illegal immigrants get in the country I bet it was at the point of entrance

"Having illegal immigrants in our country has gone long enough. We’ve lost a lot of good Americans because these dirty/filthy illegal immigrants that wants to damned this great nation of freedom

"Having illegal immigrants in our country has gone long enough. We’ve lost a lot of good Americans because these dirty/filthy illegal immigrants that wants to damned this great nation of freedom

"An illegal from El Salvador murdered my cousin

We need the wall but we need to staff our wall with our military men and woman. If they attempt to cross our boarder we have every right to eliminate that illegal immigrant to extent of power we need to use up to and including death

"Dems seems to forget about all the people affected by illegal immigrants. From murders

So because most shooters are male and white - all white men on round the clock surveillance and barred from ownig weapons then? A white man strangled his whole family here in Colorado and there’s much more problem with American terrorists then illegal ones.

They are illegal aliens

An illegal alien killed my niece.

"They haven't only killed but raped pillaged and plundered their way across America. Sure there are some decent ones. But when a child of illegal parents tell me this is their country and it doesn't belong to me or any American my blood boils. That they have the right to be here. Its their country

2020 Trump & BEYOND. Enough with all the illegal invaders build the wall and send all them back......

Illegal aliens people they are not  immigrants.

"A illegal immigrant killed my friend georgia

"🐷""An illegal immigrant...""😂😂😂👉🐽"

illegal killers

"Do not use the same emotional appeal bullshit the liberals use to further your agenda!   Focus on the financial cost of illegal immigration

Illegal ALIEN; not immigrant.

Dawn Joseph-Hernandez not the point idiot illegal why cant you idiots understand illegal is against the law

Dawn Joseph-Hernandez not the point idiot illegal why cant you idiots understand illegal is against the law

and to respond to Jay Lytle! you are illegal!!! you live on stolen lands from true americans that are struggling on reservations now! Wake up!

because he was killed by a illegal alien does not make him special cause pet capita more nin illegals kill then illegal. you guys are just pawns of trump. he didnt give a hoot who died in cgarkittville..but if it's an illegal alien he uses it for his agency. he sargued nothing a tear after parkland but that would not mean anything to his base Wake up

because he was killed by a illegal alien does not make him special cause pet capita more nin illegals kill then illegal. you guys are just pawns of trump. he didnt give a hoot who died in cgarkittville..but if it's an illegal alien he uses it for his agency. he sargued nothing a tear after parkland but that would not mean anything to his base Wake up

because he was killed by a illegal alien does not make him special cause pet capita more nin illegals kill then illegal. you guys are just pawns of trump. he didnt give a hoot who died in cgarkittville..but if it's an illegal alien he uses it for his agency. he sargued nothing a tear after parkland but that would not mean anything to his base Wake up

If an illegal kills my daughter I will be killing the socialists just a heads up

"Sad when we loose our family members to ILLEGAL imagrants! Even worse when polosi and Schumer Cortez 

BUILD THAT WALL MR PRESIDENT!  THE BEST AND MOST TRUSTWORTHY PRESIDENT WE HAVE EVER HAD! WHEN YOU SAY YOUR GOING TO DO SOMETHING YOU ACTUALLY DO IT! I GIVE YOU SO MUCH CREDIT TO ACTUALLY HAVE TO FIGHT WITH OUR OWN GOVERNMENT TO KEEP OUR CITIZENS SAFE! THE DEMOCRATS ARE MORE WORRIED ABOUT ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS GETTING TREATED BETTER THAN OUR OWN AMERICAN CITIZENS!  YOU DEMOCRATS MAKE US ALL SICK! AND FOR THE DEMOCRATS BACKING THE NEW GREEN DEAL! YOU HAVE TO BE KIDDING ME!  WAKE UP THIS ISNT A FAIRY TALE YOU MORONS!

We do not need the wall! If it’s drugs coming in your worried about? That’s our problem because that wouldn’t be a problem if Americans didn’t BUY the drugs. Illegal immigrants killing people? Yes it’s bad but Americans kill more Americans than illegals do. Why don’t we make it easier to become legal so that the people who are good people wanting a better life don’t have to wait 10-12 years to come in legally. Fix America and the other issues will be way easier to fix

All of you crying over illegal immigrants killing someone you know but what about all of the Americans going to schools and killing your children?? What is done about that? More Americans kill each other than illegal immigrants kill Americans.

All of you crying over illegal immigrants killing someone you know but what about all of the Americans going to schools and killing your children?? What is done about that? More Americans kill each other than illegal immigrants kill Americans.

Wall border wall we need to secured citizen safety. Let keep america safe and secure against illegal immigrant

How about coming down on the people who Hire the illegal people.  I think there are more white middle age nuts killing people we just had another nut job shoot up a place of business in Aroura  Illinois this pas t week end.  A wall did not stop that.

The only thing that stopped the Mongols was the GREAT WALL OF CHINA!  The Chinese know walls work!  The DemocRATS just want a fresh supply of cocaine and drugs and new illegal voters!

Even I am a founder of Amerasians Without Borders organization but I support the BORDER WALL.  A BIG FAT YES for the WALL A BIG FAT NO for ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS

now idiots finally get illegal immigrants bravo you finally used your brain good job you won the special medal badge award.

Let them all come here because it is so many illegal immigrants here already and we can just move Americans to beautiful Mexico and take over there

"Omg why are you people so stupid? It makes me ashamed of you all. Engineers have said time and time again that this wall is not going to work to even be a wall much less an illegal immigration deterrent. 5 billion dollars is not even going to cover a portion of it. He has hired contractors for estimates

"No such thing as illegal they are invaders

An illegal alien from Mexico tried to murder me. Build the wall!!!!!! #MAGA #KAG

"An illegal from Mexico killed my only brother 

Here in carson city NV an Illegal Immigrant was going around murdering random people. He would get into a house and shoot them. The wall needs to be built!!

We need to deport every illegal MF out of this country.

I had my identity stolen by an illegal immigrant.   There are companies that help them and give them our social security numbers .   Gotta be a whole lot of them coming in if they actually have entire companies dedicated to helping them go undetected

"I used to live next door to a lady that had three little boys. She was a white American Woman but she dated a lot of illegal immigrants later I found out that she was involved in helping them

"its sad but has nothing to do with illegal immigrants

When an illegal kills a US citizen they should be shot ASAP.

"Trump actively hires illegal immigrants at his properties. Republicans are hypocrites. They say they’re anti abortion

"Approximately 50% of 'illegal immigrants fly into the US. About 90% of imported drugs arrive by sea. No wall has ever worked

Build the fucking wall and stop illegal aliens.  #Trump2020

"Many of the people who oppose the border security in other words the wall are too ignorant to comprehend the dangers of what I call free-range illegal immigrants! Until something devastating happens to them or their family they'll never get the complete and full picture. They see these jelly brained corrupt politicians such as Pelosi and Schumer speaking on how cruel and inhumane it is to separate families at the border

Next time an illegal kills a US Citizen I propose that Pelosi and Schumer be charged along with the murderer. Time them two anti American domdsic terrorist learn the consequences of their stupidity

These are family units running from a war. Y'all forget forgiveness my wife and kids where hit by a illegal immigrate and he walked with out a signal charge yes I was mad but you have to remember it was a accident!

I WANT TO ASK EVERY LIBERAL DEMOCRAT A VERY SIMPLE QUESTION IF WE SPEND 8.8 BILLION DOLLARS ON A SECURE BORDER WALL AND IT PREVENTS YOUR DAUGHTER FROM GETTING RAPED AND MURDERED BY AN ILLEGAL IMMIGRANT WOULD IT BE WORTH IT SEARCH YOUR HEART PLEASE RESPOND TO THIS QUESTION  THANK YOU 8

bro bro ok y’all targeting immigrants but if a white man did it trump nevaa would’ve posted this like damn are yhu guys this blind??? Wendi DelValle And yea Srry he got shot but If a white man shot him yhu wouldn’t have pointed out that he was white T or F ???issa rhetorical questions Thassa fact sis ion care what nunna y’all say he’s notta good president or mothafuckin person and also I just noticed yhu said “illegal immigrant” uhm ma’am if he’s an immigrant he’s illegall 😆 all yah bitches supporting him gon realize one day

"Everyone who’s turning the wall into a race related topic is a moron! It’s to stop illegal immigration

We need to understand that illegal immigrants are mostly coming here for work and are hired and paid cash under the table.  Those are the criminals... I wish Trump would address that issue instead of just building a wall.

We can’t go into Mexico or any other country without a visa we would be thrown out. The point is lawless people don’t give a dam about doing the right thing. They will continue to break the laws and to those opposing the wall when illegal immigrant commits a crime against your love one you might never get the reason for security. So how’s about not locking your homes door or car let’s see what happens to you.

"This ""#Fakecrisis"" started back during the Eisenhower administration folks.. Deportations happened then when it was found to be a problem on our borders. Operation Wetback. Look it up. It's been a crisis ever since.. Since then we've had an issue with illegal immigration and its been getting worse every year. President Donald J. Trump is the only one besides Eisenhower who has had the gonads to do something about it. But.. All of a sudden it's called a ""fabricated crisis"". Most of congress.. Democrats AND Republicans are being paid off by various organizations to stop the border wall.. Albeit drug cartels

Angel Parents! Our Hearts go out to you!  May God Bless You and bring you Comfort. May His Strength fortify you! Build the WALL and send ALL the Illegal Aliens back to their country of natural origin!

Yep! I'm sick and tired of hearing about how illegal crime rate is getting lower or they commit crimes at a lesser rate then people born here. Here is the deal. The illegal crime rate should be ZERO. That is the only exceptable number. Why? They shouldn't even be here.

Yep! I'm sick and tired of hearing about how illegal crime rate is getting lower or they commit crimes at a lesser rate then people born here. Here is the deal. The illegal crime rate should be ZERO. That is the only exceptable number. Why? They shouldn't even be here.

What about all the other serious stuff going around right now killing more than a few from illegal Immagrants? What are you doing about that? Absolutely nothing! I feel bad for anyone killed for senseless reasons but we have much more going on that needs attention other than a wall that gives false sense of security!

What a lie Trump signed bill allowing million illegal communist south American 's to come to USA and never be deported Mr Trump walls derverison so Trump and other traitors screw USA flooding USA with commies south American 's

Gabe Hidasi it is ILLEGAL to come here illegally

"False logic. An illegal immigrant may harm your family and therefore we need a wall. It’s like saying you burnt the chicken and now I don’t like pizza. Yes

destroy those illegal migrants

We need to simply execute illegal criminals and deport the rest to the middle East!!!

"My family also lost a family member to an illegal alien and her American boyfriend.  He was murdered; shot point blank with their shotgun.  The illegal alien testified against her American boyfriend and she was set free

"My family also lost a family member to an illegal alien and her American boyfriend.  He was murdered; shot point blank with their shotgun.  The illegal alien testified against her American boyfriend and she was set free

"illegal alien

All the school shootings killed by not illegal immigrants!!

"Wake up Democrats ... any country on the world with 10 million illegal aliens ..  would be rioting 

How many people have been murdered by Illegal immigrants VERSUS How many people have been murdered by white Americans let’s say in the last 10 years? If you need tp let’s say 20 years? YOU ARE FUCKING MORONS FOR NOT KNOWING......FUCKING CRICKETS.....

Many Black slaves were killed by White Plantation Owner for years. In America someone is killed every minute in America. There are much mass killings done by white guys than illegal immigrants. Please let's keep it Real.

Mentally ill Americans are committing mass shootings killing kids and adults alike.  Why is Trump not concerned about protecting them?  Far more Americans are killed by the mentally ill with assault rifles than illegal immigrants.  Do some research and see for yourself.

They are not immigrants if they are illegal. Please no more PC terms. Call them what they are. Illegal aliens. They are not immigrants.

They are not immigrants if they are illegal. Please no more PC terms. Call them what they are. Illegal aliens. They are not immigrants.

"Yes. Except there is no such thing as an ""illegal immigrant"" because Persons Here Illegally (PHIs) are not ""immigrants.""  The faster we get everyone to call PHIs PHIs instead of ""immigrants"" the easier it will be to reduce the number of PHIs in the United States dramatically.  It's all in THIS BOOK. Every America who cares about secure borders should READ IT NOW:  http://www.amazon.com/Stop-Calling-Them-Immigrants-Illegally/dp/1973509075/ref=sr_1_1?ie=UTF8&qid=1550423658&sr=8-1&keywords=stop+calling+the+immigrants"

"Flint Michigan has poisonous water     White American terrorists kill far more Americans than illegal immigrants.        Hell

the policemen legally kill the blacks without a word for this phony pig. he's singing us here illegal immigration

I’m sorry but all illegal aliens aren’t criminals just look at that white guy yesterday killing five and wounding six. When is the Orange Dotard going to do something about that?

Illegal immigrants murdered my only.child 8 months ago.So yeah I'm ready to.put them on a big boat back to Satan land and sink it half way there - the patriots handling the operations of the boats.

They are illegal aliens. Stop calling them immigrants

"I just saw an illegal Honduran woman with two small children in tow. I ran like hell for safety

America used to be a great country but long time a go some white immigrants start crossing borders from  Europe then now they think   They own this country if you aré from Mexico and live in California Nevada Utah. Colorado all those states you are not illegal no one from Mexico is illegal on stolen lands

America used to be a great country but long time a go some white immigrants start crossing borders from  Europe then now they think   They own this country if you aré from Mexico and live in California Nevada Utah. Colorado all those states you are not illegal no one from Mexico is illegal on stolen lands

"Very powerful as are all the other families who have suffered a loss at the hands of a criminal out on bail no matter illegal or not. Unfortunately

for every person killed by a illegal immigrant then a pollies or their family member forfeit their life

Want to get rid of illegal immigrants? Get rid of the magnets that bring them here. Get rid of welfare.

It's not just a few  illegal immigrants This is just the beginning of mass migrations. Orchestrated and paid for by globalist and their agenda to check the power of the one remaining bastion of a free and flourishing Nation the USA. One look at all the turmoil in Europe and the upheaval this type of invasion has and is causing over seas. Should be enough for any rational intelligent individual to realize what's coming . But many of Americans have lost rational and intelligence instead they have become so lazy that they allow the state to think for them just like planned .

"I’m an illegal immigrant. I stole some white boys job (being paid under the table has its benefits)

Walls are not necessarily the best way to keep illegal immigrants out of the country

"I strongly feel that if Govenors / Senators /  Congressmen & Attorney Generals keep protecting criminals or Illegal immigrants that cause harm & crime to the people of the USA & keep protecting harboring the repeat offenders & aiding & abetting "" "" Sanctuary Cities or "" illegals "" regardless of nationality & the criminals & committing treason against the people of the USA... That the people of that State should file a Federal Class Action lawsuit & start a go fund me account to pay for it...  ;) just a thought... ;)   SHARE IT YOU AGREE OR IF YOU FEEL FROGGY..."

"This ""#Fakecrisis"" started back during the Eisenhower administration folks.. Deportations happened then when it was found to be a problem on our borders. Operation Wetback. Look it up. It's been a crisis ever since.. Since then we've had an issue with illegal immigration and its been getting worse every year. President Donald J. Trump is the only one besides Eisenhower who has had the gonads to do something about it. But.. All of a sudden it's called a ""fabricated crisis"". Most of congress.. Democrats AND Republicans are being paid off by various organizations to stop the border wall.. Albeit drug cartels

"John N Karen Morris ""Hello Homeland Security. I'd like to report an illegal alien. She lives at 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue

Daniel Alexander Allen are you mentally defective? We have sovereign countries for a reason. Illegal alien means you are not supposed to be here and don't just get to waltz your way in here.

Kris Landers that’s just stupid a person that’s not supposed to be in this country it is called a illegal alien that person should not be here to be able to drink to kill a person seems to me you’re not very smart actually the store owners fault also if she did not have a legal ID the store owner should be prosecuted and lose their liquor license to and get a fine but come onHopefully you don’t have that many rocks rolling around in your head

That's because he wasn't a pregnant illegal alien. They can get free Medicaid along with their anchor babies!

The problem is when the immigrant doesn't face any charges because they are here illegally.   My uncle was killed in aurora colorado. He was hit by an illegal alien who was driving drunk without a license. The courts commuted his ENTIRE sentence so that he could be deported. So he is probably in mexico drinking beers with his friends while my aunt and cousins have no father or husband.

An illegal alien driving a loaded simi ass-ended a line of cars stopped at a road repair who were waiting on the pilot car to get through. The older couple in the last car in line was smashed into a pickup. The pickup smashed into the back of a loaded cattle trailer and was deflected into the ditch. The older couples car was then smashed flat between the oncoming simi and the stopped simi and were killed instantly. The truck driver was an illegal and was burned in the crash. He was taken into custody and transported to OKC for treatment. There was never any news of what was done with him but I imagine he was released and hauled ass for Mexico leaving Americans with the medical bills and funeral expenses.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

President Trump please build the wall. Stop the alien invasion & secure America.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"There is no difference between an illegal alien & a Democrat.  Their ""kill record"" is sickening!"

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

Not illegal immigrant. ILLEGAL ALIEN

"An illegal alien (Honduran) kicked-in the door to my house and tried to murder my then-16 yr old son.  https://youtu.be/6h2qwAAge4c  A few years prior to that

I WAS BORN 1967 NOT ROSESWELL I'M ET ALIEN? BASKET CASE TWINS DEVIL MUST BEAN I CAME FROM HEAVEN OK AMEN MOTHER WELL DEAD

^^^* 'We'; {average American citizen's}... need to bring light to EVERY occurrence of an; 'Illegal Alien' murdering a 'American Citizen'.  And then make sure that the entire World knows.  That 'IT' 'IS' the unequivocally /and/ specifically that 'FAULT' of; 'Nancy Pelosi' / 'Chuck Schumer' /and/ Anyone that did not vote to fund the 'Border Wall'!!!!!! 　 *Through Their neglect... have the Blood of innocent people on Their hands!!!!!!! :'(  *> When will They {Liberal's} be prosecuted for; 'Complicit Neglect in conjunction of a Homicide'!?!?!?! >:(

GOVERNMENTS ABOUT TO DROP US ALL IN IT.  Like a juggler trying to keep several objects in the air at the same time - there goes the politicians of the ruling circus that governs this world.  Like clowns hiding behind their public masks - they are but court jesters ruling amidst a menagerie of their own making - as they try to keep so many different people's entertained they are running out of idea's to keep their many different alien patrons happy.  This human zoo from which they have removed the barriers that kept some sort of order - is now becoming a human jungle of wild beasts that are turning more and more on each other as the barriers no longer exist.  All their resources and restraints are being exposed as impotent - as resistance to them is growing by the day - a bunch of circus clowns and jugglers who cannot even keep order among themselves - as they have all been exposed as having their fingers in the till - sleeping with the enemy - and as perverted as is their main stream media mouthpiece acting blameless and preaching like a saint the 'Sermon on the Mount.' on the one hand - when they are all as corrupt as each other.  What's the odds that those clowning circus freaks of power are going to bring the global big top down?

"At least you didn't say alien

"I can barely walk because I was tboned by a illegal alien

Why do Democrats idolize and protect illegal alien killers?

For every American killed by an illegal alien a Democrats family should pay the price. It's all about bringing it home to these untouchables and balance.

An illegal alien who had been deported 7 times killed my best friends ONLY child along with another young girl that night. He simply just snuck back in every time. Can’t help but wonder if it hadn’t been so easy to sneak back in if those poor girls would still be here.

The illegal alien was drunk and driving a stolen truck running people off the road. My uncle was coming home from the grocery store. This should never of happened.

An illegal alien bastard murdered my godson.  May all MS-13 animals rot in hell.  I stand with the President.  BUILD THE WALL...and crime will fall.

KEEP UP THE HARD WORK PROTECTING AMERICAN CITIZENS MR. PRESIDENT!!!  we the people who voted you in office WANT OUR BORDERS PROTECTED... OF COURSE THE LEFT WILL GO AGAINST ANYTHING YOU WORK HARD TO MAKE HAPPEN! #MAGA No family should lose a loved one bc an illegal alien killed their loved one!!!

An illegal alien killed my niece.

"John N Karen Morris ""Hello Homeland Security. I'd like to report an illegal alien. She lives at 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue

Daniel Alexander Allen are you mentally defective? We have sovereign countries for a reason. Illegal alien means you are not supposed to be here and don't just get to waltz your way in here.

Kris Landers that’s just stupid a person that’s not supposed to be in this country it is called a illegal alien that person should not be here to be able to drink to kill a person seems to me you’re not very smart actually the store owners fault also if she did not have a legal ID the store owner should be prosecuted and lose their liquor license to and get a fine but come onHopefully you don’t have that many rocks rolling around in your head

That's because he wasn't a pregnant illegal alien. They can get free Medicaid along with their anchor babies!

The problem is when the immigrant doesn't face any charges because they are here illegally.   My uncle was killed in aurora colorado. He was hit by an illegal alien who was driving drunk without a license. The courts commuted his ENTIRE sentence so that he could be deported. So he is probably in mexico drinking beers with his friends while my aunt and cousins have no father or husband.

An illegal alien driving a loaded simi ass-ended a line of cars stopped at a road repair who were waiting on the pilot car to get through. The older couple in the last car in line was smashed into a pickup. The pickup smashed into the back of a loaded cattle trailer and was deflected into the ditch. The older couples car was then smashed flat between the oncoming simi and the stopped simi and were killed instantly. The truck driver was an illegal and was burned in the crash. He was taken into custody and transported to OKC for treatment. There was never any news of what was done with him but I imagine he was released and hauled ass for Mexico leaving Americans with the medical bills and funeral expenses.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

President Trump please build the wall. Stop the alien invasion & secure America.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"There is no difference between an illegal alien & a Democrat.  Their ""kill record"" is sickening!"

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

Not illegal immigrant. ILLEGAL ALIEN

"An illegal alien (Honduran) kicked-in the door to my house and tried to murder my then-16 yr old son.  https://youtu.be/6h2qwAAge4c  A few years prior to that

I WAS BORN 1967 NOT ROSESWELL I'M ET ALIEN? BASKET CASE TWINS DEVIL MUST BEAN I CAME FROM HEAVEN OK AMEN MOTHER WELL DEAD

^^^* 'We'; {average American citizen's}... need to bring light to EVERY occurrence of an; 'Illegal Alien' murdering a 'American Citizen'.  And then make sure that the entire World knows.  That 'IT' 'IS' the unequivocally /and/ specifically that 'FAULT' of; 'Nancy Pelosi' / 'Chuck Schumer' /and/ Anyone that did not vote to fund the 'Border Wall'!!!!!! 　 *Through Their neglect... have the Blood of innocent people on Their hands!!!!!!! :'(  *> When will They {Liberal's} be prosecuted for; 'Complicit Neglect in conjunction of a Homicide'!?!?!?! >:(

GOVERNMENTS ABOUT TO DROP US ALL IN IT.  Like a juggler trying to keep several objects in the air at the same time - there goes the politicians of the ruling circus that governs this world.  Like clowns hiding behind their public masks - they are but court jesters ruling amidst a menagerie of their own making - as they try to keep so many different people's entertained they are running out of idea's to keep their many different alien patrons happy.  This human zoo from which they have removed the barriers that kept some sort of order - is now becoming a human jungle of wild beasts that are turning more and more on each other as the barriers no longer exist.  All their resources and restraints are being exposed as impotent - as resistance to them is growing by the day - a bunch of circus clowns and jugglers who cannot even keep order among themselves - as they have all been exposed as having their fingers in the till - sleeping with the enemy - and as perverted as is their main stream media mouthpiece acting blameless and preaching like a saint the 'Sermon on the Mount.' on the one hand - when they are all as corrupt as each other.  What's the odds that those clowning circus freaks of power are going to bring the global big top down?

President Trump please build the wall. Stop the alien invasion & secure America.

"There is no difference between an illegal alien & a Democrat.  Their ""kill record"" is sickening!"

Not illegal immigrant. ILLEGAL ALIEN

"An illegal alien (Honduran) kicked-in the door to my house and tried to murder my then-16 yr old son.  https://youtu.be/6h2qwAAge4c  A few years prior to that

"John N Karen Morris ""Hello Homeland Security. I'd like to report an illegal alien. She lives at 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue

Daniel Alexander Allen are you mentally defective? We have sovereign countries for a reason. Illegal alien means you are not supposed to be here and don't just get to waltz your way in here.

Kris Landers that’s just stupid a person that’s not supposed to be in this country it is called a illegal alien that person should not be here to be able to drink to kill a person seems to me you’re not very smart actually the store owners fault also if she did not have a legal ID the store owner should be prosecuted and lose their liquor license to and get a fine but come onHopefully you don’t have that many rocks rolling around in your head

That's because he wasn't a pregnant illegal alien. They can get free Medicaid along with their anchor babies!

The problem is when the immigrant doesn't face any charges because they are here illegally.   My uncle was killed in aurora colorado. He was hit by an illegal alien who was driving drunk without a license. The courts commuted his ENTIRE sentence so that he could be deported. So he is probably in mexico drinking beers with his friends while my aunt and cousins have no father or husband.

An illegal alien driving a loaded simi ass-ended a line of cars stopped at a road repair who were waiting on the pilot car to get through. The older couple in the last car in line was smashed into a pickup. The pickup smashed into the back of a loaded cattle trailer and was deflected into the ditch. The older couples car was then smashed flat between the oncoming simi and the stopped simi and were killed instantly. The truck driver was an illegal and was burned in the crash. He was taken into custody and transported to OKC for treatment. There was never any news of what was done with him but I imagine he was released and hauled ass for Mexico leaving Americans with the medical bills and funeral expenses.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

President Trump please build the wall. Stop the alien invasion & secure America.

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"There is no difference between an illegal alien & a Democrat.  Their ""kill record"" is sickening!"

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

"So it is a competition?! One is not as bad as the other?! It matters when some son-of-a-bitch guns you down?! What an asshat! What part of ILLEGAL ALIEN border jumper

Not illegal immigrant. ILLEGAL ALIEN

"An illegal alien (Honduran) kicked-in the door to my house and tried to murder my then-16 yr old son.  https://youtu.be/6h2qwAAge4c  A few years prior to that

I WAS BORN 1967 NOT ROSESWELL I'M ET ALIEN? BASKET CASE TWINS DEVIL MUST BEAN I CAME FROM HEAVEN OK AMEN MOTHER WELL DEAD

^^^* 'We'; {average American citizen's}... need to bring light to EVERY occurrence of an; 'Illegal Alien' murdering a 'American Citizen'.  And then make sure that the entire World knows.  That 'IT' 'IS' the unequivocally /and/ specifically that 'FAULT' of; 'Nancy Pelosi' / 'Chuck Schumer' /and/ Anyone that did not vote to fund the 'Border Wall'!!!!!! 　 *Through Their neglect... have the Blood of innocent people on Their hands!!!!!!! :'(  *> When will They {Liberal's} be prosecuted for; 'Complicit Neglect in conjunction of a Homicide'!?!?!?! >:(

GOVERNMENTS ABOUT TO DROP US ALL IN IT.  Like a juggler trying to keep several objects in the air at the same time - there goes the politicians of the ruling circus that governs this world.  Like clowns hiding behind their public masks - they are but court jesters ruling amidst a menagerie of their own making - as they try to keep so many different people's entertained they are running out of idea's to keep their many different alien patrons happy.  This human zoo from which they have removed the barriers that kept some sort of order - is now becoming a human jungle of wild beasts that are turning more and more on each other as the barriers no longer exist.  All their resources and restraints are being exposed as impotent - as resistance to them is growing by the day - a bunch of circus clowns and jugglers who cannot even keep order among themselves - as they have all been exposed as having their fingers in the till - sleeping with the enemy - and as perverted as is their main stream media mouthpiece acting blameless and preaching like a saint the 'Sermon on the Mount.' on the one hand - when they are all as corrupt as each other.  What's the odds that those clowning circus freaks of power are going to bring the global big top down?

"At least you didn't say alien

"I can barely walk because I was tboned by a illegal alien

Why do Democrats idolize and protect illegal alien killers?

For every American killed by an illegal alien a Democrats family should pay the price. It's all about bringing it home to these untouchables and balance.

An illegal alien who had been deported 7 times killed my best friends ONLY child along with another young girl that night. He simply just snuck back in every time. Can’t help but wonder if it hadn’t been so easy to sneak back in if those poor girls would still be here.

The illegal alien was drunk and driving a stolen truck running people off the road. My uncle was coming home from the grocery store. This should never of happened.

An illegal alien bastard murdered my godson.  May all MS-13 animals rot in hell.  I stand with the President.  BUILD THE WALL...and crime will fall.

KEEP UP THE HARD WORK PROTECTING AMERICAN CITIZENS MR. PRESIDENT!!!  we the people who voted you in office WANT OUR BORDERS PROTECTED... OF COURSE THE LEFT WILL GO AGAINST ANYTHING YOU WORK HARD TO MAKE HAPPEN! #MAGA No family should lose a loved one bc an illegal alien killed their loved one!!!

An illegal alien killed my niece.

Illegal ALIEN; not immigrant.

because he was killed by a illegal alien does not make him special cause pet capita more nin illegals kill then illegal. you guys are just pawns of trump. he didnt give a hoot who died in cgarkittville..but if it's an illegal alien he uses it for his agency. he sargued nothing a tear after parkland but that would not mean anything to his base Wake up

because he was killed by a illegal alien does not make him special cause pet capita more nin illegals kill then illegal. you guys are just pawns of trump. he didnt give a hoot who died in cgarkittville..but if it's an illegal alien he uses it for his agency. he sargued nothing a tear after parkland but that would not mean anything to his base Wake up

An illegal alien from Mexico tried to murder me. Build the wall!!!!!! #MAGA #KAG

"My family also lost a family member to an illegal alien and her American boyfriend.  He was murdered; shot point blank with their shotgun.  The illegal alien testified against her American boyfriend and she was set free

"My family also lost a family member to an illegal alien and her American boyfriend.  He was murdered; shot point blank with their shotgun.  The illegal alien testified against her American boyfriend and she was set free

"illegal alien

How many kids  and people where killed by Americans how many illegals ran up in schools or churches or shopping malls compared to these Americans lol

^^^ but a wall will keep us safe from illegals

"Lisa Vocelka No you libtard you need to build that wall and evivt the illegals

Danny Jones $157 billion a year to support illegals vs $5 billion to keep them out is ok with me

Silvia Serra Lobo He has the facts illegals get benefits right away but Americans are on a waiting list . You get the facts 🇺🇸

Lynn Limauro Floyd So sad! God bless you! Illegal's need to be vetted! Build that WALL!

Timothy Kershner that doesn't mean every illegal is now ok. That is the 0000.1% of illegals.

Timothy Kershner Illegal's do NOT belong in this country...let alone killing ANYONE...

Kyle Callender UNFORTUNATELY MEXICAN MEN 1 MAN COMES FOR ASYLUM GETS IT. HE BRINGS ALL ILLEGAL FAMILY ACROSS BORDER THEY GO GET FOOD STAMPS MEDICAID ETC.....THEY DONT BOTHER LEARNING ENGLISH BECAUSE PPL OF EL PASO CATER TO THEM BUT WE AMERICANS GET DISCRIMINATED FOR NOT KNOWING SPANISH.  I CANT GET A JOB IN ALOT OF PLACES BECAUSE IDK SPANISH THATS NOT RIGHT?????? IVE HEARD SOME PPL ARE WORKING IN MALLS THAT DONT KNO ENGLISH IVE NOT SEEN THIS BECAUSE IF/WHEN I DO IM RAISING HELL. PPL NEED TO QUIT CATERING TO THEM. IF THEY MOVE TO HOUSTON OR DALLS THEY LEARN ENGLISH BECAUSE THEY WONT CATER TO THEIR ASSES. THIS IS REALITY. PPL GET PD LESS IN EP BECUZ ILLEGALS HURT OUR ECONOMY.  THEY WORK UNDER TABLE N SEND $$$ TO MEXICO N DONT PAY TAXES. THEY ARE ALL ON STAMPS N MEDICAID N KEEP HAVING ANCHOR BABIES WE TAX PAYERS SUPPORT.   I UNDERSTAND WHAT U R SAYING ABOUT ASYLUM BUT THIS IS HOW ISIS HAS GOTTEN IN USA. YES LAWS NEED REVISED N CHANGED BUT WE AMERICANS NEED TO TAKE CARE OF OUR OWN 1ST. IF WE DONT WHO WILL??? PRESIDENT TRUMP KNOS THINGS WE DO NOT KNO. TRUST HIM??? LISTEN TO HIM???? HES CHANGING ALL PORTS OF ENTRY FROM MEXICO IN TO TX WITH HIGHER TECHNOLOGY ALREADY. WE NEED THE WALL BECUZ DRUGS N ILLEGAL PPL COMING IN WHERE THERE IS NOTHING.....IM JUST SAYING I MEAN NO DISRESPECT.  ILL AGREE TO DISAGREE IM NOT TRYNA ARGUE I STICK TO FACTS N TRUTH.......YOUR HEART IS N RIGHT SPOT BUT AMERICANS 1ST!!!

The same thing happened to me from a man that was a US Citizen and serving in the military. The point is these things happen and the people doing so will be legal and illegal at a proportion relative to their portion of the population. Just as my situation does not mean that men in the military are bad your situation does not mean illegals are bad........only that the individuals that perpetrated this on us were bad.

Eddie Gonzalez no one wants illegals hear besides idiots

I've been saying the same thing except I'm saying trade the Democraps for the illegals and we would all be better off. After all the illegals are fleeing mostly socialist countries

I've been saying the same thing except I'm saying trade the Democraps for the illegals and we would all be better off. After all the illegals are fleeing mostly socialist countries

They are spending $192 MILLION for a facility for illegals.  This is outrages.  Send them home!

Renieri Ortiz Illegals aren't immigrants you absolute fool.

Daniel Alexander Allen How Many illegals should we deliver to your door. I am tired of them. It pulling they’re weight here in America.. Let them get in line and come in the legal way. https://www.watchdog.org/national/reports-illegal-immigrants-receiving-medicaid-costs-taxpayers-billion-annually/article_6a9860a6-d0bd-11e8-92ed-5bca8b2d3b38.html?utm_medium=social&utm_source=facebook&utm_campaign=user-share

200 a day? I call BS on that. The numbers of illegals crossing are way down from a decade ago according to the immigration and security services. This is BS

Kris Landers so those who befriend or stand behind illegals are to blame for illegals actions? I like that idea.

Kris Landers so those who befriend or stand behind illegals are to blame for illegals actions? I like that idea.

"Joseph Roy  it had to be Fox News 😂. Realistically tho are you stupid to the point where you believe rape will end in the us after all the illegals are gone? Will there still be innocent people getting shot by police

Deport the rednecks keep the illegals.

Many States have a 2x - 3rd jail. It helps until someone gets out. It's an addiction and needs treated as such. But it takes like all addictions. The addict has to work hard at staying sober for life. It's a decision with prayers. Illegals need to stay out of America period. They should be tried for murder ..

Jo Sechi Surely you're not implying that deaths caused by illegals are less significant because they are fewer than gun related deaths? And to go all the way back to 1968 to inflate the number? How many gun related deaths last year? This year so far? How many of those are outside Chicago? Don't preach to me about gun control. The number of American babies murdered since 1968 far outnumber the American lives lost to guns. SIT DOWN.

An illegal grown man punched my 3 yr old granddaughter in the face.  A different illegals 9 year old daughter sexually assaulted my same granddaughter when she was 5. So I am strongly supporting this wall!

Seven percent of the illegals crossing our southern border end up in our prison's.  We don't need to import more problems !

Paul Baker pretty common knowledge that illegals rarely have a driver's license and insurance.

I just don't understand how American people can feel more sympathy for illegals than their own fellow Americans. Pretty sure the left is totally anti everything American :(

"140 Democrats last week voted against a resolution in Congress condemning the act of allowing illegals to vote in our elections.. While they've been screaming foreign interference

"The democrat communists lure the illegals and when they are here they find out it was all a lie

Angel Neavin Im sorry to hear that and hope they are ok. When I was 14 years old a car load of illegals had been drinking and they ran into my cousin and her friend (in Texas) who were on a motorcycle. They were killed.

Charlesetta Brown but we can spend a hundred and forty billion dollars a year on Medicare Medicaid food stamps whatever you want to put to it 4 illegals in this country?

"Pay attention please.    Experts have reported that  ""The Wall ""  will not keep out illegals.  Therefore

Charlesetta Brown r u crazy one crime ? Open yoyr eyes . There is crime by the hour from these illegals. Not to mention these drugs are kids are getting from them. You people need to wake up

"Charlesetta Brown there are tons of crimes by illegals that go unreported by media. And

Republicans are murdering exponentially more people by denying the affordable health care and drugs than people being killed by illegal aliens. I'm sure most killings by illegal aliens are domestic or murders of people they know. Illegals aren't running around shooting people for the hell of it. But stupid Trump followers believe what ever the orange toad tells them.

Estefania Torres Restrepo A Wall will keep out hundreds of illegals. Then more attention can be given at legal ports of entry to stop drugs flowing into the country. More people could be after the over stayed visa people.

Dee Dee Kelly Colvin its sad that there are SO many illegals here

Mike V. Radatti more Americans are killed by fellow Americans with guns than anything else including drugs from over the Mexican border and illegals put together

I understand all this and not  trying to cause any arguments. But of his reasons is illegals killing Americans well there are a lot more Americans killing Americans than Illegals killing Americans just makes no sense that's all. And as Rich as he is why doesn't he pay for his wall ?

I understand all this and not  trying to cause any arguments. But of his reasons is illegals killing Americans well there are a lot more Americans killing Americans than Illegals killing Americans just makes no sense that's all. And as Rich as he is why doesn't he pay for his wall ?

Sam North Obviously we can keep out our own citizens idiot but we can keep out Illegals! Did you even read how stupid your post sounded before you posted it? Did you mom tell you as she put you on the little yellow bus every morning that it was for the smarter kids at your school Sam? Like wow?

Mitch Haynie hey moron check the FACTS most illegals are visa over stayers that arrive on planes and boats not jumping over walls you fucking retard

"I am so sorry for your loss and others who have lost loved ones to illegals

Daniel Bremmer you actually think illegals trek thousands of miles with a ladder?

So sorry for you and your family's loss; perfect example of why we need a border wall and loopholes closed in the immigration system and stop illegals from flooding our nation.

Kimberly Mansfield  get rid of illegals and hey there a whole lot of extra money for mental health

"Paul Karachia if we didn't have to spend over 100 billion every year on illegals

It's sad the left cares more about illegals than the Angel mom's. You never see Angel mom's on CNN or other leftist news shows.

Tell that to the ranchers on the border whose property and homes are invaded regularly by illegals.

The spending bill should not have been signed. Too much money to support illegals and restricting where the wall is built.

It’s incomprehensible that Americans are actually fighting against keeping illegals out. What part of illegal do they not understand?

"Betty Jo Lollis thank you! I only shared so this way people know that MOST if not ALL illegals won't accept the word ""NO"" I have learned from this experience and I only hope that my story will entice others to break their silence too. It's ok to talk about it. It's a BIG problem amongst other things as well."

Just makes me so angry that our government turns a blind eye to american's and kisses the ass of illegal's just for there illegal vote. How can they even say this is a made up. I would never wish this on anybody but they just might have to walk in the shoe's of a family that lost a loved one when it could have been Prevented!.

"Americans face consequences.  Illegals get deported and come right back. And....what about all the children that get trafficked through that border?  Oh I forgot

Jim Acosta has the gall to  imply/say that the border situation is not a national emergency...........in front of ANGEL MOMS.......this weasel and his fake news pals are colluding with illegal aliens to provide more votes(voter fraud with drivers liscenses that shouldn't be issued to illegals in the first place) for demorats.

All this fear-mongering about illegals ... what about all the US Citizens pulling the same crap?

So what makes you think a damn wall will keep out illegals?

"SO it's a competition?! I s that  what your point is?! Or are you saying that crime by our own citizens justifies letting illegals border jumpers in?! ""Meaningful gun reform?!"" Exactly what is that?!  Most of the schools and mass shooters have obtained their weapons LEGALLY

Tell Pelosi/Schumer. It’s not ok for illegals to kill Americans just so they’ll vote for Democrats

Praying for All the Families that lost someone from these illegals! BUILD the WALL!

Seems like a lot of stories of illegals killing or other crimes against American citizens. Why don’t we have a “march” of all the victims and family of victims from illegal aliens. I bet it would be quite large.   That needs to be organized.

"Yes the problem is bigger than the Illegals

How many American citizens kill each other? Far more than illegals do.

What a horrible shame! And the taxpayers are saddled with paying for ALL the illegals living expenses! When is this going to end?!

"100 US citizens are the victims of violent crime at the hands of illegals every day  If one of your loved ones was a victim

I see this everyday hearing illegals tell me that the us pays there house cars and on food stamps.

"If you people think a border wall is going to keep illegals out

No Free Rides Act!  No tax refunds for illegals granted amnesty!

A wall will not stop illegal immigration ! If there’s a will there is a way! You think all illegals come from Mexico? You’re so misinformed !

Democrats don't care how many American citizens are murdered. Only worried about illegals who shouldn't be here in the first place but will somehow vote for them...smdh

"Dems care more about Illegals than US Citizens

Yes people we have several problems in this country mass shootings drugs illegal aliens and so on so forth.  We now have a president who is picking a problem and doing something about it.  Then we can move on to the next thing.   It may not be the fix all but even if it only keeps out half the drugs and illegal's that's a huge victory. Build to wall.

"I'm tired of illegals taking jobs from Americans for absolutely dirt cheap pay... The electrical field is hard work but people like my self are willing to work them. But we are tired of fixing their horrible work and not just bad

"Oh I can yes. But if we're an illegal who starts his own business and hires other illegals.... Or if you are a home owner looking for cheap labor because your don't make the most money in the the world. Then you hire a guy of Mexican decent but he speaks good English. Only to find his ""work"" is shabby at best and that that man is not even legally here...."

You can't tell me other wise that illegals aren't part of the problem when I personally have experienced the issue first hand.

I don't blame President Trump for calling the border an emergency. Too many illegals are killing innocent lives

Not all illegals are the same.

So sad. 💔 Stop protecting illegals and start protecting Americans!! Trump 2020!!!!

"Your loss is heart crushing.  I understand.  What I don't understand is WHY it is only the handful of victims killed by ""illegals"" are worthy of sympathy?  There are murder victims every day all over this country.  Families of those victims aren't deserving of notice because it doesn't further trump's agenda.  Why do other victims not matter?  They too are somebody's child/sibling/parent."

What about all those non illegals that murder like yesterdays shooting...how is a wall going to protect us. National emergency si gun control not trumps promised wall.

HISPANIC CHURCH DIVIDED BY THE COMMIES. GET ALL HISPANICS BEHIND THE RIGHT. NEW MEXICO IS LOSING ITS COUNTRY TO ILLEGALS FROM THE MIDDLE EAST.

Guns kill more Americans in a month than illegals did in 10 years. Can we address that real national emergency tyrant?

I just would like to have a hypothesis on what would happen if CNN had a bunch of illegals raped and murdered several of their reporters. Would they still be opposing President Trump and the wall? Could they even bring themselves to admit that President Trump is right?

How about we let the parents decide the punishment I would vote for that along with zero benefits I’ve been self employed all my life been thru some hard times was told sorry but your not entitled to benefits so you stop the damn freebies I’ll bet that would pretty much stop the flow of illegals if me as a citizen of this country can’t receive  any assistance than a non citizen sure as hell shouldn’t

And make Trump properties use it..how many Illegals did Trump have at his facilities?

"In fairness to all the Angel moms & dads whose children were killed by illegals who came into the country illegally

To all the people that want illegals in this country sponsor one put your money where your big-ass mouth is

John Fahrer vets will get help from the billions we spend every year on handouts to illegals.

Ok . ask pelosi and the lottery man what they think coz they don’t care! They care more about looking after the illegals

So sorry for your loss and everyones loss because of the invasion of illegals.  Every country on the face of the Earth requires foreigners to visit them legally.  It is insane liberal bullshit that has prevented us from securing the border. Trump has done what no president has done before.  He has taken his job seriously.....

Democrats only care about illegals.

Build the wall! The Democrats want open boarders and they obviously don’t care about the Americans getting killed by illegals. Wait until an illegal kills one of their loved ones then see how they feel!

Brandon Joseph Long  Mass shootings are minuscule compared to other murders and homicides done by illegals

Sad that you lost your daughter . I am praying something can be done in her name to ease the pain. Like building a wall so no one else will suffer at the hands of illegals .

"Ummmm......y'all do know that MOST illegals are people who overstayed their visas

Melissa Lamphere so what you're saying then is you want to foster/sponsor a family of illegals? Now remember no background check of any kind. Just open your door. Let'em right in to your home. I love how awesome of a person you are.

I just want to know why us citizens have to pay out of network when ALL ILLEGALS are OUT OF NETWORK And pay ZEROOOOOO   https://youtu.be/NgbQIJ5pUDk

"100 US citizens are the victims of violent crime at the hands of illegals every day  If one of your loved ones was a victim

...and democrats support these illegals!  Makes me sick!!!

Kenny Shuster no America says so.  If you want to keep on supporting the illegals invite them to your house

"However stats have proven over and over again that citizens commit way more crimes than illegals. I would think many of the illegals that do come here also get their guns here since it's so easy to do so. However I am against illegal immigration but the majority of our mass shootings are caused by white American citizens. President Obama deported more illegals than any other president. It's not the crisis that Trump's conning his base to believe. Stats show immigration from the southern border is the lowest in 50 years. Many of the suspected terrorist that have entered this country

"However stats have proven over and over again that citizens commit way more crimes than illegals. I would think many of the illegals that do come here also get their guns here since it's so easy to do so. However I am against illegal immigration but the majority of our mass shootings are caused by white American citizens. President Obama deported more illegals than any other president. It's not the crisis that Trump's conning his base to believe. Stats show immigration from the southern border is the lowest in 50 years. Many of the suspected terrorist that have entered this country

"However stats have proven over and over again that citizens commit way more crimes than illegals. I would think many of the illegals that do come here also get their guns here since it's so easy to do so. However I am against illegal immigration but the majority of our mass shootings are caused by white American citizens. President Obama deported more illegals than any other president. It's not the crisis that Trump's conning his base to believe. Stats show immigration from the southern border is the lowest in 50 years. Many of the suspected terrorist that have entered this country

How many times will the Democrats turn a blind eye to the needless deaths of American citizens in order to protect illegals?!

Thank you Mr President! Its too late for my husband who was killed by illegals and left to die on the road. Our family has been forever broken since. All in an effort so they can have a better life! What about ours? His? At what expense is it ok? Its not!!

The democrats don’t care about the victims of crimes comited by illegals to Americans

They have killed more with all the deadly drugs they bring in . Yes their not all bad but with the wall it will stop the madness . Trump is trying to make America safe again democrats are stopping it .  It’s very simple it wasnt very long ago with Obama     the Democrats wanted a wall to stop the illegals but now they are resisting because if trumps succeeds in getting a wall up and making America safe the Democrats will be on a sinking ship with a giant hole in the middle of it. The old schoolers need to look and see the  Democrat party they once believed in is long gone .  But they are lied to telling them Trump will take away Social Security and Medicare.  It’s a lie . Trump said you earned it . God Bless America and let’s come together as one .

"Every Single Democrat has Walls around their homes!! Along with Security with guns!! So they don’t live in the neighborhoods across our Country and they have Walls and Body Guards Many!! If they don’t believe Walls Works their houses wouldn’t just have Big Walls but unbelievable Security!! Also important information is their family is protected by their security and Walls! The Americans don’t Matter to Anyone of Them!! They have Their own healthcare not what every American has and can’t afford Medications ect.. Our American children Must Pay for Colleges but illegals don’t

This is to sad how many deaths of American Citizens need to happen and how much money do we need to give illegals before democrats wake up and realize without the wall Americans aren't as safe and are suffering the consequences of the Democratic decisons.. #AmericaFirst #BuildTheWall

These stories are heartbreakingly sad! Bless them in their grief! Build this wall now and secure our nation! Remove all incentives for illegals to come here now!

They are everywhere driving with no license. They have damaged two of my vehicles that I had to pay to repair. They do not even get cited and are released. I couldn't imagine losing a loved one. It is a huge problem and the cities and churches are conspiring to bring them here. Everyone pays higher insurance rates because of the damage they do. States ignore the fact that one legal person registers 100's of cars for them to drive. The corruption is disgusting. Ohio is overrun with illegals and I am sure most states are. I have few neighbors that speak English in Ohio.

How many more young women are killed by Americans than illegals?

Gabriel Anibal Toribio i saw 3 posts today of illegals killing anericans...i didnt bother tagging you..

"Walls won’t stop where illegals are the most coming in: Canada

How many illegals are committing all those mass shootings we hear about weekly. Aren't they just mostly citizens with guns.....duhhhhh

Never heard or read story about that... most of it is the illegals

"That estimate on what illegals cost this country appeared based on a paper by FAIR

"Only 30% of illegals get her through the border. The rest get here by over staying visas. Ask Trump what his plan is to stop that from happening. You want to stop illegals

"Only 30% of illegals get her through the border. The rest get here by over staying visas. Ask Trump what his plan is to stop that from happening. You want to stop illegals

The list goes on and on. Myself and two of my coworkers have been in accidents with illegals that fled the scene of property damage accidents. No recovery in any of the accidents. Build the WALL.

I just don't understand the Democrats and their coldness to these families who have lost loved ones to illegals.   I'm so sorry for all the losses and pray President Trump will get the wall built and our borders protected the way they should be protected.

If families or mothers are called angel families & angel mothers of those killed by illegal aliens. What are the parents/families/mothers of those killed by American citizens referred to as? If ICE & Border patrol would do their jobs & if American citizens would stop using drugs & if companies would stop hiring illegals (like Trump) we wouldn’t have a problem. Five year olds killed at Sandy Hook & Vegas concert massacre & Parkland. What are these families called? SOL???

It's literally a fact that native born people are more likely to be violent than illegals. Again I'm not for allowing a free flow of illegals. Just the statistics

It's literally a fact that native born people are more likely to be violent than illegals. Again I'm not for allowing a free flow of illegals. Just the statistics

I'd call millions of illegals here over the years a fucking crisis.wouldnt you.

Guns kill far more than illegals.

And how many illegals would you want in your house without your permission?!

"""If Americans who Hire harbor or give welfare to illegals were imprisoned for 5 years you would not need a wall or even a fence""﻿"

Wealthy people have walls around their mansions ~ of course walls work. There would be no angel moms if we had a border wall because illegals could not get in the USA to kill Americans. #BuildTheWallNow!

Mean while Cuomo is paying for illegals with our tax dollars! When will you people wake up already get these cronies out!

You should not have signed the Omnibus Bill that you just signed!  What were you thinking; this only made our battle worse and gave more rights to illegals.  Not happy with you Trump.  The wall is only one part of border security.

"#POTUS 45 💜 ITS YOUR MAIN DUTY! SWORN.! I WAS AFFECTED. BADLY BY ILLEGALS BUT I DID NOT DIE... OUT OF RESPECT FOR THE FAMILIES OF THOSE THAT PERISHED I WILL NOT LAMENT ABOUT MY INJURIES. HOWEVER

"Patty Bertocchini La Puma that only stands to reason because US citizens outnumber ILLEGALS like 20 -1 but let's not ignore the fact that they dont belong here and are a drain on taxpayers

Some of the points on here are good ones. But the big point that some don't want to see. If we was not spending billions and billions a year on illegals. That would be money that could be used to help people with medical issues. Help vets. Help the homeless. We are spending billions a year on people who have not brought so much as a soda pop In this country. As for the water in Michigan. It was a problem long before trump was elected. If the voters in Michigan would quit voting the same people in that got them in this mess. Just maybe things would get fixed. Your water problems are controlled by your local government not the president.

Americans kill Americans every day ~ are you going to build a wall to keep them away from law abiding citizens as well?  Not all illegals are bad but those are the only ones the news will tell you about ~ There are many who are honest people and want better

"liberals only care about illegals

Guns kills more people than illegals.  Doi.

All the democrats want to do is hesitate hasitate on doing anything to protect southern border from illegals an drugs But you know that they know its coming across an don't give a damn about stopping it.

Why do demos  give no credence to our America children. It just astonishing that they don’t give a damn about us & only want to Let in illegals. It must be all about votes. Vets homeless on streets that just ignore us & making Americans second on list. Vote red and remember what they are doing. Can’t get away with anything unless we vote them out.

This is why we need a wall. Here are some of the victims stories. Some of these people who are murdered were murdered by illegals who were previously deported. http://www.ojjpac.org/memorial.asp

I'm so sorry for your loss Mr Ferguson I cannot  imagine  losing my daughter. But  I Iost my cousin on September 11th at the world trade center by terrorists. It's just not Mexicans that are coming here illegally it's other illegals  aswell from other countries. We need the wall built it's a loophole for anyone that wants to come to our country we need all the Mexicans and illegal immigrants to go back to their own country and  if they want to come here they have to do it legally bottom line

One of sister's best friends was killed by an illegal immigrant.  There were 3 illegals in the car.  The driver never even slowed down at the stop sign on a side highway and was speeding.  He hit her while she was driving the speed limit of 65.  She was life watched but didn't survive long.  The 3 men weren't even injured.  They had no insurance and actually tried to hire an attorney to sue the husband of the woman he killed.  They got out of jail somehow and fled back to Mexico.  I always wonder how long it took them to cross back into the states and how many other crimes they've committed since then.

I am sorry sorry for your loss.  We are fighting as hard as we can to stop all of these illegals coming in and taking over our country and killing us right and left. God bless Trump.

We need more from many those have met the illegals.  Wake up everyone. Illegals and Muslims are the worse and we need protection from them.

We need more from many those have met the illegals.  Wake up everyone. Illegals and Muslims are the worse and we need protection from them.

Yes it is important if it’s the only way to stop the influx of illegals

"All the Dems care about is illegals

"Build the wall! The democrates ( Communist) hate conservative people.  I sick of them getting giving everything FREE! Illegals should never be allowed to vote! I have always had to show my drivers License every time I have voted 

Illegal drugs killed mine 👺🙈🙊🙉Fake media and uncaring Demolition Dems haters of Justice & citizens & security sanctuary for illegals and homeless & criminals 👹👺🤷‍♀️what can we do these fools are evil

"Too many lives lost at the hands of Illegals! From drugs

"Illegals don't belong here! We welcome immigrants coming legally! If they are coming illegally

Sad that so many have lost their lives. I pray that all illegals are removed before any more of our children are murdered & addicts get help before they are killed by these drugs flowing into our country. God Bless President Trump for taking the necessary steps when our traitor congress would not.

It'll stop the illegals that don't come thru to stop doing it..

Q1AWE ARE LOSING WAY TO MANY PEOPLE  BECAUSE ILLEGALS COMING INTO Ameria

I'm disgusted with you r president. The bill you just signed guts ice and helps illegals  https://www.breitbart.com/politics/2019/02/15/trump-decries-catch-release-while-expanding-release-illegal-aliens/

More American citizens kill Americans than illegals do ! FACT !!

A wall won't completely STOP the illegals from coming in but it will deter them and slow them down cause nothing is going to STOP them from coming in completely

"Every day illegals are arrested in Atlanta for stealing

Okay why don't you do the same post for white kids killing each other due to your stupid gun laws. Oh because the NRA paid you and you don't want to admit the real threat is guns in the US. Actually look at statistics of crime who commits the crimes sorry but it ain't immigrants or illegals because you don't understand the situations that people come from or why they are illegal. For them its sorry you can't enter this country because the USA decided to destroy your country causing all government bodies and data they held about you to  be destroyed as well a lot of the people that would provide the proper paper work are dead or have fled. So after you risk your life escaping a war torn hell none of you will understand or have any sympathy because we fear everything especially if its different . sorry conservatives but apparently you are more fearful than less conservative minds. Don't worry there's not a illegal hiding in ya cupboard Obama put there. Don't forget Jesus was a refugee

You want reroute wall money to help US citizens? How about we reroute the billions we give illegals instead. How about the billions sent abroad to our so called allies?  Im pretty sure there are tons of dollars wasted on non citizens every day. Why take away our shot at securing the border?

Reading thru these comments i can very well see why this country is in the shape its in .heres a man trying to make this country better and theres people on here acting like spoiled kids that refuse to admit hes doing a good job .its not just about killing or drugs or rape or draining our benefits programs .putting our hospitals in financial problems .drunk driving or even working and sending the money back to mexico and other places its all these and more .money that could help seniors .vets kids .drug addicts .single parents and to try and fix our health ins issues are going for  these illegals .not to mention so called border security. Do you people think they all go to points of entry to come in ?do you know how many miles are open for them to come in .stop and think people .some of you act like you know more about what goes on then people that work and deal with it every day .unless you know for fact dont try to act like it is .all of this dident just start been going on for years .Trump is the first one to care enough to try to stop it .and all the other issues you are bringing up give the man time .hes trying hes not only fighting the stupid democrats hes fighting fools like the ones on here

The reason why libs don't admit this as an issue is because they killed all of their children before any illegals got around to it.

Illegals are becoming US citizens now 🤣

BUILD THE WALL! See what's happening when we let illegals just walk in. We need to start caring for our own country. USA! USA! USA!

WHITE TERRORISTS DISRUPT AMERICAN LIFES MONTHLY... WHITE TERRORISTS HAVE KILLED MORE PEOPLE THAN ILLEGALS

We need one arround Puerto Rico to keep the illegals out😂😂😂

"Illegals coming into our country that add no value to our system

Me myself don't like my tax dollar going to support illegals jumping our boarders just for the free ride it has to stop

"A wall will not stop drugs and illegals

Build the wall! So many jobs and money wasted on illegals.

I have seen people driving whom cannot speak or read english and the signs are in English. I've seen them drive 18 wheel trucks and come and ask for directions how to go somewhere. Companies hire illegals.

"We have 30 million illegals here now

"Protect us from Russia then jerk. And btw without illegals

"ILLEGALS NEED TO BE DEPORTED FOR THIS STUFF!!  Not put in jail

I have more problems that would make people like you scream mama. But I' m a disabled vet who gave an oath to protect my country when only 18 and 40 years later that oath is as strong as then. You want to talk about money that could be used instand of a wall. Then lets take your money and pay for all the death cause by the illegals and for all the pain. Want about the over Crowded schools the medical thats payed for by the american tax payers. And don't forget the money that's payed out for the useless democrats in washington. Get some commen sence. Yours truly a real american and not some wimpy candy assed powerpuff snowflake fake american. 🤠🇺🇸😘.

"2/3rds of illegals came here legally and overstayed their visas

"Too bad we can’t trade all these families loved ones who are killed by illegals with family members of these democratic fucks. Hopefully these democratic fuckers lose their family members to illegals. Then maybe they’ll see why we need security. But I bet that AOC cunt could have her whole family raped

"Too bad we can’t trade all these families loved ones who are killed by illegals with family members of these democratic fucks. Hopefully these democratic fuckers lose their family members to illegals. Then maybe they’ll see why we need security. But I bet that AOC cunt could have her whole family raped

Sorry for you loss. Illegals should be deported immediately.

Illegals killing our people is only a very small majority why don't you people look at the facts

Ohh I am so sorry I am just 💓 broken and angry to keep hearing about these stories of families that are horribly hurt and affected by the awful illegals coming into OUR country.... BUILD THE WALL ... keep them OUT 😥

Sorry for all the loss of lives to our people.  The illegals shouldn’t have even been here....  we are just learning how corrupt many of our Congressmen/women and senators are...much of this death and dying is their fault for not upholding the laws of our land already in place..

"I pray that all you folks that support these idiots that are fighting Trump on The Wall never have to feel the horror of losing a child or any family member to violence or drugs brought here by these illegals

How many kids  and people where killed by Americans how many illegals ran up in schools or churches or shopping malls compared to these Americans lol

^^^ but a wall will keep us safe from illegals

"Lisa Vocelka No you libtard you need to build that wall and evivt the illegals

Danny Jones $157 billion a year to support illegals vs $5 billion to keep them out is ok with me

Silvia Serra Lobo He has the facts illegals get benefits right away but Americans are on a waiting list . You get the facts 🇺🇸

Lynn Limauro Floyd So sad! God bless you! Illegal's need to be vetted! Build that WALL!

Timothy Kershner that doesn't mean every illegal is now ok. That is the 0000.1% of illegals.

Timothy Kershner Illegal's do NOT belong in this country...let alone killing ANYONE...

Kyle Callender UNFORTUNATELY MEXICAN MEN 1 MAN COMES FOR ASYLUM GETS IT. HE BRINGS ALL ILLEGAL FAMILY ACROSS BORDER THEY GO GET FOOD STAMPS MEDICAID ETC.....THEY DONT BOTHER LEARNING ENGLISH BECAUSE PPL OF EL PASO CATER TO THEM BUT WE AMERICANS GET DISCRIMINATED FOR NOT KNOWING SPANISH.  I CANT GET A JOB IN ALOT OF PLACES BECAUSE IDK SPANISH THATS NOT RIGHT?????? IVE HEARD SOME PPL ARE WORKING IN MALLS THAT DONT KNO ENGLISH IVE NOT SEEN THIS BECAUSE IF/WHEN I DO IM RAISING HELL. PPL NEED TO QUIT CATERING TO THEM. IF THEY MOVE TO HOUSTON OR DALLS THEY LEARN ENGLISH BECAUSE THEY WONT CATER TO THEIR ASSES. THIS IS REALITY. PPL GET PD LESS IN EP BECUZ ILLEGALS HURT OUR ECONOMY.  THEY WORK UNDER TABLE N SEND $$$ TO MEXICO N DONT PAY TAXES. THEY ARE ALL ON STAMPS N MEDICAID N KEEP HAVING ANCHOR BABIES WE TAX PAYERS SUPPORT.   I UNDERSTAND WHAT U R SAYING ABOUT ASYLUM BUT THIS IS HOW ISIS HAS GOTTEN IN USA. YES LAWS NEED REVISED N CHANGED BUT WE AMERICANS NEED TO TAKE CARE OF OUR OWN 1ST. IF WE DONT WHO WILL??? PRESIDENT TRUMP KNOS THINGS WE DO NOT KNO. TRUST HIM??? LISTEN TO HIM???? HES CHANGING ALL PORTS OF ENTRY FROM MEXICO IN TO TX WITH HIGHER TECHNOLOGY ALREADY. WE NEED THE WALL BECUZ DRUGS N ILLEGAL PPL COMING IN WHERE THERE IS NOTHING.....IM JUST SAYING I MEAN NO DISRESPECT.  ILL AGREE TO DISAGREE IM NOT TRYNA ARGUE I STICK TO FACTS N TRUTH.......YOUR HEART IS N RIGHT SPOT BUT AMERICANS 1ST!!!

The same thing happened to me from a man that was a US Citizen and serving in the military. The point is these things happen and the people doing so will be legal and illegal at a proportion relative to their portion of the population. Just as my situation does not mean that men in the military are bad your situation does not mean illegals are bad........only that the individuals that perpetrated this on us were bad.

Eddie Gonzalez no one wants illegals hear besides idiots

I've been saying the same thing except I'm saying trade the Democraps for the illegals and we would all be better off. After all the illegals are fleeing mostly socialist countries

I've been saying the same thing except I'm saying trade the Democraps for the illegals and we would all be better off. After all the illegals are fleeing mostly socialist countries

They are spending $192 MILLION for a facility for illegals.  This is outrages.  Send them home!

Renieri Ortiz Illegals aren't immigrants you absolute fool.

Daniel Alexander Allen How Many illegals should we deliver to your door. I am tired of them. It pulling they’re weight here in America.. Let them get in line and come in the legal way. https://www.watchdog.org/national/reports-illegal-immigrants-receiving-medicaid-costs-taxpayers-billion-annually/article_6a9860a6-d0bd-11e8-92ed-5bca8b2d3b38.html?utm_medium=social&utm_source=facebook&utm_campaign=user-share

200 a day? I call BS on that. The numbers of illegals crossing are way down from a decade ago according to the immigration and security services. This is BS

Kris Landers so those who befriend or stand behind illegals are to blame for illegals actions? I like that idea.

Kris Landers so those who befriend or stand behind illegals are to blame for illegals actions? I like that idea.

"Joseph Roy  it had to be Fox News 😂. Realistically tho are you stupid to the point where you believe rape will end in the us after all the illegals are gone? Will there still be innocent people getting shot by police

Deport the rednecks keep the illegals.

Many States have a 2x - 3rd jail. It helps until someone gets out. It's an addiction and needs treated as such. But it takes like all addictions. The addict has to work hard at staying sober for life. It's a decision with prayers. Illegals need to stay out of America period. They should be tried for murder ..

Jo Sechi Surely you're not implying that deaths caused by illegals are less significant because they are fewer than gun related deaths? And to go all the way back to 1968 to inflate the number? How many gun related deaths last year? This year so far? How many of those are outside Chicago? Don't preach to me about gun control. The number of American babies murdered since 1968 far outnumber the American lives lost to guns. SIT DOWN.

An illegal grown man punched my 3 yr old granddaughter in the face.  A different illegals 9 year old daughter sexually assaulted my same granddaughter when she was 5. So I am strongly supporting this wall!

Seven percent of the illegals crossing our southern border end up in our prison's.  We don't need to import more problems !

Paul Baker pretty common knowledge that illegals rarely have a driver's license and insurance.

I just don't understand how American people can feel more sympathy for illegals than their own fellow Americans. Pretty sure the left is totally anti everything American :(

"140 Democrats last week voted against a resolution in Congress condemning the act of allowing illegals to vote in our elections.. While they've been screaming foreign interference

"The democrat communists lure the illegals and when they are here they find out it was all a lie

Angel Neavin Im sorry to hear that and hope they are ok. When I was 14 years old a car load of illegals had been drinking and they ran into my cousin and her friend (in Texas) who were on a motorcycle. They were killed.

Charlesetta Brown but we can spend a hundred and forty billion dollars a year on Medicare Medicaid food stamps whatever you want to put to it 4 illegals in this country?

"Pay attention please.    Experts have reported that  ""The Wall ""  will not keep out illegals.  Therefore

Charlesetta Brown r u crazy one crime ? Open yoyr eyes . There is crime by the hour from these illegals. Not to mention these drugs are kids are getting from them. You people need to wake up

"Charlesetta Brown there are tons of crimes by illegals that go unreported by media. And

Republicans are murdering exponentially more people by denying the affordable health care and drugs than people being killed by illegal aliens. I'm sure most killings by illegal aliens are domestic or murders of people they know. Illegals aren't running around shooting people for the hell of it. But stupid Trump followers believe what ever the orange toad tells them.

Estefania Torres Restrepo A Wall will keep out hundreds of illegals. Then more attention can be given at legal ports of entry to stop drugs flowing into the country. More people could be after the over stayed visa people.

Dee Dee Kelly Colvin its sad that there are SO many illegals here

Mike V. Radatti more Americans are killed by fellow Americans with guns than anything else including drugs from over the Mexican border and illegals put together

I understand all this and not  trying to cause any arguments. But of his reasons is illegals killing Americans well there are a lot more Americans killing Americans than Illegals killing Americans just makes no sense that's all. And as Rich as he is why doesn't he pay for his wall ?

I understand all this and not  trying to cause any arguments. But of his reasons is illegals killing Americans well there are a lot more Americans killing Americans than Illegals killing Americans just makes no sense that's all. And as Rich as he is why doesn't he pay for his wall ?

Sam North Obviously we can keep out our own citizens idiot but we can keep out Illegals! Did you even read how stupid your post sounded before you posted it? Did you mom tell you as she put you on the little yellow bus every morning that it was for the smarter kids at your school Sam? Like wow?

Mitch Haynie hey moron check the FACTS most illegals are visa over stayers that arrive on planes and boats not jumping over walls you fucking retard

"I am so sorry for your loss and others who have lost loved ones to illegals

Daniel Bremmer you actually think illegals trek thousands of miles with a ladder?

So sorry for you and your family's loss; perfect example of why we need a border wall and loopholes closed in the immigration system and stop illegals from flooding our nation.

Kimberly Mansfield  get rid of illegals and hey there a whole lot of extra money for mental health

"Paul Karachia if we didn't have to spend over 100 billion every year on illegals

It's sad the left cares more about illegals than the Angel mom's. You never see Angel mom's on CNN or other leftist news shows.

Tell that to the ranchers on the border whose property and homes are invaded regularly by illegals.

The spending bill should not have been signed. Too much money to support illegals and restricting where the wall is built.

It’s incomprehensible that Americans are actually fighting against keeping illegals out. What part of illegal do they not understand?

"Betty Jo Lollis thank you! I only shared so this way people know that MOST if not ALL illegals won't accept the word ""NO"" I have learned from this experience and I only hope that my story will entice others to break their silence too. It's ok to talk about it. It's a BIG problem amongst other things as well."

Just makes me so angry that our government turns a blind eye to american's and kisses the ass of illegal's just for there illegal vote. How can they even say this is a made up. I would never wish this on anybody but they just might have to walk in the shoe's of a family that lost a loved one when it could have been Prevented!.

"Americans face consequences.  Illegals get deported and come right back. And....what about all the children that get trafficked through that border?  Oh I forgot

Jim Acosta has the gall to  imply/say that the border situation is not a national emergency...........in front of ANGEL MOMS.......this weasel and his fake news pals are colluding with illegal aliens to provide more votes(voter fraud with drivers liscenses that shouldn't be issued to illegals in the first place) for demorats.

All this fear-mongering about illegals ... what about all the US Citizens pulling the same crap?

So what makes you think a damn wall will keep out illegals?

"SO it's a competition?! I s that  what your point is?! Or are you saying that crime by our own citizens justifies letting illegals border jumpers in?! ""Meaningful gun reform?!"" Exactly what is that?!  Most of the schools and mass shooters have obtained their weapons LEGALLY

Tell Pelosi/Schumer. It’s not ok for illegals to kill Americans just so they’ll vote for Democrats

Praying for All the Families that lost someone from these illegals! BUILD the WALL!

Seems like a lot of stories of illegals killing or other crimes against American citizens. Why don’t we have a “march” of all the victims and family of victims from illegal aliens. I bet it would be quite large.   That needs to be organized.

"Yes the problem is bigger than the Illegals

How many American citizens kill each other? Far more than illegals do.

What a horrible shame! And the taxpayers are saddled with paying for ALL the illegals living expenses! When is this going to end?!

"100 US citizens are the victims of violent crime at the hands of illegals every day  If one of your loved ones was a victim

I see this everyday hearing illegals tell me that the us pays there house cars and on food stamps.

"If you people think a border wall is going to keep illegals out

No Free Rides Act!  No tax refunds for illegals granted amnesty!

A wall will not stop illegal immigration ! If there’s a will there is a way! You think all illegals come from Mexico? You’re so misinformed !

Democrats don't care how many American citizens are murdered. Only worried about illegals who shouldn't be here in the first place but will somehow vote for them...smdh

"Dems care more about Illegals than US Citizens

Yes people we have several problems in this country mass shootings drugs illegal aliens and so on so forth.  We now have a president who is picking a problem and doing something about it.  Then we can move on to the next thing.   It may not be the fix all but even if it only keeps out half the drugs and illegal's that's a huge victory. Build to wall.

"I'm tired of illegals taking jobs from Americans for absolutely dirt cheap pay... The electrical field is hard work but people like my self are willing to work them. But we are tired of fixing their horrible work and not just bad

"Oh I can yes. But if we're an illegal who starts his own business and hires other illegals.... Or if you are a home owner looking for cheap labor because your don't make the most money in the the world. Then you hire a guy of Mexican decent but he speaks good English. Only to find his ""work"" is shabby at best and that that man is not even legally here...."

You can't tell me other wise that illegals aren't part of the problem when I personally have experienced the issue first hand.

I don't blame President Trump for calling the border an emergency. Too many illegals are killing innocent lives

Not all illegals are the same.

So sad. 💔 Stop protecting illegals and start protecting Americans!! Trump 2020!!!!

"Your loss is heart crushing.  I understand.  What I don't understand is WHY it is only the handful of victims killed by ""illegals"" are worthy of sympathy?  There are murder victims every day all over this country.  Families of those victims aren't deserving of notice because it doesn't further trump's agenda.  Why do other victims not matter?  They too are somebody's child/sibling/parent."

What about all those non illegals that murder like yesterdays shooting...how is a wall going to protect us. National emergency si gun control not trumps promised wall.

HISPANIC CHURCH DIVIDED BY THE COMMIES. GET ALL HISPANICS BEHIND THE RIGHT. NEW MEXICO IS LOSING ITS COUNTRY TO ILLEGALS FROM THE MIDDLE EAST.

Guns kill more Americans in a month than illegals did in 10 years. Can we address that real national emergency tyrant?

I just would like to have a hypothesis on what would happen if CNN had a bunch of illegals raped and murdered several of their reporters. Would they still be opposing President Trump and the wall? Could they even bring themselves to admit that President Trump is right?

How about we let the parents decide the punishment I would vote for that along with zero benefits I’ve been self employed all my life been thru some hard times was told sorry but your not entitled to benefits so you stop the damn freebies I’ll bet that would pretty much stop the flow of illegals if me as a citizen of this country can’t receive  any assistance than a non citizen sure as hell shouldn’t

And make Trump properties use it..how many Illegals did Trump have at his facilities?

"In fairness to all the Angel moms & dads whose children were killed by illegals who came into the country illegally

To all the people that want illegals in this country sponsor one put your money where your big-ass mouth is

John Fahrer vets will get help from the billions we spend every year on handouts to illegals.

Ok . ask pelosi and the lottery man what they think coz they don’t care! They care more about looking after the illegals

So sorry for your loss and everyones loss because of the invasion of illegals.  Every country on the face of the Earth requires foreigners to visit them legally.  It is insane liberal bullshit that has prevented us from securing the border. Trump has done what no president has done before.  He has taken his job seriously.....

Democrats only care about illegals.

Build the wall! The Democrats want open boarders and they obviously don’t care about the Americans getting killed by illegals. Wait until an illegal kills one of their loved ones then see how they feel!

Brandon Joseph Long  Mass shootings are minuscule compared to other murders and homicides done by illegals

Sad that you lost your daughter . I am praying something can be done in her name to ease the pain. Like building a wall so no one else will suffer at the hands of illegals .

"Ummmm......y'all do know that MOST illegals are people who overstayed their visas

Melissa Lamphere so what you're saying then is you want to foster/sponsor a family of illegals? Now remember no background check of any kind. Just open your door. Let'em right in to your home. I love how awesome of a person you are.

I just want to know why us citizens have to pay out of network when ALL ILLEGALS are OUT OF NETWORK And pay ZEROOOOOO   https://youtu.be/NgbQIJ5pUDk

"100 US citizens are the victims of violent crime at the hands of illegals every day  If one of your loved ones was a victim

...and democrats support these illegals!  Makes me sick!!!

Kenny Shuster no America says so.  If you want to keep on supporting the illegals invite them to your house

"However stats have proven over and over again that citizens commit way more crimes than illegals. I would think many of the illegals that do come here also get their guns here since it's so easy to do so. However I am against illegal immigration but the majority of our mass shootings are caused by white American citizens. President Obama deported more illegals than any other president. It's not the crisis that Trump's conning his base to believe. Stats show immigration from the southern border is the lowest in 50 years. Many of the suspected terrorist that have entered this country

"However stats have proven over and over again that citizens commit way more crimes than illegals. I would think many of the illegals that do come here also get their guns here since it's so easy to do so. However I am against illegal immigration but the majority of our mass shootings are caused by white American citizens. President Obama deported more illegals than any other president. It's not the crisis that Trump's conning his base to believe. Stats show immigration from the southern border is the lowest in 50 years. Many of the suspected terrorist that have entered this country

"However stats have proven over and over again that citizens commit way more crimes than illegals. I would think many of the illegals that do come here also get their guns here since it's so easy to do so. However I am against illegal immigration but the majority of our mass shootings are caused by white American citizens. President Obama deported more illegals than any other president. It's not the crisis that Trump's conning his base to believe. Stats show immigration from the southern border is the lowest in 50 years. Many of the suspected terrorist that have entered this country

How many times will the Democrats turn a blind eye to the needless deaths of American citizens in order to protect illegals?!

Thank you Mr President! Its too late for my husband who was killed by illegals and left to die on the road. Our family has been forever broken since. All in an effort so they can have a better life! What about ours? His? At what expense is it ok? Its not!!

The democrats don’t care about the victims of crimes comited by illegals to Americans

They have killed more with all the deadly drugs they bring in . Yes their not all bad but with the wall it will stop the madness . Trump is trying to make America safe again democrats are stopping it .  It’s very simple it wasnt very long ago with Obama     the Democrats wanted a wall to stop the illegals but now they are resisting because if trumps succeeds in getting a wall up and making America safe the Democrats will be on a sinking ship with a giant hole in the middle of it. The old schoolers need to look and see the  Democrat party they once believed in is long gone .  But they are lied to telling them Trump will take away Social Security and Medicare.  It’s a lie . Trump said you earned it . God Bless America and let’s come together as one .

"Every Single Democrat has Walls around their homes!! Along with Security with guns!! So they don’t live in the neighborhoods across our Country and they have Walls and Body Guards Many!! If they don’t believe Walls Works their houses wouldn’t just have Big Walls but unbelievable Security!! Also important information is their family is protected by their security and Walls! The Americans don’t Matter to Anyone of Them!! They have Their own healthcare not what every American has and can’t afford Medications ect.. Our American children Must Pay for Colleges but illegals don’t

This is to sad how many deaths of American Citizens need to happen and how much money do we need to give illegals before democrats wake up and realize without the wall Americans aren't as safe and are suffering the consequences of the Democratic decisons.. #AmericaFirst #BuildTheWall

These stories are heartbreakingly sad! Bless them in their grief! Build this wall now and secure our nation! Remove all incentives for illegals to come here now!

They are everywhere driving with no license. They have damaged two of my vehicles that I had to pay to repair. They do not even get cited and are released. I couldn't imagine losing a loved one. It is a huge problem and the cities and churches are conspiring to bring them here. Everyone pays higher insurance rates because of the damage they do. States ignore the fact that one legal person registers 100's of cars for them to drive. The corruption is disgusting. Ohio is overrun with illegals and I am sure most states are. I have few neighbors that speak English in Ohio.

How many more young women are killed by Americans than illegals?

Gabriel Anibal Toribio i saw 3 posts today of illegals killing anericans...i didnt bother tagging you..

"Walls won’t stop where illegals are the most coming in: Canada

How many illegals are committing all those mass shootings we hear about weekly. Aren't they just mostly citizens with guns.....duhhhhh

Never heard or read story about that... most of it is the illegals

"That estimate on what illegals cost this country appeared based on a paper by FAIR

"Only 30% of illegals get her through the border. The rest get here by over staying visas. Ask Trump what his plan is to stop that from happening. You want to stop illegals

"Only 30% of illegals get her through the border. The rest get here by over staying visas. Ask Trump what his plan is to stop that from happening. You want to stop illegals

The list goes on and on. Myself and two of my coworkers have been in accidents with illegals that fled the scene of property damage accidents. No recovery in any of the accidents. Build the WALL.

Danny Jones $157 billion a year to support illegals vs $5 billion to keep them out is ok with me

Silvia Serra Lobo He has the facts illegals get benefits right away but Americans are on a waiting list . You get the facts 🇺🇸

An illegal grown man punched my 3 yr old granddaughter in the face.  A different illegals 9 year old daughter sexually assaulted my same granddaughter when she was 5. So I am strongly supporting this wall!

So sorry for you and your family's loss; perfect example of why we need a border wall and loopholes closed in the immigration system and stop illegals from flooding our nation.

It's sad the left cares more about illegals than the Angel mom's. You never see Angel mom's on CNN or other leftist news shows.

The spending bill should not have been signed. Too much money to support illegals and restricting where the wall is built.

It’s incomprehensible that Americans are actually fighting against keeping illegals out. What part of illegal do they not understand?

Just makes me so angry that our government turns a blind eye to american's and kisses the ass of illegal's just for there illegal vote. How can they even say this is a made up. I would never wish this on anybody but they just might have to walk in the shoe's of a family that lost a loved one when it could have been Prevented!.

Jim Acosta has the gall to  imply/say that the border situation is not a national emergency...........in front of ANGEL MOMS.......this weasel and his fake news pals are colluding with illegal aliens to provide more votes(voter fraud with drivers liscenses that shouldn't be issued to illegals in the first place) for demorats.

All this fear-mongering about illegals ... what about all the US Citizens pulling the same crap?

Tell Pelosi/Schumer. It’s not ok for illegals to kill Americans just so they’ll vote for Democrats

Seems like a lot of stories of illegals killing or other crimes against American citizens. Why don’t we have a “march” of all the victims and family of victims from illegal aliens. I bet it would be quite large.   That needs to be organized.

How many American citizens kill each other? Far more than illegals do.

What a horrible shame! And the taxpayers are saddled with paying for ALL the illegals living expenses! When is this going to end?!

I see this everyday hearing illegals tell me that the us pays there house cars and on food stamps.

"If you people think a border wall is going to keep illegals out

No Free Rides Act!  No tax refunds for illegals granted amnesty!

A wall will not stop illegal immigration ! If there’s a will there is a way! You think all illegals come from Mexico? You’re so misinformed !

Democrats don't care how many American citizens are murdered. Only worried about illegals who shouldn't be here in the first place but will somehow vote for them...smdh

"Dems care more about Illegals than US Citizens

Yes people we have several problems in this country mass shootings drugs illegal aliens and so on so forth.  We now have a president who is picking a problem and doing something about it.  Then we can move on to the next thing.   It may not be the fix all but even if it only keeps out half the drugs and illegal's that's a huge victory. Build to wall.

I don't blame President Trump for calling the border an emergency. Too many illegals are killing innocent lives

Not all illegals are the same.

So sad. 💔 Stop protecting illegals and start protecting Americans!! Trump 2020!!!!

"Your loss is heart crushing.  I understand.  What I don't understand is WHY it is only the handful of victims killed by ""illegals"" are worthy of sympathy?  There are murder victims every day all over this country.  Families of those victims aren't deserving of notice because it doesn't further trump's agenda.  Why do other victims not matter?  They too are somebody's child/sibling/parent."

What about all those non illegals that murder like yesterdays shooting...how is a wall going to protect us. National emergency si gun control not trumps promised wall.

I just would like to have a hypothesis on what would happen if CNN had a bunch of illegals raped and murdered several of their reporters. Would they still be opposing President Trump and the wall? Could they even bring themselves to admit that President Trump is right?

How about we let the parents decide the punishment I would vote for that along with zero benefits I’ve been self employed all my life been thru some hard times was told sorry but your not entitled to benefits so you stop the damn freebies I’ll bet that would pretty much stop the flow of illegals if me as a citizen of this country can’t receive  any assistance than a non citizen sure as hell shouldn’t

"In fairness to all the Angel moms & dads whose children were killed by illegals who came into the country illegally

Ok . ask pelosi and the lottery man what they think coz they don’t care! They care more about looking after the illegals

So sorry for your loss and everyones loss because of the invasion of illegals.  Every country on the face of the Earth requires foreigners to visit them legally.  It is insane liberal bullshit that has prevented us from securing the border. Trump has done what no president has done before.  He has taken his job seriously.....

How many kids  and people where killed by Americans how many illegals ran up in schools or churches or shopping malls compared to these Americans lol

^^^ but a wall will keep us safe from illegals

"Lisa Vocelka No you libtard you need to build that wall and evivt the illegals

Danny Jones $157 billion a year to support illegals vs $5 billion to keep them out is ok with me

Silvia Serra Lobo He has the facts illegals get benefits right away but Americans are on a waiting list . You get the facts 🇺🇸

Lynn Limauro Floyd So sad! God bless you! Illegal's need to be vetted! Build that WALL!

Timothy Kershner that doesn't mean every illegal is now ok. That is the 0000.1% of illegals.

Timothy Kershner Illegal's do NOT belong in this country...let alone killing ANYONE...

Kyle Callender UNFORTUNATELY MEXICAN MEN 1 MAN COMES FOR ASYLUM GETS IT. HE BRINGS ALL ILLEGAL FAMILY ACROSS BORDER THEY GO GET FOOD STAMPS MEDICAID ETC.....THEY DONT BOTHER LEARNING ENGLISH BECAUSE PPL OF EL PASO CATER TO THEM BUT WE AMERICANS GET DISCRIMINATED FOR NOT KNOWING SPANISH.  I CANT GET A JOB IN ALOT OF PLACES BECAUSE IDK SPANISH THATS NOT RIGHT?????? IVE HEARD SOME PPL ARE WORKING IN MALLS THAT DONT KNO ENGLISH IVE NOT SEEN THIS BECAUSE IF/WHEN I DO IM RAISING HELL. PPL NEED TO QUIT CATERING TO THEM. IF THEY MOVE TO HOUSTON OR DALLS THEY LEARN ENGLISH BECAUSE THEY WONT CATER TO THEIR ASSES. THIS IS REALITY. PPL GET PD LESS IN EP BECUZ ILLEGALS HURT OUR ECONOMY.  THEY WORK UNDER TABLE N SEND $$$ TO MEXICO N DONT PAY TAXES. THEY ARE ALL ON STAMPS N MEDICAID N KEEP HAVING ANCHOR BABIES WE TAX PAYERS SUPPORT.   I UNDERSTAND WHAT U R SAYING ABOUT ASYLUM BUT THIS IS HOW ISIS HAS GOTTEN IN USA. YES LAWS NEED REVISED N CHANGED BUT WE AMERICANS NEED TO TAKE CARE OF OUR OWN 1ST. IF WE DONT WHO WILL??? PRESIDENT TRUMP KNOS THINGS WE DO NOT KNO. TRUST HIM??? LISTEN TO HIM???? HES CHANGING ALL PORTS OF ENTRY FROM MEXICO IN TO TX WITH HIGHER TECHNOLOGY ALREADY. WE NEED THE WALL BECUZ DRUGS N ILLEGAL PPL COMING IN WHERE THERE IS NOTHING.....IM JUST SAYING I MEAN NO DISRESPECT.  ILL AGREE TO DISAGREE IM NOT TRYNA ARGUE I STICK TO FACTS N TRUTH.......YOUR HEART IS N RIGHT SPOT BUT AMERICANS 1ST!!!

The same thing happened to me from a man that was a US Citizen and serving in the military. The point is these things happen and the people doing so will be legal and illegal at a proportion relative to their portion of the population. Just as my situation does not mean that men in the military are bad your situation does not mean illegals are bad........only that the individuals that perpetrated this on us were bad.

Eddie Gonzalez no one wants illegals hear besides idiots

I've been saying the same thing except I'm saying trade the Democraps for the illegals and we would all be better off. After all the illegals are fleeing mostly socialist countries

I've been saying the same thing except I'm saying trade the Democraps for the illegals and we would all be better off. After all the illegals are fleeing mostly socialist countries

They are spending $192 MILLION for a facility for illegals.  This is outrages.  Send them home!

Renieri Ortiz Illegals aren't immigrants you absolute fool.

Daniel Alexander Allen How Many illegals should we deliver to your door. I am tired of them. It pulling they’re weight here in America.. Let them get in line and come in the legal way. https://www.watchdog.org/national/reports-illegal-immigrants-receiving-medicaid-costs-taxpayers-billion-annually/article_6a9860a6-d0bd-11e8-92ed-5bca8b2d3b38.html?utm_medium=social&utm_source=facebook&utm_campaign=user-share

200 a day? I call BS on that. The numbers of illegals crossing are way down from a decade ago according to the immigration and security services. This is BS

Kris Landers so those who befriend or stand behind illegals are to blame for illegals actions? I like that idea.

Kris Landers so those who befriend or stand behind illegals are to blame for illegals actions? I like that idea.

"Joseph Roy  it had to be Fox News 😂. Realistically tho are you stupid to the point where you believe rape will end in the us after all the illegals are gone? Will there still be innocent people getting shot by police

Deport the rednecks keep the illegals.

Many States have a 2x - 3rd jail. It helps until someone gets out. It's an addiction and needs treated as such. But it takes like all addictions. The addict has to work hard at staying sober for life. It's a decision with prayers. Illegals need to stay out of America period. They should be tried for murder ..

Jo Sechi Surely you're not implying that deaths caused by illegals are less significant because they are fewer than gun related deaths? And to go all the way back to 1968 to inflate the number? How many gun related deaths last year? This year so far? How many of those are outside Chicago? Don't preach to me about gun control. The number of American babies murdered since 1968 far outnumber the American lives lost to guns. SIT DOWN.

An illegal grown man punched my 3 yr old granddaughter in the face.  A different illegals 9 year old daughter sexually assaulted my same granddaughter when she was 5. So I am strongly supporting this wall!

Seven percent of the illegals crossing our southern border end up in our prison's.  We don't need to import more problems !

Paul Baker pretty common knowledge that illegals rarely have a driver's license and insurance.

I just don't understand how American people can feel more sympathy for illegals than their own fellow Americans. Pretty sure the left is totally anti everything American :(

"140 Democrats last week voted against a resolution in Congress condemning the act of allowing illegals to vote in our elections.. While they've been screaming foreign interference

"The democrat communists lure the illegals and when they are here they find out it was all a lie

Angel Neavin Im sorry to hear that and hope they are ok. When I was 14 years old a car load of illegals had been drinking and they ran into my cousin and her friend (in Texas) who were on a motorcycle. They were killed.

Charlesetta Brown but we can spend a hundred and forty billion dollars a year on Medicare Medicaid food stamps whatever you want to put to it 4 illegals in this country?

"Pay attention please.    Experts have reported that  ""The Wall ""  will not keep out illegals.  Therefore

Charlesetta Brown r u crazy one crime ? Open yoyr eyes . There is crime by the hour from these illegals. Not to mention these drugs are kids are getting from them. You people need to wake up

"Charlesetta Brown there are tons of crimes by illegals that go unreported by media. And

Republicans are murdering exponentially more people by denying the affordable health care and drugs than people being killed by illegal aliens. I'm sure most killings by illegal aliens are domestic or murders of people they know. Illegals aren't running around shooting people for the hell of it. But stupid Trump followers believe what ever the orange toad tells them.

Estefania Torres Restrepo A Wall will keep out hundreds of illegals. Then more attention can be given at legal ports of entry to stop drugs flowing into the country. More people could be after the over stayed visa people.

Dee Dee Kelly Colvin its sad that there are SO many illegals here

Mike V. Radatti more Americans are killed by fellow Americans with guns than anything else including drugs from over the Mexican border and illegals put together

I understand all this and not  trying to cause any arguments. But of his reasons is illegals killing Americans well there are a lot more Americans killing Americans than Illegals killing Americans just makes no sense that's all. And as Rich as he is why doesn't he pay for his wall ?

I understand all this and not  trying to cause any arguments. But of his reasons is illegals killing Americans well there are a lot more Americans killing Americans than Illegals killing Americans just makes no sense that's all. And as Rich as he is why doesn't he pay for his wall ?

Sam North Obviously we can keep out our own citizens idiot but we can keep out Illegals! Did you even read how stupid your post sounded before you posted it? Did you mom tell you as she put you on the little yellow bus every morning that it was for the smarter kids at your school Sam? Like wow?

Mitch Haynie hey moron check the FACTS most illegals are visa over stayers that arrive on planes and boats not jumping over walls you fucking retard

"I am so sorry for your loss and others who have lost loved ones to illegals

Daniel Bremmer you actually think illegals trek thousands of miles with a ladder?

So sorry for you and your family's loss; perfect example of why we need a border wall and loopholes closed in the immigration system and stop illegals from flooding our nation.

Kimberly Mansfield  get rid of illegals and hey there a whole lot of extra money for mental health

"Paul Karachia if we didn't have to spend over 100 billion every year on illegals

It's sad the left cares more about illegals than the Angel mom's. You never see Angel mom's on CNN or other leftist news shows.

Tell that to the ranchers on the border whose property and homes are invaded regularly by illegals.

The spending bill should not have been signed. Too much money to support illegals and restricting where the wall is built.

It’s incomprehensible that Americans are actually fighting against keeping illegals out. What part of illegal do they not understand?

"Betty Jo Lollis thank you! I only shared so this way people know that MOST if not ALL illegals won't accept the word ""NO"" I have learned from this experience and I only hope that my story will entice others to break their silence too. It's ok to talk about it. It's a BIG problem amongst other things as well."

Just makes me so angry that our government turns a blind eye to american's and kisses the ass of illegal's just for there illegal vote. How can they even say this is a made up. I would never wish this on anybody but they just might have to walk in the shoe's of a family that lost a loved one when it could have been Prevented!.

"Americans face consequences.  Illegals get deported and come right back. And....what about all the children that get trafficked through that border?  Oh I forgot

Jim Acosta has the gall to  imply/say that the border situation is not a national emergency...........in front of ANGEL MOMS.......this weasel and his fake news pals are colluding with illegal aliens to provide more votes(voter fraud with drivers liscenses that shouldn't be issued to illegals in the first place) for demorats.

All this fear-mongering about illegals ... what about all the US Citizens pulling the same crap?

So what makes you think a damn wall will keep out illegals?

"SO it's a competition?! I s that  what your point is?! Or are you saying that crime by our own citizens justifies letting illegals border jumpers in?! ""Meaningful gun reform?!"" Exactly what is that?!  Most of the schools and mass shooters have obtained their weapons LEGALLY

Tell Pelosi/Schumer. It’s not ok for illegals to kill Americans just so they’ll vote for Democrats

Praying for All the Families that lost someone from these illegals! BUILD the WALL!

Seems like a lot of stories of illegals killing or other crimes against American citizens. Why don’t we have a “march” of all the victims and family of victims from illegal aliens. I bet it would be quite large.   That needs to be organized.

"Yes the problem is bigger than the Illegals

How many American citizens kill each other? Far more than illegals do.

What a horrible shame! And the taxpayers are saddled with paying for ALL the illegals living expenses! When is this going to end?!

"100 US citizens are the victims of violent crime at the hands of illegals every day  If one of your loved ones was a victim

I see this everyday hearing illegals tell me that the us pays there house cars and on food stamps.

"If you people think a border wall is going to keep illegals out

No Free Rides Act!  No tax refunds for illegals granted amnesty!

A wall will not stop illegal immigration ! If there’s a will there is a way! You think all illegals come from Mexico? You’re so misinformed !

Democrats don't care how many American citizens are murdered. Only worried about illegals who shouldn't be here in the first place but will somehow vote for them...smdh

"Dems care more about Illegals than US Citizens

Yes people we have several problems in this country mass shootings drugs illegal aliens and so on so forth.  We now have a president who is picking a problem and doing something about it.  Then we can move on to the next thing.   It may not be the fix all but even if it only keeps out half the drugs and illegal's that's a huge victory. Build to wall.

"I'm tired of illegals taking jobs from Americans for absolutely dirt cheap pay... The electrical field is hard work but people like my self are willing to work them. But we are tired of fixing their horrible work and not just bad

"Oh I can yes. But if we're an illegal who starts his own business and hires other illegals.... Or if you are a home owner looking for cheap labor because your don't make the most money in the the world. Then you hire a guy of Mexican decent but he speaks good English. Only to find his ""work"" is shabby at best and that that man is not even legally here...."

You can't tell me other wise that illegals aren't part of the problem when I personally have experienced the issue first hand.

I don't blame President Trump for calling the border an emergency. Too many illegals are killing innocent lives

Not all illegals are the same.

So sad. 💔 Stop protecting illegals and start protecting Americans!! Trump 2020!!!!

"Your loss is heart crushing.  I understand.  What I don't understand is WHY it is only the handful of victims killed by ""illegals"" are worthy of sympathy?  There are murder victims every day all over this country.  Families of those victims aren't deserving of notice because it doesn't further trump's agenda.  Why do other victims not matter?  They too are somebody's child/sibling/parent."

What about all those non illegals that murder like yesterdays shooting...how is a wall going to protect us. National emergency si gun control not trumps promised wall.

HISPANIC CHURCH DIVIDED BY THE COMMIES. GET ALL HISPANICS BEHIND THE RIGHT. NEW MEXICO IS LOSING ITS COUNTRY TO ILLEGALS FROM THE MIDDLE EAST.

Guns kill more Americans in a month than illegals did in 10 years. Can we address that real national emergency tyrant?

I just would like to have a hypothesis on what would happen if CNN had a bunch of illegals raped and murdered several of their reporters. Would they still be opposing President Trump and the wall? Could they even bring themselves to admit that President Trump is right?

How about we let the parents decide the punishment I would vote for that along with zero benefits I’ve been self employed all my life been thru some hard times was told sorry but your not entitled to benefits so you stop the damn freebies I’ll bet that would pretty much stop the flow of illegals if me as a citizen of this country can’t receive  any assistance than a non citizen sure as hell shouldn’t

And make Trump properties use it..how many Illegals did Trump have at his facilities?

"In fairness to all the Angel moms & dads whose children were killed by illegals who came into the country illegally

To all the people that want illegals in this country sponsor one put your money where your big-ass mouth is

John Fahrer vets will get help from the billions we spend every year on handouts to illegals.

Ok . ask pelosi and the lottery man what they think coz they don’t care! They care more about looking after the illegals

So sorry for your loss and everyones loss because of the invasion of illegals.  Every country on the face of the Earth requires foreigners to visit them legally.  It is insane liberal bullshit that has prevented us from securing the border. Trump has done what no president has done before.  He has taken his job seriously.....

Democrats only care about illegals.

Build the wall! The Democrats want open boarders and they obviously don’t care about the Americans getting killed by illegals. Wait until an illegal kills one of their loved ones then see how they feel!

Brandon Joseph Long  Mass shootings are minuscule compared to other murders and homicides done by illegals

Sad that you lost your daughter . I am praying something can be done in her name to ease the pain. Like building a wall so no one else will suffer at the hands of illegals .

"Ummmm......y'all do know that MOST illegals are people who overstayed their visas

Melissa Lamphere so what you're saying then is you want to foster/sponsor a family of illegals? Now remember no background check of any kind. Just open your door. Let'em right in to your home. I love how awesome of a person you are.

I just want to know why us citizens have to pay out of network when ALL ILLEGALS are OUT OF NETWORK And pay ZEROOOOOO   https://youtu.be/NgbQIJ5pUDk

"100 US citizens are the victims of violent crime at the hands of illegals every day  If one of your loved ones was a victim

...and democrats support these illegals!  Makes me sick!!!

Kenny Shuster no America says so.  If you want to keep on supporting the illegals invite them to your house

"However stats have proven over and over again that citizens commit way more crimes than illegals. I would think many of the illegals that do come here also get their guns here since it's so easy to do so. However I am against illegal immigration but the majority of our mass shootings are caused by white American citizens. President Obama deported more illegals than any other president. It's not the crisis that Trump's conning his base to believe. Stats show immigration from the southern border is the lowest in 50 years. Many of the suspected terrorist that have entered this country

"However stats have proven over and over again that citizens commit way more crimes than illegals. I would think many of the illegals that do come here also get their guns here since it's so easy to do so. However I am against illegal immigration but the majority of our mass shootings are caused by white American citizens. President Obama deported more illegals than any other president. It's not the crisis that Trump's conning his base to believe. Stats show immigration from the southern border is the lowest in 50 years. Many of the suspected terrorist that have entered this country

"However stats have proven over and over again that citizens commit way more crimes than illegals. I would think many of the illegals that do come here also get their guns here since it's so easy to do so. However I am against illegal immigration but the majority of our mass shootings are caused by white American citizens. President Obama deported more illegals than any other president. It's not the crisis that Trump's conning his base to believe. Stats show immigration from the southern border is the lowest in 50 years. Many of the suspected terrorist that have entered this country

How many times will the Democrats turn a blind eye to the needless deaths of American citizens in order to protect illegals?!

Thank you Mr President! Its too late for my husband who was killed by illegals and left to die on the road. Our family has been forever broken since. All in an effort so they can have a better life! What about ours? His? At what expense is it ok? Its not!!

The democrats don’t care about the victims of crimes comited by illegals to Americans

They have killed more with all the deadly drugs they bring in . Yes their not all bad but with the wall it will stop the madness . Trump is trying to make America safe again democrats are stopping it .  It’s very simple it wasnt very long ago with Obama     the Democrats wanted a wall to stop the illegals but now they are resisting because if trumps succeeds in getting a wall up and making America safe the Democrats will be on a sinking ship with a giant hole in the middle of it. The old schoolers need to look and see the  Democrat party they once believed in is long gone .  But they are lied to telling them Trump will take away Social Security and Medicare.  It’s a lie . Trump said you earned it . God Bless America and let’s come together as one .

"Every Single Democrat has Walls around their homes!! Along with Security with guns!! So they don’t live in the neighborhoods across our Country and they have Walls and Body Guards Many!! If they don’t believe Walls Works their houses wouldn’t just have Big Walls but unbelievable Security!! Also important information is their family is protected by their security and Walls! The Americans don’t Matter to Anyone of Them!! They have Their own healthcare not what every American has and can’t afford Medications ect.. Our American children Must Pay for Colleges but illegals don’t

This is to sad how many deaths of American Citizens need to happen and how much money do we need to give illegals before democrats wake up and realize without the wall Americans aren't as safe and are suffering the consequences of the Democratic decisons.. #AmericaFirst #BuildTheWall

These stories are heartbreakingly sad! Bless them in their grief! Build this wall now and secure our nation! Remove all incentives for illegals to come here now!

They are everywhere driving with no license. They have damaged two of my vehicles that I had to pay to repair. They do not even get cited and are released. I couldn't imagine losing a loved one. It is a huge problem and the cities and churches are conspiring to bring them here. Everyone pays higher insurance rates because of the damage they do. States ignore the fact that one legal person registers 100's of cars for them to drive. The corruption is disgusting. Ohio is overrun with illegals and I am sure most states are. I have few neighbors that speak English in Ohio.

How many more young women are killed by Americans than illegals?

Gabriel Anibal Toribio i saw 3 posts today of illegals killing anericans...i didnt bother tagging you..

"Walls won’t stop where illegals are the most coming in: Canada

How many illegals are committing all those mass shootings we hear about weekly. Aren't they just mostly citizens with guns.....duhhhhh

Never heard or read story about that... most of it is the illegals

"That estimate on what illegals cost this country appeared based on a paper by FAIR

"Only 30% of illegals get her through the border. The rest get here by over staying visas. Ask Trump what his plan is to stop that from happening. You want to stop illegals

"Only 30% of illegals get her through the border. The rest get here by over staying visas. Ask Trump what his plan is to stop that from happening. You want to stop illegals

The list goes on and on. Myself and two of my coworkers have been in accidents with illegals that fled the scene of property damage accidents. No recovery in any of the accidents. Build the WALL.

I just don't understand the Democrats and their coldness to these families who have lost loved ones to illegals.   I'm so sorry for all the losses and pray President Trump will get the wall built and our borders protected the way they should be protected.

If families or mothers are called angel families & angel mothers of those killed by illegal aliens. What are the parents/families/mothers of those killed by American citizens referred to as? If ICE & Border patrol would do their jobs & if American citizens would stop using drugs & if companies would stop hiring illegals (like Trump) we wouldn’t have a problem. Five year olds killed at Sandy Hook & Vegas concert massacre & Parkland. What are these families called? SOL???

It's literally a fact that native born people are more likely to be violent than illegals. Again I'm not for allowing a free flow of illegals. Just the statistics

It's literally a fact that native born people are more likely to be violent than illegals. Again I'm not for allowing a free flow of illegals. Just the statistics

I'd call millions of illegals here over the years a fucking crisis.wouldnt you.

Guns kill far more than illegals.

And how many illegals would you want in your house without your permission?!

"""If Americans who Hire harbor or give welfare to illegals were imprisoned for 5 years you would not need a wall or even a fence""﻿"

Wealthy people have walls around their mansions ~ of course walls work. There would be no angel moms if we had a border wall because illegals could not get in the USA to kill Americans. #BuildTheWallNow!

Mean while Cuomo is paying for illegals with our tax dollars! When will you people wake up already get these cronies out!

You should not have signed the Omnibus Bill that you just signed!  What were you thinking; this only made our battle worse and gave more rights to illegals.  Not happy with you Trump.  The wall is only one part of border security.

"#POTUS 45 💜 ITS YOUR MAIN DUTY! SWORN.! I WAS AFFECTED. BADLY BY ILLEGALS BUT I DID NOT DIE... OUT OF RESPECT FOR THE FAMILIES OF THOSE THAT PERISHED I WILL NOT LAMENT ABOUT MY INJURIES. HOWEVER

"Patty Bertocchini La Puma that only stands to reason because US citizens outnumber ILLEGALS like 20 -1 but let's not ignore the fact that they dont belong here and are a drain on taxpayers

Some of the points on here are good ones. But the big point that some don't want to see. If we was not spending billions and billions a year on illegals. That would be money that could be used to help people with medical issues. Help vets. Help the homeless. We are spending billions a year on people who have not brought so much as a soda pop In this country. As for the water in Michigan. It was a problem long before trump was elected. If the voters in Michigan would quit voting the same people in that got them in this mess. Just maybe things would get fixed. Your water problems are controlled by your local government not the president.

Americans kill Americans every day ~ are you going to build a wall to keep them away from law abiding citizens as well?  Not all illegals are bad but those are the only ones the news will tell you about ~ There are many who are honest people and want better

"liberals only care about illegals

Guns kills more people than illegals.  Doi.

All the democrats want to do is hesitate hasitate on doing anything to protect southern border from illegals an drugs But you know that they know its coming across an don't give a damn about stopping it.

Why do demos  give no credence to our America children. It just astonishing that they don’t give a damn about us & only want to Let in illegals. It must be all about votes. Vets homeless on streets that just ignore us & making Americans second on list. Vote red and remember what they are doing. Can’t get away with anything unless we vote them out.

This is why we need a wall. Here are some of the victims stories. Some of these people who are murdered were murdered by illegals who were previously deported. http://www.ojjpac.org/memorial.asp

I'm so sorry for your loss Mr Ferguson I cannot  imagine  losing my daughter. But  I Iost my cousin on September 11th at the world trade center by terrorists. It's just not Mexicans that are coming here illegally it's other illegals  aswell from other countries. We need the wall built it's a loophole for anyone that wants to come to our country we need all the Mexicans and illegal immigrants to go back to their own country and  if they want to come here they have to do it legally bottom line

One of sister's best friends was killed by an illegal immigrant.  There were 3 illegals in the car.  The driver never even slowed down at the stop sign on a side highway and was speeding.  He hit her while she was driving the speed limit of 65.  She was life watched but didn't survive long.  The 3 men weren't even injured.  They had no insurance and actually tried to hire an attorney to sue the husband of the woman he killed.  They got out of jail somehow and fled back to Mexico.  I always wonder how long it took them to cross back into the states and how many other crimes they've committed since then.

We need more from many those have met the illegals.  Wake up everyone. Illegals and Muslims are the worse and we need protection from them.

We need more from many those have met the illegals.  Wake up everyone. Illegals and Muslims are the worse and we need protection from them.

I am sorry sorry for your loss.  We are fighting as hard as we can to stop all of these illegals coming in and taking over our country and killing us right and left. God bless Trump.

Yes it is important if it’s the only way to stop the influx of illegals

"All the Dems care about is illegals

"Build the wall! The democrates ( Communist) hate conservative people.  I sick of them getting giving everything FREE! Illegals should never be allowed to vote! I have always had to show my drivers License every time I have voted 

Illegal drugs killed mine 👺🙈🙊🙉Fake media and uncaring Demolition Dems haters of Justice & citizens & security sanctuary for illegals and homeless & criminals 👹👺🤷‍♀️what can we do these fools are evil

"Too many lives lost at the hands of Illegals! From drugs

"Illegals don't belong here! We welcome immigrants coming legally! If they are coming illegally

Sad that so many have lost their lives. I pray that all illegals are removed before any more of our children are murdered & addicts get help before they are killed by these drugs flowing into our country. God Bless President Trump for taking the necessary steps when our traitor congress would not.

It'll stop the illegals that don't come thru to stop doing it..

Q1AWE ARE LOSING WAY TO MANY PEOPLE  BECAUSE ILLEGALS COMING INTO Ameria

I'm disgusted with you r president. The bill you just signed guts ice and helps illegals  https://www.breitbart.com/politics/2019/02/15/trump-decries-catch-release-while-expanding-release-illegal-aliens/

More American citizens kill Americans than illegals do ! FACT !!

A wall won't completely STOP the illegals from coming in but it will deter them and slow them down cause nothing is going to STOP them from coming in completely

"Every day illegals are arrested in Atlanta for stealing

Okay why don't you do the same post for white kids killing each other due to your stupid gun laws. Oh because the NRA paid you and you don't want to admit the real threat is guns in the US. Actually look at statistics of crime who commits the crimes sorry but it ain't immigrants or illegals because you don't understand the situations that people come from or why they are illegal. For them its sorry you can't enter this country because the USA decided to destroy your country causing all government bodies and data they held about you to  be destroyed as well a lot of the people that would provide the proper paper work are dead or have fled. So after you risk your life escaping a war torn hell none of you will understand or have any sympathy because we fear everything especially if its different . sorry conservatives but apparently you are more fearful than less conservative minds. Don't worry there's not a illegal hiding in ya cupboard Obama put there. Don't forget Jesus was a refugee

You want reroute wall money to help US citizens? How about we reroute the billions we give illegals instead. How about the billions sent abroad to our so called allies?  Im pretty sure there are tons of dollars wasted on non citizens every day. Why take away our shot at securing the border?

Reading thru these comments i can very well see why this country is in the shape its in .heres a man trying to make this country better and theres people on here acting like spoiled kids that refuse to admit hes doing a good job .its not just about killing or drugs or rape or draining our benefits programs .putting our hospitals in financial problems .drunk driving or even working and sending the money back to mexico and other places its all these and more .money that could help seniors .vets kids .drug addicts .single parents and to try and fix our health ins issues are going for  these illegals .not to mention so called border security. Do you people think they all go to points of entry to come in ?do you know how many miles are open for them to come in .stop and think people .some of you act like you know more about what goes on then people that work and deal with it every day .unless you know for fact dont try to act like it is .all of this dident just start been going on for years .Trump is the first one to care enough to try to stop it .and all the other issues you are bringing up give the man time .hes trying hes not only fighting the stupid democrats hes fighting fools like the ones on here

The reason why libs don't admit this as an issue is because they killed all of their children before any illegals got around to it.

Illegals are becoming US citizens now 🤣

BUILD THE WALL! See what's happening when we let illegals just walk in. We need to start caring for our own country. USA! USA! USA!

WHITE TERRORISTS DISRUPT AMERICAN LIFES MONTHLY... WHITE TERRORISTS HAVE KILLED MORE PEOPLE THAN ILLEGALS

We need one arround Puerto Rico to keep the illegals out😂😂😂

"Illegals coming into our country that add no value to our system

Me myself don't like my tax dollar going to support illegals jumping our boarders just for the free ride it has to stop

"A wall will not stop drugs and illegals

Build the wall! So many jobs and money wasted on illegals.

I have seen people driving whom cannot speak or read english and the signs are in English. I've seen them drive 18 wheel trucks and come and ask for directions how to go somewhere. Companies hire illegals.

"We have 30 million illegals here now

"Protect us from Russia then jerk. And btw without illegals

"ILLEGALS NEED TO BE DEPORTED FOR THIS STUFF!!  Not put in jail

I have more problems that would make people like you scream mama. But I' m a disabled vet who gave an oath to protect my country when only 18 and 40 years later that oath is as strong as then. You want to talk about money that could be used instand of a wall. Then lets take your money and pay for all the death cause by the illegals and for all the pain. Want about the over Crowded schools the medical thats payed for by the american tax payers. And don't forget the money that's payed out for the useless democrats in washington. Get some commen sence. Yours truly a real american and not some wimpy candy assed powerpuff snowflake fake american. 🤠🇺🇸😘.

"2/3rds of illegals came here legally and overstayed their visas

"Too bad we can’t trade all these families loved ones who are killed by illegals with family members of these democratic fucks. Hopefully these democratic fuckers lose their family members to illegals. Then maybe they’ll see why we need security. But I bet that AOC cunt could have her whole family raped

"Too bad we can’t trade all these families loved ones who are killed by illegals with family members of these democratic fucks. Hopefully these democratic fuckers lose their family members to illegals. Then maybe they’ll see why we need security. But I bet that AOC cunt could have her whole family raped

Sorry for you loss. Illegals should be deported immediately.

Illegals killing our people is only a very small majority why don't you people look at the facts

Ohh I am so sorry I am just 💓 broken and angry to keep hearing about these stories of families that are horribly hurt and affected by the awful illegals coming into OUR country.... BUILD THE WALL ... keep them OUT 😥

Sorry for all the loss of lives to our people.  The illegals shouldn’t have even been here....  we are just learning how corrupt many of our Congressmen/women and senators are...much of this death and dying is their fault for not upholding the laws of our land already in place..

"I pray that all you folks that support these idiots that are fighting Trump on The Wall never have to feel the horror of losing a child or any family member to violence or drugs brought here by these illegals

Need to execute illegals!!!

We must 6ft under illegals

Glad all your kids got killed by illegals. You fucking liars.

No more illegals should step foot into our country

because he was killed by a illegal alien does not make him special cause pet capita more nin illegals kill then illegal. you guys are just pawns of trump. he didnt give a hoot who died in cgarkittville..but if it's an illegal alien he uses it for his agency. he sargued nothing a tear after parkland but that would not mean anything to his base Wake up

Now just change the immigration laws. No more Sanctuary City status!  No more housing and feeding illegals. All the money spent thus far spent on illegals could have built a Great Wall to protect us. Dems like to frivolously spend our money.   Safety for Americans first!

Now just change the immigration laws. No more Sanctuary City status!  No more housing and feeding illegals. All the money spent thus far spent on illegals could have built a Great Wall to protect us. Dems like to frivolously spend our money.   Safety for Americans first!

We do not need the wall! If it’s drugs coming in your worried about? That’s our problem because that wouldn’t be a problem if Americans didn’t BUY the drugs. Illegal immigrants killing people? Yes it’s bad but Americans kill more Americans than illegals do. Why don’t we make it easier to become legal so that the people who are good people wanting a better life don’t have to wait 10-12 years to come in legally. Fix America and the other issues will be way easier to fix

"Heart broken story shared by a loving father. We need to remove illegals because no matter what you like to call them

"What are you doing about ALL the drunk drivers who are not illegals and kill many many people

We as Americans should have an open season on hunting illegals and criminals

"Only point left is that if you like illegals and support their garbage

The people who don't want a wall should all let the illegals live with them

Keeping away all illegals is not the solution to stop the killings we also have legals killing people in the country 🤔 plus building a wall is not going to make a difference there's illegals crossing the country thru the main entrance lol

Keeping away all illegals is not the solution to stop the killings we also have legals killing people in the country 🤔 plus building a wall is not going to make a difference there's illegals crossing the country thru the main entrance lol

Thank you President Trump for putting the safety of our Country before the Votes of ILLEGALS! There are no limits to the Hypocrisy of the Entire Democrat Party! Democrats will continue to obstruct and deny this country of the leadership we deserve!

Walls don’t stop murders. Walls don’t keep illegals out. Walls don’t do anything but satisfy a mentally defective old man’s base of support and those people are screwballs and failures.

We need for the Republican Party to start advertising how the Democrats care less for the American citizen than they do for illegals and mooches.

To Patrick P-Huneault seriously this is your level of understanding???!!!  No one said illegals are mostly bad people. We R saying illegals commit crimes and shouldnt be here. Your comment is truly asinine.

To Patrick P-Huneault seriously this is your level of understanding???!!!  No one said illegals are mostly bad people. We R saying illegals commit crimes and shouldnt be here. Your comment is truly asinine.

"Illegals cost us money!   Food stamps

"Time for the democrat/liberal/socialists to start paying for the illegals coming into America. The TAXPAYERS are done with their stupidity. Our KIDS have College debt sitting at a billion or more

We need to get this damn wall built so we can keep these fucking illegals and immigrants out of our country they don't belong over here there's enough of them here as it is go take over ruin somebody else's country

I am pretty sure this happens more than every one knows not just by someone getting killed but by car accidents then you as the insured get the bill for a hit and and run or other issue because these illegals do not care!

"So after the illegals are ""blocked"" by the wall

tax every single business found using illegals for workers.  use that money to build the wall. keep taxing the s*** out of them until they cant afford to use them.

"Illegals do NOT respect our laws

When you park your car you lock it! When you leave your home or go to bed you lock up your home! Why because you want to protect your home and valuables! If someone was hurting a loved one of yours would you just sit back or go after them? The President has the same type of job only he's responsible for the entire country! Will a wall stop all of the illegals and the crimes no we all know that but we do need protection! Now if you have an alternative idea great lets hear it! But stop these asinine comments! You go look the victim's families ask them how the feel. You go defend the border!

Absolutely without a doubt there should not be one more person murdered by criminal illegals

Your an idiot.    How many illegals shot up scholls and concerts

".over 1800 murdered in 2018 by illegals

"The hard facts are that illegals commit fewer crimes than legal citizens. Absolutely there is crime but at a much lower rate. As a teenager I lost my license for a short time doing stupid driving. I worked and did deliveries with the company vehicle. If I told my boss that I had lost my license

"I support the wall 100%.  I have lived next door to these illegals that tormented my family for years.  The wall needs to be built

What good is the wall you have 30 million ILLEGALS here now and sanctuary cities what good is the freaking wall deport them now you fraud president then build the wall

Build the dmn WALL or Shoot the illegals at the first sight !!

Mr. President...please send ICE to St. Paul and Dearborn.  They are infested with illegals!  This is how we are getting the wrong people in Congress!

its so sad the the democrats dont care who dies at the hands of illegals

"The wall WILL finally be built and the liberals are going to EXPLODE   Promise made Promise kept  Promise delivered   What is so bad with keeping EVERYONE LEGAL and HONEST and  NOT allowing ILLEGALS here?  No one ever said IMMIGRANTS wasn't allowed here

"It's so obvious that a wall or barrier must be built. Watching the illegals climbing over existing walls makes me think that those walls need some grease to make them slippery so they can't be climbed. No crisis? Just look at the thousands of people who are storming our border every day and the caravans making their way to our border. Any lawmaker who repeats ""there is no border crisis"" should be made to resign and let someone with common sense take their place. Our border is not a political pawn!"

the IDIOT central american GANG member in the photo thinks he can evade detection if he wears an italia shirt. Dumb ILLITERATE ILLEGALS. CA is teeming with these lowlifes. BUILD THAT WALL. DEPORT THEM  ALL.  http://enewspaper.latimes.com/infinity/article_share.aspx?guid=425d841b-a4ca-4f87-86b9-df6c0829b6bf

"Is that why you hire illegals? The wall is just your fragile ego. You need to accomplish something. Narcissism is a bitch

We need the wall... we need to deport the illegals... iof they can't come the right way stop breaking into our country same as coming into my home or your home when we are not home breaking and entering.

Loony Bomar IF THAT IS YOUR REAL IMMIGRANT NAME YOUR A IGNORANT BASTARD THATS WHY TRUMP IS BUILDING THE WALL TO KEEP THE KILLERS OUT HE WANTS OUR COUNTRY SAFE AN DRUG FREE ONE DAY WHICH IN TIME WILL AN THE TRAFFICKING IT COULD BE YOU THAT GETS KILLED ONE DAY BY SOMEONE THAT DOESNT LIKE ILLEGALS

"SHOULD BE a wall with the names of those murdered by NOT immigrants BUT ILLEGALS on the Capitol grounds and see it sadly grow EVERY DAY

Illegals are human...they do what our people do. Statistically— such crimes much lower than the legal residence. Find a better argument. Trump is a conartist and say or do anything to win his case!!

I am 100% BUILD THE WALL. BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL  BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL. DEPORT ALL ILLEGALS iLLEIN THEIR NOT BELONG THIS COUTRY. COME LEGALLY PERIOD.

"This country is already inundated with illegals. Time to build the wall

Democrats all having a melt down over the illegals .

"I strongly feel that if Govenors / Senators /  Congressmen & Attorney Generals keep protecting criminals or Illegal immigrants that cause harm & crime to the people of the USA & keep protecting harboring the repeat offenders & aiding & abetting "" "" Sanctuary Cities or "" illegals "" regardless of nationality & the criminals & committing treason against the people of the USA... That the people of that State should file a Federal Class Action lawsuit & start a go fund me account to pay for it...  ;) just a thought... ;)   SHARE IT YOU AGREE OR IF YOU FEEL FROGGY..."

total: 2093